   IFRAME: https://www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-KSG89LT

   Skip to main content
   (BUTTON) Open Navigation Menu

   HWD
   Sign In
     * Subscribe

   Search
     * HIVE
          + Business
          + Technology
          + Politics
          + The Players
     * HWD
          + Movies
          + Television
          + Awards
          + Reviews
     * VANITIES
          + Celebrity
          + Fashion
          + Beauty
          + Royals
     * COMPLETE ARCHIVE

   (BUTTON) Close Related Items Drawer
     * HWD

Meet the Brains Behind the Disney+ Content Flood
       By
       Joy Press
     * HWD

What a Kevin Feige Star Wars Movie Might Look Like
       By
       Anthony Breznican
     * HWD

SNL Hire Shane Gillis Doesn’t Quite Apologize for Racist, Homophobic Remarks
       By
       Laura Bradley
     * HWD

Can a Book Like The Goldfinch Possibly Become a Great Movie?
       By
       Vanity Fair

   Cover Story
   Summer 2019

Star Wars: The Rise of Skywalker, The Ultimate Preview

   After four decades, Star Wars is drawing to its epic conclusion. Lev
   Grossman goes behind the scenes with director J.J. Abrams and the cast
   for the inside scoop on The Rise of Skywalker. With exclusive
   photographs by Annie Leibovitz.
   By
   Lev Grossman
   Photography by
   Annie Leibovitz
   May 22, 2019
     *
     *
     *

   Daisy Ridley on set in Jordan as the character as Rey.
   SHOOTING STARS
   Director J. J. Abrams sets up a shot of Daisy Ridley (Rey) in Jordan’s
   Wadi Rum desert, the setting for the planet Pasaana. In the desert,
   says Abrams, “there’s something about the way the sand interacts with
   the light.”Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.
     *
     *
     *

   There’s a desert valley in southern Jordan called Wadi Rum, or
   sometimes “the Valley of the Moon.” There are stone inscriptions in
   Wadi Rum that are more than 2,000 years old. Lawrence of Arabia passed
   through there during the Arab Revolt against the Ottoman Empire. More
   recently, J. J. Abrams went there to film parts of the latest Star Wars
   movie, The Rise of Skywalker, because it’s largely uninhabited and
   starkly beautiful and looks plausibly alien, and one of the things that
   has always made the Star Wars movies feel so real—as if they had a real
   life of their own that continues on out beyond the edges of the
   screen—is the way they’re shot on location, with as few digital effects
   as possible. George Lucas shot the Tatooine scenes from A New Hope in
   southern Tunisia. For Skywalker, it’s Wadi Rum.

   They don’t do it that way because it’s easy. Abrams and his crew had to
   build miles of road into the desert. They basically had to set up a
   small town out there, populated by the cast and extras and crew—the
   creature-effects department alone had 70 people. The Jordanian military
   got involved. The Jordanian royal family got involved. There was sand.
   There were sandstorms, when all you could do was take cover and huddle
   in your tent and—if you’re John Boyega, who plays the ex-Stormtrooper
   Finn—listen to reggae.
   The 2019 Summer Cover of Vanity Fair with Adam Driver
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.
   The 2019 Summer Cover of Vanity Fair
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.

   But in a way that’s the whole point: you’re out there so the world can
   get up in your grill and make its presence felt on film. “It’s the
   things that you can’t anticipate—the imperfections,” says Oscar Isaac,
   who plays the Resistance pilot Poe Dameron. “It’s very difficult to
   design imperfection, and the imperfections that you have in these
   environments immediately create a sense of authenticity. You just
   believe it more.” When Isaac arrived in Wadi Rum for his first week of
   shooting, Abrams had set up a massive greenscreen in the middle of the
   desert. “And I was like, ‘J. J., can I ask you a question? I notice
   we’re shooting on greenscreen.’ And he’s like, ‘So why the hell are we
   in the desert?’ And I’m like, ‘Yeah!’ And he said, ‘Well, because look:
   the way that the sand interacts with the light, and the type of shots
   you would set up—if you were designing the shot on a computer you would
   never even think to do that.’ There’s something about the way that the
   light and the environment and everything plays together.” It’s that
   something, the presence and the details and the analog imperfections of
   a real nondigital place, that makes Star Wars so powerful.

   IFRAME:
   https://audm.herokuapp.com/player-embed/?pub=vf&articleID=star-wars-pre
   view

   It was powerful enough to bring 65,000 people to Chicago in April for
   Star Wars Celebration, a fan convention where you could see a giant
   Stormtrooper head made out of 36,440 tiny Lego Stormtrooper
   mini-figures, which is a world record of some kind, though I’m not sure
   exactly what, and where people were dressed up as Muppets who were
   themselves dressed up as Star Wars characters. But the main event was
   the launch of the trailer for The Rise of Skywalker, which was held in
   a 10,000-seat arena and was such a big deal that even though the
   trailer was going to be released on the Internet literally seconds
   after it was over, I—an at least theoretically respectable member of
   the media—was not only tagged, wristbanded, escorted, and
   metal-detected, but sniffed by a K-9 unit before I could go in.

   I sat down with Abrams a couple of hours later. For the occasion, he
   was wearing a suit so black and sharp, he could have been doing Men in
   Black cosplay, but his most distinctive feature is his dark curly hair,
   which is upswept in a way that is only slightly suggestive of devil
   horns. Abrams talks rapidly, as if he can barely keep up with the
   things his racing brain is telling him to say. When I told him that not
   only was Star Wars the No. 1 trending topic on Twitter, but that all 10
   of the Top 10 trending topics were Star Wars–related, and that he
   personally was No. 5, he was visibly stunned.
   Advertisement

   Then he recovered enough to say: “Well, I aspire to No. 4.” (For the
   record, No. 4 was the late Supreme Leader Snoke, who frankly did seem
   beatable. If you’re curious, No. 11 was pro golfer Zach Johnson, who
   had just accidentally hit his ball with a practice swing at the
   Masters. Life goes on.)
   J.J. Abrams alongside Stunt Coordinator Eunice Huthart and the Knights
   of Ren.

   J.J. Abrams, alongside Stunt Coordinator Eunice Huthart, directs the
   Knights of Ren; elite fearsome enforcers of Kylo Ren’s dark will.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.

   Disney executives talk about how important it is to “event-ize” Star
   Wars movies; i.e., to make them feel not just like movies but like
   seriously momentous occasions. They won’t have much trouble with this
   one: The Rise of Skywalker isn’t just the last movie in the Star Wars
   trilogy that began in 2015 with The Force Awakens; it’s the last movie
   in a literal, actual trilogy of trilogies that started with the very
   first Star Wars movie back in 1977, which began the saga of the
   Skywalker family. The Rise of Skywalker will finally, after 42 years,
   bring that saga to an end.
   Keri Russell as the masked scoundrel Zorri Bliss.

   FIRST LOOK
   Vanity Fair reveals Keri Russell as the masked scoundrel Zorri Bliss,
   seen in the Thieves’ Quarter of the snow-dusted world Kijimi.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.

   We all thought the story was over in 1983 with Return of the Jedi, and
   then we really thought it was over in 2005 with Revenge of the Sith.
   But Star Wars has always been an unruly beast, too big and powerful
   (and profitable) to be contained in one movie, or even in a trilogy, or
   even in two trilogies, let alone numberless novels, TV shows, comics,
   video games, Happy Meals, and so on. Now Abrams has to gather all those
   threads and bring closure to a story that was started by somebody else,
   in an America that feels a very long time ago indeed. “That’s the
   challenge of this movie,” Abrams says. “It wasn’t just to make one film
   that as a stand-alone experience would be thrilling, and scary, and
   emotional, and funny, but one that if you were to watch all nine of the
   films, you’d feel like, Well, of course—that!”

   Like a lot of things that we now can’t imagine life without, Star Wars
   came really close to never happening in the first place. In 1971, Lucas
   was a serious young auteur just five years out of film school at U.S.C.
   He had only one full-length movie on his résumé, and that was THX 1138,
   which is the kind of visionary but grindingly earnest science-fiction
   epic that only the French could love. (They were pretty much the only
   ones who did.) Everybody expected Lucas to go on and make serious,
   gritty 1970s cinema like his peers, Brian De Palma and Francis Ford
   Coppola. At the time Lucas and Coppola were actively planning a radical
   epic set in Vietnam with the provocative title Apocalypse Now.
   General Hux Allegiant General Pryde on the bridge of Kylo Rens
   destroyer.

   FORCE MAJEURE
   First Order leaders General Hux (Domhnall Gleeson) and Allegiant
   General Pryde (Richard E. Grant) on the bridge of Kylo Ren’s destroyer.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.

   But Coppola would have to finish that one on his own, because Lucas
   went a different way. “I had decided there was no modern mythology,” he
   said in 1997. “I wanted to take old myths and put them into a new
   format that young people could relate to. Mythology always existed in
   unusual, unknown environments, so I chose space.” Lucas tried to
   acquire the rights to Flash Gordon (that would’ve been a dark timeline
   indeed), but when he couldn’t, he came up with his own original
   science-fictional epic instead. He called it The Star Wars. Like The
   Facebook, it would have to shed a direct article on its way to glory.

   Even though American Graffiti had made Lucas a bankable director, Star
   Wars still came together slowly. In the first draft, Luke was an old
   man, Leia was 14, and Han Solo was “a huge green-skinned monster with
   no nose and large gills.” Fox executives were baffled by Star Wars, and
   they squeezed Lucas relentlessly for time and money. We forget now how
   jerry-rigged the first movie was: the cantina aliens weren’t finished,
   and the monumental Star Destroyer that dominates the opening shot is,
   in reality, about three feet long. The Death Star interior is basically
   one set re-arranged several different ways. To make Greedo’s mouth
   move, the woman in the Greedo suit had to hold a clothespin in her
   mouth. “What I remember about working on the first film,” says John
   Williams, the legendary soundtrack composer, “is the fact that I didn’t
   ever think there would be a second film.” (He also, like everybody
   else, thought Luke and Leia were going to get together, so he wrote
   them a love theme.)

   But wherever real mythology comes from, Lucas had gone there and
   brought something back alive. People wanted movies that gave them
   something to believe in instead of relentlessly autopsying the beliefs
   that had failed them. We’d had enough of antiheroes. We needed some
   anti-antiheroes. “I realized after THX that people don’t care about how
   the country’s being ruined,” Lucas said. “We’ve got to regenerate
   optimism.” Like American Graffiti, Star Wars is a work of profound
   nostalgia, a post-Vietnam, post-Watergate anthem of longing for the
   restoration of a true and just power in the universe—the return of the
   king. And at the same time it’s a very personal hero’s journey, about a
   boy who must put right the sins of his father and master the strange
   power he finds within himself, and in doing so become a man.
   Advertisement

   Star Wars is also an incredibly enduring vision of what it’s like to
   live in a world of super-advanced technology. Science fiction often
   ages badly, turning into kitsch or camp—just look at Flash Gordon—but
   Star Wars hasn’t. More than any filmmaker before him, Lucas
   successfully imagined what a science-fictional world would feel like to
   somebody who was actually inside it—which is to say, it would look as
   ordinary and workaday as the present. He even shot it like it was real,
   working close-in and mostly eschewing wide establishing shots, more
   like a documentary or a newsreel than a space opera. “It feels very
   grounded,” says Naomi Ackie, who’s making her Star Wars debut in
   Skywalker playing a character named Jannah, about whom she is allowed
   to say literally nothing. “There’s the kind of spectacular-ness, and
   the supernatural move-things-with-your-mind magic stuff, but then
   there’s also this really grounded, rugged nature where everything is
   distressed and old and kind of worn out and lived-in. And I think
   playing with those two ideas means that you get this feeling that it
   could almost be real. Like, in a galaxy far away, it could almost be
   the case that you could have this.”

   When Lucas made the first Star Wars sequel, The Empire Strikes Back, he
   cheekily labeled it Episode V, then went back and re-labeled the first
   movie as Episode IV, as if the movies were an old-fashioned serial that
   the rest of us were all just tuning in to. Around that time, he also
   started talking about Star Wars as a nine-part epic—so in 2012, when
   Lucas retired and sold Lucasfilm to Disney, it wasn’t exactly heresy
   that Disney announced more movies. At the time, Kathleen Kennedy had
   just been named co-chairperson of Lucasfilm, and she tapped Abrams to
   direct the first Disney-owned post-Lucas Star Wars movie. It was a bit
   like saying, Make the lightning strike again, please. Exactly here, if
   you could. Oh, and could you also earn back that $4 billion we just
   spent to buy Lucasfilm? (Narrator voice: He could.)

   At first blush, Abrams’s debut Star Wars movie, The Force Awakens,
   looked like an elaborate homage to the original. Just like in A New
   Hope, there’s a young Force-sensitive person on a poor desert
   planet—that’s Rey, played by Daisy Ridley—who finds a droid with a
   secret message that’s vital to the Rebellion (or wait, sorry, it’s the
   Resistance now). There’s a villain in a black mask, just like Darth
   Vader, except that it’s his grandson Kylo Ren (Adam Driver), né Ben
   Solo, son of Han and Leia. Kylo has a planet-killing weapon, much like
   the Death Star but way bigger, which becomes the target of a desperate
   attack by Resistance X-wings. There’s even a bar full of aliens.

   “This trilogy is about this young generation, this new generation,
   having to deal with all the debt that has come before.”

   Abrams also insisted on keeping to the analog aesthetic of the original
   trilogy: those aliens had to be latex and yak hair, not bits and bytes,
   and everything possible was shot on location using film cameras, not
   digital ones. Even Lucas had abandoned that approach by the time he
   made the second Star Wars trilogy, but many fans consider those movies
   to be a cautionary tale. “Famously, the prequels were mostly
   greenscreen environments,” Abrams says. “And that was George himself
   doing that, and it ended up looking exactly how he wanted it to
   look—and I always preferred the look of the original movies, because I
   just remember when you’re in the snow on Hoth, when you’re in the
   desert on Tatooine, and when you’re in the forests of Endor—it’s
   amazing. If you put a vaporator here, there, all of a sudden almost any
   natural location suddenly becomes a Star Wars location.”
   Advertisement

   But the more interesting thing about The Force Awakens and its
   successor, The Last Jedi, written and directed by Rian Johnson, was how
   they subtly complicated Lucas’s vision. Thirty years have gone by since
   the ending of Return of the Jedi, during which time the newly reborn
   Republic became complacent and politically stagnant, allowing the rise
   of the reactionary neo-imperial First Order, whose origins we will
   learn more about in Skywalker. “It was almost like if the Argentine
   Nazis had sort of got together and actually started to bring that back
   in some real form,” Abrams says. Just like that, the rules of the Star
   Wars universe changed. It wasn’t all over when the Ewoks sang. Obi-Wan
   Kenobi and all those Bothans had died in vain. Even Han and Leia split
   up. It’s all a little less of a fairy tale now.

   The feather-haired godling Luke suffered the trauma of having a Padawan
   go bad on his watch. It’s an echo of what happened to his old mentor,
   Obi-Wan, with Anakin Skywalker, who became Darth Vader. But where
   Obi-Wan made peace with it, waiting serenely in the desert of Tatooine
   for the next Chosen One to arrive, Luke’s guilt curdled into shame. He
   hid himself away, so that his Chosen One, Rey, had to spend most of The
   Force Awakens searching for him, and then another whole movie
   convincing him with the help of Yoda’s Force ghost to keep the Jedi
   Order going at all. Star Wars arrived as an antidote to the
   disillusionment of the 1970s—but now, in its middle age, Star Wars is
   grappling with disillusionment of its own.
   Joonas Suotamo Ridley Anthony Daniels and John Boyega on set in Jordan.

   DESERT POWER
   Joonas Suotamo (Chewbacca), Ridley, Anthony Daniels (C-3PO), and John
   Boyega (Finn) await the call to action for a chase scene.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.

   By dint of advanced Sith interrogation techniques, I was able to obtain
   valuable advance information about The Rise of Skywalker. Here it is:
   common emblem.

   Anthony Daniels, who plays C-3P0, is the only actor who has appeared in
   all nine movies of the Star Wars triple trilogy, so if anybody’s
   entitled to leak, it’s him. Daniels says he loved the script for The
   Rise of Skywalker, but he didn’t get it until the last minute, right
   before shooting started, and for some reason he just couldn’t memorize
   his part. “My first line would not go in my head!” he says. In person
   Daniels is like a C-3P0 whose preferences have been reset to charming
   and voluble. “The line that I couldn’t say was two words: ‘common
   emblem.’ Common emblem, common emblem—I would say them thousands of
   times. My wife would say it back. I just couldn’t say them!”

   Fortunately C-3P0’s mouth doesn’t move, so he could add the line in
   postproduction. Anyway, there’s the big scoop: “common emblem.” I don’t
   know what it means either. (Also I 100 percent guarantee that they will
   change the line before the movie comes out so that this scoop will end
   up being fake news.) Daniels also told me that C-3P0 does something in
   this movie that surprises everybody—but he wouldn’t say what. “He keeps
   his clothes on. It’s not like he suddenly does this thing, but …”

   The only other member of the old guard on the set this time was Billy
   Dee Williams, who plays the charismatic Lando Calrissian. At 82,
   Williams has lost none of his roguish charm, but now it comes wrapped
   in a kind of magisterial dignity. People tend to remember Lando for the
   deal he cut with Vader in The Empire Strikes Back, rather than for his
   redemptive comeback in Return of the Jedi, and Williams appears to have
   spent the last 45 years defending him. “He’s a survivor. It’s
   expediency for him,” Williams says. “You know, he was thrown into a
   situation which he didn’t look for and he had to try to figure out how
   to deal with an entity which is more than just a human.” And, he adds,
   with the weary air of somebody who has spent way too much time
   justifying the behavior of a fictional character, “nobody died!”
   Members of the crew shade and shine Daniels on set in Jordan.

   HOT TAKE
   Members of the crew shade and shine Daniels, the only cast member to
   appear in all nine of the Skywalker films, while BB-8 looks on.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.

   Chewbacca is still here, too, but it’s not the same man in the suit.
   The original actor was Peter Mayhew, a seven-foot-three-inch gentle
   giant who was working as a hospital orderly in London when Lucas cast
   him in the first movie. Mayhew retired after The Force Awakens, and he
   died on April 30 at 74. His replacement is Joonas Suotamo, a
   fresh-faced former professional basketball player from Finland who
   always wanted to be an actor but was hard to cast because he’s six feet
   11 inches tall. “When I first met [Mayhew] he told me I was a wee bit
   too skinny,” Suotamo says. “But we also had a Wookiee boot camp, which
   lasted for a week. He told me all kinds of things about the moves that
   Chewbacca does, how they came to be and his reasoning behind them.”
   Suotamo has now played Chewbacca in four movies and enjoys it about as
   much as I’ve ever seen anybody enjoy anything. “It’s very much like
   silent-era film, with Buster Keaton and Charlie Chaplin,” he says.
   “He’s a mime character and that’s what he does, and I guess in that
   minimalism comes the beauty of the character.”
   Advertisement

   Other things we know about Skywalker: We can safely assume that the
   Resistance and the First Order are headed toward a final smash, which
   will be a heavy lift for the good guys because, at the end of The Last
   Jedi, the Resistance was down, way down, to a double handful of
   survivors. They’ll face a First Order who suffered a stinging but
   largely symbolic loss at the Battle of Crait, and who, I feel
   confident, have learned something from the previous eight movies. The
   Empire built and lost two Death Stars. The First Order has already lost
   one super-weapon in The Force Awakens. Presumably it won’t make the
   same mistake twice, twice.

   But the stakes go even higher than that, cosmically high. Sources close
   to the movie say that Skywalker will at long last bring to a climax the
   millennia-long conflict between the Jedi Order and its dark shadow, the
   Sith.
   Finn and new ally Jannah atop hardy orbaks.

   HORSING AROUND
   Finn and new ally Jannah (Naomi Ackie), atop hardy orbaks, lead the
   charge against the mechanized forces of the First Order. “It’s
   extremely surreal to be in it,” says Ackie, “and see how it works from
   the inside.”
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.
   Kylo Ren and Rey battle it out with lightsabers.

   STAR CROSSED
   Kylo Ren (Adam Driver) and Rey battle it out with lightsabers in a
   stormy confrontation. Their Force-connection—what Driver calls their
   “maybe-bond”—will turn out to run even deeper than previously revealed.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.

   The hottest area for speculation, however, is the identity of the
   titular Skywalker, because at this point there aren’t many Skywalkers
   left to rise. One is General Organa, the former Princess Leia, Luke’s
   sister—but Carrie Fisher, who plays her, passed away in 2016. That was
   a deeply painful loss for Abrams personally, but it also presented him
   with an impossible choice as a filmmaker. He needed Leia to tell the
   story, but Abrams didn’t feel like a digital Carrie Fisher could do the
   job, and there was no way Lucasfilm was going to re-cast the role.

   But then a strange thing happened. Abrams remembered that there was
   some footage of Fisher left over from The Force Awakens, scenes that
   had been changed or cut entirely, and he dug them up. “It’s hard to
   even talk about it without sounding like I’m being some kind of cosmic
   spiritual goofball,” Abrams says, “but it felt like we suddenly had
   found the impossible answer to the impossible question.” He started to
   write scenes around the old footage, fitting Leia’s dialogue into new
   contexts. He re-created the lighting to match the way Fisher had been
   lit. Bit by bit, she found her place in the new movie. “It was a
   bizarre kind of left side/right side of the brain sort of Venn diagram
   thing, of figuring out how to create the puzzle based on the pieces we
   had.” Fisher’s daughter, Billie Lourd, appears in the movies as a
   Resistance officer named Lieutenant Connix, and at first Abrams
   deliberately wrote her out of the scenes in case it was too painful—but
   Lourd said no, she wanted to be in them. “And so, there are moments
   where they’re talking; there are moments where they’re touching,”
   Abrams says. “There are moments in this movie where Carrie is there,
   and I really do feel there is an element of the uncanny, spiritual, you
   know, classic Carrie, that it would have happened this way, because
   somehow it worked. And I never thought it would.”

   The only other member of the surviving Skywalker bloodline—that we know
   of!—is Leia’s son and Luke’s former Padawan, the fallen Jedi Kylo Ren.
   Kylo probably isn’t capable of actual happiness, but things are
   definitely looking up for him: by the end of The Last Jedi he has taken
   control of the First Order and killed or at least outlived his actual
   father and both of his symbolic fathers-in-art, Luke and Supreme Leader
   Snoke. Sources at Disney also confirm that his long-rumored Knights of
   Ren will finally arrive in Skywalker. “And then he had been forging
   this maybe-bond with Rey,” Driver says, “and it kind of ends with the
   question in the air: is he going to pursue that relationship, or when
   the door of her ship goes up, does that also close that camaraderie
   that they were maybe forming?”
   Spotlighting the heroics of Chewbacca BB8 and Rey.

   SANDBLAST
   Camera operator Colin Anderson readies a take for a chase sequence
   spotlighting the heroics of Chewbacca, BB-8, and Rey.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.

   Darkness in the Star Wars movies tends to come from fear: for Anakin
   Skywalker, Kylo’s grandfather, it was his fear of losing his mother and
   his wife. After two movies it’s still not so easy to say exactly what
   Kylo Ren himself fears, even though he’s as operatically emo as Vader
   was stoic. He’s fixated on the past—he made a shrine to his own
   grandfather—but at the same time the past torments him. “Let the past
   die,” he tells Rey in The Last Jedi. “Kill it, if you have to. That’s
   the only way to become what you are meant to be.”
   Advertisement

   Presumably whatever’s eating at Kylo started in his childhood: maybe
   being the kid of literally the two coolest people in the galaxy isn’t
   as fun as it sounds. Driver—who has obviously thought this through with
   a lot of rigor—points out that, as cool as they are, Han and Leia are
   both obsessively committed to lifestyles (smuggling, rebelling) that
   don’t leave much room for kids. He also points out that, unlike Luke
   and Rey, Kylo never got to go on a nifty voyage of self-discovery.
   Instead he grew up under the crushing pressure of massive expectations.
   “How do you form friendships out of that?” Driver says. “How do you
   understand the weight of that? And if there’s no one around you guiding
   you, or articulating things the right way … it can easily go awry.” By
   the emotional logic that governs the Star Wars universe—and also our
   own—Kylo Ren is going to have to confront the past, and his fears,
   whatever they are, or be destroyed by them.

   Where Lucas’s trilogies tended to follow the roots and branches of the
   Skywalker family tree—their personal saga was the saga of the galaxy
   writ small—the new movies have a slightly wider aperture and take in a
   new generation of heroes. There’s Rey, of course, who sources say will
   have progressed in her training since the end of The Last Jedi to the
   point where it’s almost complete. With that taken care of, all she has
   to do is reconstitute the entire Jedi Order from scratch, because as
   far as we know she’s the Last One.

   If Kylo Ren can’t be redeemed it will almost certainly fall to Rey to
   put him down, in spite of their maybe-bond. Their relationship is the
   closest thing the new trilogy has to a star-crossed love story on the
   order of Han and Leia: a source close to the movie says that their
   Force-connection will turn out to run even deeper than we thought.
   They’re uniquely suited to understand each other, but at the same time
   they are in every way each other’s inverse, down to Kylo’s perverse
   rejection of his family, which is the one thing Rey craves most. “I
   think there’s a part of Rey that’s like, dude, you fucking had it all,
   you had it all,” Ridley says. “That was always a big question during
   filming: you had it all and you let it go.”
   Billy Dee Williams as Lando Calrissian and Oscar Isaac Poe Dameron with
   Chewbacca DO and BB8.

   PUNCH IT!
   In a historic reunion, Lando Calrissian (Billy Dee Williams) retakes
   the helm of the Millennium Falcon, joined by Poe Dameron (Oscar Isaac),
   Chewbacca, D-O, and BB-8. “He’s a survivor,” Williams says of Lando.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.

   Rey is also, according to totally unsubstantiated Internet theories, a
   leading candidate to be the Skywalker of the title, pending some kind
   of head-snapping reveal about her ancestry. (For the record, the other
   leading unsubstantiated Internet theory has the “Skywalker” of the
   title referring to an entirely new order of Force users who will rise
   up and replace the Jedi.)

   Rey seems ready for it all, or as ready as anybody could be. “It’s nice
   having that shot at the beginning of the teaser,” Ridley says, over
   avocado toast at a fancy Chicago hotel, “because I think it’s quite a
   good visual representation of where she is now: confident, calm, less
   fearful.… It’s still sort of overwhelming, but in a different way. It
   feels more right—less like inevitable and more like there’s a focus to
   the journey.” Focus is a good word for Rey: on-screen Ridley’s dramatic
   eyebrows form a wickedly sharp arrow of concentration. I asked Ridley
   what she’s thinking about when Rey is using her Force powers, and it
   turns out Rey seems focused because Ridley is actually seriously
   focused. “I literally visualize it. When I was lifting rocks I was
   visualizing the rocks moving. And then I was like, Oh, my God, I made
   it happen! And obviously there’s loads of rocks on strings, so, no, I
   didn’t. But I visualize that it’s really going on.” (That scene, which
   comes at the end of The Last Jedi, is another example of classic
   nondigital Star Wars effects: those were real rocks. “It was actually
   really amazing,” Ridley says. “It was sort of like a baby mobile.”)
   Advertisement

   There’s also Finn, the apostate Stormtrooper, played by the
   irrepressible Boyega, who in person practically vibrates with energy
   and speaks with a South London accent very different from Finn’s
   American one. In some ways Finn has gone through a complete character
   arc already: he confronted his past—by beating down his old boss,
   Captain Phasma—and found his courage and his moral center. He has had a
   tendency to panic, if not actively desert, in clutch situations, but at
   the Battle of Crait he proved that he was past that. “I think he’s just
   an active member of the Resistance now,” Boyega says. “Episode Eight,
   he couldn’t decide what team he was fighting for. But since then he’s
   made a clear decision.” (Cast members tend to refer to the Star Wars
   movies by their episode numbers: four is the original movie, seven is
   The Force Awakens, and so on.)

   Finn still has to make a clear decision about his romantic situation,
   though. As Boyega put it at Star Wars Celebration: “Finn is single and
   willing to mingle!” The movies have been teasing his emotional
   connections with both Rey and the Resistance mechanic Rose Tico, played
   by Kelly Marie Tran, with whom he shared a fleeting battlefield kiss in
   The Last Jedi. Rose seems like the more positive choice, given that she
   stops Finn from deserting early in the movie and saves his life at the
   Battle of Crait, and that the precedents for romantic involvements with
   Jedi are extremely bad. Tran is the first Asian-American woman to play
   a major role in a Star Wars movie, and she has been the target of both
   racist and sexist attacks online. But she has come through them as a
   fan favorite: when she appeared onstage in Chicago, she got a standing
   ovation.

   Finally there’s Poe, who has mostly struggled with his own cocky
   impulsiveness, because he’s a
   loose-cannon-who-just-can’t-play-by-the-rules. Poe will have to step up
   and become a leader, because the Resistance is seriously short on
   officer material. In fact, some of that transformation will already
   have happened where The Rise of Skywalker picks up, which is about a
   year after the end of The Last Jedi. “There has been a bit of shared
   history that you haven’t seen,” Isaac says. “Whereas in the other
   films, Poe is this kind of lone wolf, now he’s really part of a group.
   They’re going out and going on missions and have a much more familiar
   dynamic now.” Star Wars has always been about friendship as much as it
   is about romance, and as of the end of The Last Jedi, Rey, Finn, and
   Poe are all finally in the same place for the first time since The
   Force Awakens.

   The Rise of Skywalker introduces some new players, too. There’s a tiny
   one-wheeled droid called D-O and a large banana-slug alien named Klaud.
   Oh, and Naomi Ackie, Keri Russell, and Richard E. Grant have all joined
   the cast, though, again, we know practically nothing about who they’re
   playing. Going from being outside the Star Wars leviathan to being
   right in its belly can be a dizzying experience for a first-timer. “I
   actually tried to do this thing while we were filming,” Ackie says,
   “where I’d go one day, walking through London without seeing a Star
   Wars reference somewhere. And you can’t do it. You really can’t. So
   it’s extremely surreal to be in it and see how it works from the
   inside.”
   Jordanian locals play the AkiAki during the photoshoot.

   WELL MET
   Jordanian locals play the Aki-Aki, natives of the planet Pasaana.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.

   If anything, Star Wars is only getting more omnipresent. The franchise
   under Lucas was a colossus, but he still ran it essentially as a
   private concern. He could make movies or not, as his muse dictated—he
   was beholden to no shareholders. But Star Wars under Disney makes the
   old Star Wars look positively quaint. Between 1977 and 2005, Lucasfilm
   released six Star Wars movies; when Skywalker premieres in December,
   Disney will have released five Star Wars movies in five years. “I think
   there is a larger expectation that Disney has,” Kennedy says. “On the
   other hand, though, I think that Disney is very respectful of what this
   is, and right from the beginning we talked about the fragility of this
   form of storytelling. Because it’s something that means so much to fans
   that you can’t turn this into some kind of factory approach. You can’t
   even do what Marvel does, necessarily, where you pick characters and
   build new franchises around those characters. This needs to evolve
   differently.”
   Advertisement

   A useful example of that fragility might be the relatively modest
   performance of Solo: A Star Wars Story in 2018. Solo was a perfectly
   good Star Wars movie that has made almost $400 million worldwide—but
   it’s also, according to industry estimates, the first one to actually
   lose money. In response Disney has gently but firmly pumped the brakes:
   the first movie in the next Star Wars trilogy, which will be helmed by
   David Benioff and D. B. Weiss, the duo behind Game of Thrones, won’t
   arrive till Christmas of 2022, with further installments every other
   year after that. There’s no official word as to what stories they’ll
   tell, or when a second trilogy being developed by Rian Johnson will
   appear.

   But even as the movies pause, Star Wars continues to colonize any and
   all other media. In addition to video games, comics, novels, cartoons,
   container-loads of merch, etc., there are not one but two live-action
   TV series in the pipeline for Disney+, Disney’s new streaming service:
   The Mandalorian, created by Jon Favreau, and an as-yet-untitled show
   about Cassian Andor from Rogue One. I have personally tried a
   virtual-reality experience called Vader Immortal, written and produced
   by Dark Knight screenwriter David Goyer. At the end of May, Disneyland
   will open Star Wars: Galaxy’s Edge, a massive, 14-acre, $1 billion
   attraction where you can fly the Millennium Falcon, be captured by the
   First Order, and drink a blue milk cocktail (it’s actually nondairy)
   and Coca-Cola products out of exclusive BB-8-shaped bottles at the
   cantina. It’s the largest single-theme expansion in the park’s history:
   Take that, Toy Story Land. The Disney World version will open in
   August.

   You realize now that, under Lucas, Star Wars always slightly had the
   brakes on—we were always kept a little starved for product. With Disney
   driving, we’ll really find out how big Star Wars can get.
   Composer John Williams conducting the Star Wars score.

   ENCORE
   Composer John Williams conducting the Star Wars score, drawing on
   themes and motifs he has woven across four decades. “I didn’t think
   there would ever be a second film,” he says.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.

   When people talk about the new Star Wars movies, they tend to talk
   about how faithful they are to the originals. What’s harder to say is
   how exactly the new films are different—how movies like Skywalker keep
   their connection to the past while at the same time finding a way to
   belong to the world of 2019. Because regardless of whether or not Star
   Wars has changed since 1977, the world around it has, profoundly.
   “There’s a loss of innocence, a sense of innocence that existed in the
   70s that I don’t think to any extent exists today,” Kennedy says. “I
   think that has to permeate the storytelling and the reaction to the
   stories and how they’re set up. It has to feel differently because
   we’re different.”

   We know things, as a people and as an audience, that we didn’t know
   back then. For example: back then it felt sort of O.K. to like Darth
   Vader, because even though he was evil he was also incredibly cool, and
   the kind of fascism he represented felt like a bogeyman from the
   distant past. But now fascism is rising again, which makes the whole
   First Order subplot look super-prescient, but it also reminds us that
   fascism is not even slightly cool in real life. “Evil needs to feel and
   look very real,” Kennedy says, “and what that means today may not be as
   black-and-white as it might have been in 1977, coming off a kind of
   World War II sensibility.” In the Star Wars–verse, Dark and Light are
   supposed to balance each other, but in the real world they just mix
   together into a hopelessly foggy, morally ambiguous gray.
   Advertisement

   But the changes are liberating too. Star Wars doesn’t have to stay
   frozen in time; if anything it’s the opposite, if it doesn’t change
   it’ll die. It will turn into Flash Gordon. For Abrams, that means he
   can’t go through this process so haunted by the ghost of George Lucas
   (who is of course still alive, but you get what I’m saying) that he
   winds up doing a cinematic Lucas impression. At some point Abrams has
   to let Abrams be Abrams.

   It wasn’t all over when the Ewoks sang. Obi-Wan died in vain. Even Han
   and Leia split up. It’s all a little less of a fairy tale now.

   The Rise of Skywalker might be that point. “Working on nine, I found
   myself approaching it slightly differently,” he says. “Which is to say
   that, on seven, I felt beholden to Star Wars in a way that was
   interesting—I was doing what to the best of my ability I felt Star Wars
   should be.” But this time something changed. Abrams found himself
   making different choices—for the camera angles, the lighting, the
   story. “It felt slightly more renegade; it felt slightly more like, you
   know, Fuck it, I’m going to do the thing that feels right because it
   does, not because it adheres to something.”

   There are a lot of small subtle ways that Abrams’s Star Wars is
   different from Lucas’s, but if there’s a standout, it’s the way that
   the new movies look at history. Lucas’s Star Wars movies are bathed in
   the deep golden-sunset glow of the idyllic Old Republic, that more
   civilized age—but the new movies aren’t like that. They’re not
   nostalgic. They don’t long for the past; they’re more about the promise
   of the future. “This trilogy is about this young generation, this new
   generation, having to deal with all the debt that has come before,”
   Abrams says. “And it’s the sins of the father, and it’s the wisdom and
   the accomplishments of those who did great things, but it’s also those
   who committed atrocities, and the idea that this group is up against
   this unspeakable evil and are they prepared? Are they ready? What have
   they learned from before? It’s less about grandeur. It’s less about
   restoring an old age. It’s more about preserving a sense of freedom and
   not being one of the oppressed.”
   Mark Hamill as Luke with R2D2.

   FROM THE ASHES
   Mark Hamill, as Luke, with R2-D2. Speculation is rampant about who will
   “rise” as the Skywalker of the movie’s title—and how that choice will
   reflect the way the world has changed since Star Wars debuted in 1977.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.

   The new generation doesn’t have that same connection to the old days
   that Luke and Leia did. It’s not like their parents destroyed the Old
   Republic. We don’t even know who their parents were! They’re too young
   to remember the Empire. They’re just here to clean up the mess they got
   left with, the disastrous consequences of bad decisions made by earlier
   generations, and try to survive long enough to see the future. Is any
   of this resonating with 2019? Might there possibly be a generation
   around here somewhere that’s worried about the consequences of its own
   decisions for the future? Star Wars has never been and probably never
   should be a vehicle for political arguments, but to paraphrase Ursula
   Le Guin, great science fiction is never really about the future. It’s
   about the present.

   You could even—if you’re into that kind of thing—imagine the story of
   the new Star Wars trilogy as a metaphor for the making of the new Star
   Wars trilogy. In fact, I was totally prepared—because I am into that
   kind of thing!—to try to push this overthought metafictional hot take
   onto Abrams … but I didn’t have to. Abrams got there ahead of me. “The
   idea of the movie is kind of how I felt going into the movie as a
   filmmaker,” he says, “which is to say that I’ve inherited all this
   stuff, great stuff, and good wisdom, and the good and the bad, and it’s
   all coming to this end, and the question is, do we have what it takes
   to succeed?”

   Kylo Ren has it all wrong: you can’t bring back the past and become
   your own grandfather, and you can’t kill the past, either. All you can
   do is make your peace with it and learn from it and move on. Abrams is
   doing that with Star Wars—and meanwhile the Resistance is going to have
   to do that, too, if they really are going to bring this saga to an end.
   Because we’ve been here before, watching a band of scrappy rebels take
   down a technofascist empire, and it seemed to work fine at the time—but
   it didn’t last. The same goes for the Jedi and their struggle with the
   Sith. To end this story, really end it, they’re going to have to figure
   out the conditions of a more permanent victory over the forces of
   darkness. Their past was imperfect at best, and the present is a
   complete disaster—but the future is all before them. This time,
   finally, they’re going to get it right.
   Advertisement

   Costume design by Michael Kaplan; production design by Rick Carter and
   Kevin Jenkins; creature & droid FX creative supervisor, Neal Scanlan;
   for details, go to VF.com/credits.

More Great Star Wars Stories from Vanity Fair

   — All the images! Meet the characters, and go on set

   — Video: the author of our cover story opens his notebook

   — Faces, places, and empires: everything new revealed in the cover
   story

   — How J.J. Abrams included Carrie Fisher in on-screen moments

   — The Knights of Ren are back. But who are they?

   — From the archive (1999): Speaking with George Lucas on the eve of The
   Phantom Menace release

   Read More
   HWD
   What a Kevin Feige Star Wars Movie Might Look Like
   By
   Anthony Breznican
   HWD
   Disney CEO Bob Iger Promises Netflix and Disney+ Are “Very Different”
   By
   Kevin Fitzpatrick
   HWD
   Meet the Brains Behind the Disney+ Content Flood
   By
   Joy Press
   HWD
   Jurassic World 3 Wrangles Jeff Goldblum, Laura Dern, Sam Neill to
   Return
   By
   Yohana Desta

   HWD

     *
     *
     *
     *
     *

   (BUTTON) More from Vanity Fair
     * Promotions
     * Newsletter
     * Subscribe
     * Digital Edition
     * Inside the Issue

   (BUTTON) Contact
     * Contact VF
     * Customer Service
     * Advertising
     * Careers

     * Condé Nast Store
     * Reprints / Permissions
     * VF Media Kit
     * Sitemap
     * Accessibility Help

   © 2019 Condé Nast. All rights reserved. Use of this site constitutes
   acceptance of our User Agreement (updated 5/25/18) and Privacy Policy
   and Cookie Statement (updated 5/25/18) and Your California Privacy
   Rights. Vanity Fair may earn a portion of sales from products that are
   purchased through our site as part of our Affiliate Partnerships with
   retailers. The material on this site may not be reproduced,
   distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the
   prior written permission of Condé Nast. Ad Choices

   CN Entertainment
   [United States]

   IFRAME: https://js-sec.indexww.com/um/ixmatch.html
   IFRAME: https://www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-KSG89LT

   Skip to main content
   (BUTTON) Open Navigation Menu

   The Hive
   Sign In
     * Subscribe

   Search
     * HIVE
          + Business
          + Technology
          + Politics
          + The Players
     * HWD
          + Movies
          + Television
          + Awards
          + Reviews
     * VANITIES
          + Celebrity
          + Fashion
          + Beauty
          + Royals
     * COMPLETE ARCHIVE

   (BUTTON) Close Related Items Drawer
     * Hive

Report: Trump Wanted to Obliterate the U.S. Economy to Get Revenge on China
       By
       Bess Levin
     * Hive

The Virtual Border Wall Business Is Booming For Palmer Luckey
       By
       Eric Lutz
     * Hive

Is Trump Just Bluffing About Striking Iran?
       By
       Eric Lutz
     * Hive

Trump Blames Tariff Consequences on Companies Making “Excuses”
       By
       Kevin Fitzpatrick

   Trade War

Trump’s Cold War with China Could Literally Break the Internet

   Worsening tensions could push China to split from Silicon Valley,
   raising the specter of a completely bifurcated digital world.
   By
   Eric Lutz
   May 22, 2019
     *
     *
     *

   President of Honor a subbrand of Chinese telecommunications company
   Huawei George Zhao shows off an Honor 20 Pro smartphone.
   President of Honor, a sub-brand of Chinese telecommunications company
   Huawei, George Zhao, shows off an Honor 20 Pro smartphone.By TOLGA
   AKMEN/AFP/Getty Images.
     *
     *
     *

   The tech cold war between the United States and China is continuing to
   escalate. Just days after the Trump administration blacklisted China’s
   largest tech firm, Huawei, it’s reportedly weighing a ban against
   additional Chinese companies as part of its broader standoff with
   Beijing, cutting off their access to American technology. The move is
   likely to inflame tensions, and could accelerate the division between
   companies that rely on American tech, and those that use Chinese,
   potentially setting Beijing on a path to technological independence.
   “Even the briefest of bans will be proof to them that China can no
   longer rely on outsiders,” Bloomberg’s Tim Culpan wrote Sunday. “This
   can only accelerate the process of creating a digital iron curtain that
   separates the world into two distinct, mutually exclusive technological
   spheres.”

   The standoff has been brewing for months as Donald Trump battles
   Chinese President Xi Jinping over a relationship the president says has
   “taken so advantage” of the U.S., but it boiled over last week when the
   administration blacklisted Huawei, accusing the Chinese tech giant of
   being “involved in activities contrary to the national security or
   foreign policy interests of the United States”—namely, helping the
   Chinese government engage in foreign espionage. Major western tech
   companies including Google and chipmakers like Intel and Qualcomm have
   cut off supply to Huawei. Still, China has stood firm. On Monday,
   Huawei founder Ren Zhengfei said the administration “underestimates”
   China’s strength and welcomed the fight as step toward global tech
   domination. “We have sacrificed ourselves and our families for our
   ideal: to stand on top of the world,” Ren told Chinese media. “To reach
   this ideal, sooner or later there will be conflict with the U.S.”

   That conflict has already hurt Huawei, and could bring some pain to
   American companies that do business with the world’s second-largest
   economy, as the Associated Press noted Tuesday. But in the longer term,
   it could spur China to greater independence from the U.S., raising the
   specter of the bifurcated internet that Eric Schmidt—the former C.E.O.
   of Google’s parent company, Alphabet—and others have predicted. “I
   think the most likely scenario now is not a splintering,” Schmidt said
   last year, “but rather a bifurcation into a Chinese-led internet and a
   non-Chinese internet led by America.” China has already set 2025 as its
   target for technological independence. If it no longer sees the U.S. as
   a reliable partner, it is ever more likely to begin a push to
   manufacture all its products domestically. Such bifurcation could
   change the tech sphere as we know it, creating not only different
   digital universes for different populations (a censored Web in
   authoritarian China, and a free Web everywhere else), but different
   megalithic hardware companies, depending on the region.

   Tensions are already high between the countries over the Huawei
   dispute, but they’re likely to grow as the U.S. considers adding to the
   blacklist. Hikvision, the world’s largest manufacturer of video
   surveillance equipment and one of the companies that could fall under
   the axe, has faced bipartisan scrutiny in the U.S. over its role in the
   Chinese government’s use of artificial intelligence to track and
   control its minority Muslim population. But the move has drawn
   condemnation from Beijing, which is accusing the administration of
   “arbitrarily” hitting at Chinese industry to gain an upper hand in its
   trade war. “China opposes the United States’s practice of abusing state
   power and arbitrarily discrediting and suppressing foreign enterprises,
   including Chinese enterprises, Lu Kang, a spokesperson for the Chinese
   foreign ministry, said in a briefing Wednesday.
   Most Popular
     * News
       Trump’s Personal Assistant Is Leaving the White House
       By
       Tina Nguyen
     * News
       GOP Strategists Fear Trump’s “Pocahontas” Thing Isn’t Working
       By
       Tina Nguyen
     * News
       Mark Sanford Is Trump’s Next 2020 Republican Challenger
       By
       Kevin Fitzpatrick

   Read More
   Hive
   Report: Trump Wanted to Obliterate the U.S. Economy to Get Revenge on
   China
   By
   Bess Levin
   Hive
   Trump Blames Tariff Consequences on Companies Making “Excuses”
   By
   Kevin Fitzpatrick
   Hive
   Can Elizabeth Warren Pass the Blackjewel Test?
   By
   T.A. Frank
   Hive
   Aides Admit Trump Was Faking Those “Phone Calls” With China
   By
   Tina Nguyen

   The Hive

     *
     *
     *
     *
     *

   (BUTTON) More from Vanity Fair
     * Promotions
     * Newsletter
     * Subscribe
     * Digital Edition
     * Inside the Issue

   (BUTTON) Contact
     * Contact VF
     * Customer Service
     * Advertising
     * Careers

     * Condé Nast Store
     * Reprints / Permissions
     * VF Media Kit
     * Sitemap
     * Accessibility Help

   © 2019 Condé Nast. All rights reserved. Use of this site constitutes
   acceptance of our User Agreement (updated 5/25/18) and Privacy Policy
   and Cookie Statement (updated 5/25/18) and Your California Privacy
   Rights. Vanity Fair may earn a portion of sales from products that are
   purchased through our site as part of our Affiliate Partnerships with
   retailers. The material on this site may not be reproduced,
   distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the
   prior written permission of Condé Nast. Ad Choices

   CN Entertainment
   [United States]

   IFRAME: https://js-sec.indexww.com/um/ixmatch.html
   IFRAME: https://www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-KSG89LT

   Skip to main content
   (BUTTON) Open Navigation Menu

   Vanity Fair
   Sign In
     * Subscribe

   Search
     * HIVE
          + Business
          + Technology
          + Politics
          + The Players
     * HWD
          + Movies
          + Television
          + Awards
          + Reviews
     * VANITIES
          + Celebrity
          + Fashion
          + Beauty
          + Royals
     * COMPLETE ARCHIVE

   (BUTTON) Close Related Items Drawer
     * HWD

The Biggest Threat to Biden’s Campaign? “His Own Mouth,” Says Colbert
       By
       Laura Bradley
     * Vanities

Priyanka Chopra, Nicholas Braun, and Nicky Hilton Rothschild Kick Off Fashion
Week at Vanity Fair’s Best-Dressed List Party
       By
       Erin Vanderhoof
     * HWD

Is Richard Linklater Planning a Boyhood-Style Musical With Beanie Feldstein
and Ben Platt?
       By
       Yohana Desta
     * HWD

Colbert Presses Biden on His Gaffes: “Are You Going Nuts?”
       By
       Laura Bradley

   In Conversation

Jake Gyllenhaal Is Big on Exfoliation and Gary Shteyngart–Style Narcissism

   The actor, now on Broadway in the two-man show Sea Wall/A Life,
   reprises his role as the face of Calvin Klein Eternity for this month’s
   new eau de parfum. Not that he needs it. “I do believe in showering as
   a spiritual practice and a physical practice.”
   By
   Laura Regensdorf
   September 9, 2019
     *
     *
     *

   Jake Gyllenhaal
   By Taylor Jewell/Invision/AP/Shutterstock.
     *
     *
     *

   Jake Gyllenhaal thinks I’m hot. He said as much one afternoon this
   summer, while we were sitting at a two-top on the back patio of Lucali,
   the Brooklyn pizza joint with the perpetual mile-long wait list. (He’s
   a regular. The owner, Mark Iacono, had opened up early and was already
   churning out pies.) Or rather, the actor’s actual words were, “You
   might want to use that.” He was holding out a paper napkin with one
   hand, as the other pantomimed a fanning gesture. A pearlescent sweat
   mustache dotted my upper lip, and Gyllenhaal had apparently taken
   notice. Of my hotness.

   I peeled off my blazer, casting aside a flush of embarrassment. It was
   summer in the city, and a wood-fired oven was blazing inside. Besides,
   isn’t that what a perceptive actor is supposed to take in: the subtle
   discomfort of his wilting tablemate?

   In a way, that is what Gyllenhaal has been doing every night at the
   Hudson Theatre since the two-man Broadway show, Sea Wall/A Life, began
   previews in late July. It’s a diptych of grief stories: a gut punch of
   a monologue delivered by Tom Sturridge, followed by an antic solo turn
   by Gyllenhaal, who plays a thirty-something toggling between losing a
   dad and welcoming a son. (“I read somewhere that to be born is to risk
   death,” his character says, the weight of fatherhood looming.) But even
   on an empty stage, Gyllenhaal is hardly alone. “I have never done a
   show where I speak to the audience the entire time,” he says,
   describing an unusual cocoon of intimacy in the thousand-seat venue
   (four times what the production first counted when it ran Off-Broadway
   this past spring). “We don’t have any rules in our show. Whatever
   happens, happens.”

   Like what? “A phone goes off. A lot of actors would be
   like”—Gyllenhaal’s voice slides into mock effrontery—“ ‘How dare you
   destroy the sanctity of the sacred space of theater.’ “ He credits the
   director Carrie Cracknell with holding the two men to task. “Every time
   it felt like we were performing, she’d call us on bullshit, and so in
   that sense, the idea that we’re separate from the audience also feels
   like bullshit. If something happens that’s human—particularly when
   we’re talking about the mess of being human—it makes no sense to try
   and pretend like it doesn’t exist.” That’s why he comically apologizes,
   mid-play, as he wiggles past the front row. I wonder if he’s ever
   extended a tissue to a crying theatergoer. Or a perspiring one.

   But what brought us to Lucali (besides the promise of a good slice) was
   a different kind of role: Gyllenhaal as the face of Calvin Klein
   Eternity. In 2017 he played the family man in a Cary Fukunaga-directed
   commercial, opposite Liya Kebede and their fictional child. (The
   internet gushed about Gyllenhaal’s “hot dad” moment, but in reality
   he's the hot uncle to his sister Maggie's kids.) Now, Gyllenhaal is
   fronting a more intense eau de parfum version. Is it a bit like when a
   well-received show transfers to Broadway? “I’m totally willing to make
   that connection,” he said with a laugh—and totally willing to talk
   about cinematic scents, fictional narcissism, and his own preferred way
   to sweat.

   Vanity Fair: Fatherhood is a recurring theme, in the play and in that
   original Eternity campaign. Has your family been laying on the
   pressure?

   Jake Gyllenhaal: My dad in particular just was fascinated with the
   choice [of] being a father in an ad. He was like, “So what is this all
   about?” When the Calvin Klein team brought it up to me, what felt a lot
   more interesting was the idea of family, outside of selling a fragrance
   with sex. It was obviously the implication of sex because there was a
   child, but the child was a product of love. A lot of the roles I do are
   me asking myself questions, and I can’t separate—whether it be an
   advertisement or a movie—being honest from any of those things. And I
   love my nieces, I love sort of the idea of having my own child, so I
   wanted to explore that. I’m doing a show on Broadway that’s about being
   a son, being a father, and I think I’m at a place in my life where my
   parents are at a certain age and our positions start to change. My
   parents have made movies themselves, and my mom in particular was
   always asking questions about family and exploring that idea.
   Most Popular
     * Hollywood
       It: Chapter Two: Why Jessica Chastain Was Covered in 4,500 Gallons
       of Fake Blood
       By
       Paul Chi
     * Hollywood
       In Judy, Renée Zellweger Zooms Over the Rainbow
       By
       K. Austin Collins
     * Hollywood
       Adam Sandler Sparkles in the Safdie Brothers’ Uncut Gems
       By
       K. Austin Collins

   Advertisement

   I’m just in the middle of Sheila Heti’s Motherhood, and the book deals
   with the idea of being an artist or a mother, and whether one
   sublimates the other.

   Well, I watch someone like Stephen Sondheim, who I would say is the
   preeminent poet-lyricist of our time, particularly in musical
   theater—and he’s birthed child after child with his creations. I did
   one of his shows [Sunday in the Park with George], and the first act is
   about an artist’s being obsessed with their work and not being able to
   commit to their life. And then in the second act—this is my
   interpretation—is an artist who was well renowned, made a lot of money,
   but wasn’t, as my high school art history teacher said, a
   "meta-historical artist" that transcends decades and generations. And
   yet he discovers at the end of that show that making a family is his
   triumph. The only things we leave behind are children and art, and that
   is the never-ending question.

   Given the themes of Sea Wall/A Life, is there a lingering heaviness
   that you need to, say, exorcise in the bathtub at night?

   No. I’m a real wonderful mess, you know? I’ve learned to accept a lot
   about myself. I’ve put myself through a lot of weird physical things
   for roles I’ve done, emotional things for roles I’ve done. The other
   day Carrie [Cracknell, the director] was like, "Both of you looked
   wrecked at the end of that [Off-Broadway] run." And it’s interesting
   because I’ve never laughed so much in my life. Yet the energy you’re
   exchanging does take it from you. I do believe in showering as a
   spiritual practice and a physical practice. Since working in South
   Korea on a movie, I’ve found exfoliation to be a really wonderful, very
   manly thing, which I didn’t appreciate as much before.

   Clearly you’re invested in taking care of yourself. Are there things
   you do for wellness, and then things you call bullshit on?

   I think it’s all bullshit if you want it to be bullshit, and it’s not
   if you don’t. I feel that way about pretty much everything as long as
   you’re not hurting anyone. I believe in sweat, in whatever form. For
   me, my best form of self-care is intimacy; that makes me sweat. And
   then I believe in the balance of rest and exercise. It’s really that
   simple for me. Because I have an older sister who is an actor—and
   because she has taught me since I was a kid and I’ve looked up to
   her—skin care is important. People can definitely get me for that, but
   you’d be laughing your way to wherever. I think caring for yourself is
   really important, particularly nowadays as men. Being vulnerable and
   admitting those vulnerabilities is very, very important.

   Some actors use scent to help get into character. Have you ever done
   that, whether with forest-y scents or unshowered stink?

   I’ve used and tried it all. Nothing works. In the end, it’s all about
   good writing.

   On the flip side, John Waters gave the audience scratch-and-sniff
   Odorama cards for Polyester. If you could imagine a film of yours that
   deserves a scratch-and-sniff card, what would it be?

   I’m thinking of Zeffirelli’s Romeo and Juliet—what that
   scratch-and-sniff card would smell like, because if it smells the way
   that movie looks, my god. And Nightcrawler—new leather car smells. It
   has top notes of blood and fecal matter.

   John Waters would definitely approve.

   Yes, he would!

   Tell me about the upcoming adaptation of Gary Shteyngart's Lake
   Success. It seems like slipping into a character that narcissistic is
   perhaps less appealing than the father role for Eternity?
   Most Popular
     * Hollywood
       It: Chapter Two: Why Jessica Chastain Was Covered in 4,500 Gallons
       of Fake Blood
       By
       Paul Chi
     * Hollywood
       In Judy, Renée Zellweger Zooms Over the Rainbow
       By
       K. Austin Collins
     * Hollywood
       Adam Sandler Sparkles in the Safdie Brothers’ Uncut Gems
       By
       K. Austin Collins

   Advertisement

   I do want to try that on. In fact, I live in it all the time—we
   subscribe to it daily and hourly, minute by minute. I’m really
   fascinated to explore someone who is a narcissist and who is obsessed
   with capitalism and all the trappings around it. Is it possible to pull
   someone from that, into their humanness? Are we too far gone? Gary’s
   writing—that you love him and understand something about him even as
   you are disgusted—I just think that’s so human. We live in a world
   where there are a lot of black-and-whites, and the spectrum really
   doesn’t exist in many other spaces.

   You joined Instagram recently, and it's a similarly sanitized space.
   You don’t see a lot of the uncomfortable.

   I totally agree. In my world, there are a lot of people tailoring
   themselves and altering the beautiful parts of their personalities to
   show people something that is probably not fully true. I’ve done it for
   many years in different ways, and I think my desire to be a part of
   something like Instagram is just to say, "I am a part of everything
   with everyone." I don’t want to isolate myself in some idea of what an
   artist is supposed to be. If I’m interested in the unknown in my work,
   Instagram is an unknown to me. Why would I avoid it? And I’m
   discovering some interesting things! I say that with a wink. Curiosity
   is everything, and if we lose it, we’re fucked.

   Read More
   HWD
   A Close Look at The Irishman’s Younger-Looking, but Still World-Weary,
   Robert De Niro
   By
   Anthony Breznican
   HWD
   What a Kevin Feige Star Wars Movie Might Look Like
   By
   Anthony Breznican
   Hive
   Facebook May Be Getting Yet Another Antitrust Headache
   By
   Alison Durkee
   Hive
   “We Are Always Fucked”: Agita at New York Magazine as Pam Wasserstein
   Sells to Vox
   By
   Joe Pompeo

   Vanity Fair

     *
     *
     *
     *
     *

   (BUTTON) More from Vanity Fair
     * Promotions
     * Newsletter
     * Subscribe
     * Digital Edition
     * Inside the Issue

   (BUTTON) Contact
     * Contact VF
     * Customer Service
     * Advertising
     * Careers

     * Condé Nast Store
     * Reprints / Permissions
     * VF Media Kit
     * Sitemap
     * Accessibility Help

   © 2019 Condé Nast. All rights reserved. Use of this site constitutes
   acceptance of our User Agreement (updated 5/25/18) and Privacy Policy
   and Cookie Statement (updated 5/25/18) and Your California Privacy
   Rights. Vanity Fair may earn a portion of sales from products that are
   purchased through our site as part of our Affiliate Partnerships with
   retailers. The material on this site may not be reproduced,
   distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the
   prior written permission of Condé Nast. Ad Choices

   CN Entertainment
   [United States]

   IFRAME: https://js-sec.indexww.com/um/ixmatch.html
   IFRAME: https://www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-KSG89LT

   Skip to main content
   (BUTTON) Open Navigation Menu

   Vanity Fair
   Sign In
     * Subscribe

   Search
     * HIVE
          + Business
          + Technology
          + Politics
          + The Players
     * HWD
          + Movies
          + Television
          + Awards
          + Reviews
     * VANITIES
          + Celebrity
          + Fashion
          + Beauty
          + Royals
     * COMPLETE ARCHIVE

   (BUTTON) Close Related Items Drawer
     * Prince Harry and the Queen Dropped the SocialMedia Mic on Barack
       and
       Star Wars

Prince William and Prince Harry May Be Stormtroopers in the Next Star Wars
Movie
       By
       Josh Duboff
     * PRINCESS PRIDE Princesses Elizabeth and Margaret and their corgis
       in the Welsh Cottage of Royal Lodge.
       FROM THE MAGAZINE

A Royal Family Friend Recalls the Bond Between Queen Elizabeth and Her Sister
       By
       Reinaldo Herrera
     * Prince Harry and the Queen Dropped the SocialMedia Mic on Barack
       and
       The Queen Turns 90

Why Queen Elizabeth Has Two Different Birthdays
       By
       Josh Duboff
     * Vanities

The Queen’s Staff Is “Cock-a-Hoop” Over a Long-Awaited Raise
       By
       Erin Vanderhoof

   Royal Watch

Prince Harry and the Queen Dropped the Social-Media Mic on Barack and
Michelle Obama

   “Boom, really, please.”
   By
   Katie Nicholl
   April 29, 2016
     *
     *
     *

     *
     *
     *

     https://twitter.com/KensingtonRoyal/status/726062251354914817

   It’s not the first time the Queen has shown the world she has a sense
   of humor, but it’s definitely one of the funniest moments we can
   recall. In a video destined to go viral, Prince Harry convinced his
   grandmother to watch a message from the president and First Lady ahead
   of the much anticipated Invictus Games in Orlando—on camera!

   In what has been dubbed a “Prince Harry Production” by Kensington
   Palace, the prince arranged for the cameras to be allowed into Windsor
   Castle last Wednesday, and, being the good sport that she is, the Queen
   agreed. Harry and his 90-year-old grandmother were filmed in a sitting
   room at Windsor Castle looking through the Invictus Games brochure when
   Harry’s iPhone goes off.

   As a message from Michelle Obama pops onto his screen, the Queen, in a
   cardigan and pearls, leans in for a better look. The Obamas, who last
   week visited the Queen at Windsor Castle for lunch, ping into view.

   “Hey Prince Harry,” says a stern looking Michelle, arms crossed
   standing next to her husband. “Remember when you told us to bring it at
   the Invictus Games?”

   “Careful what you wish for,” interjects the president waving his finger
   as a team of serviceman joke around in the background and one says
   “boom.”

   “Boom, really, please,” remarks the Queen, deadpan.   Yes, it’s
   definitely Her Majesty and, yes, it’s almost as good as the time the
   Queen allowed James Bond (a.k.a. Daniel Craig) into Buckingham Palace
   to film a secret cameo for the Olympics Opening ceremony.
   Prince Harry and the Queen Dropped the SocialMedia Mic on Barack and

   We can’t stop playing it. And it’s great to see Prince Harry on
   Twitter. The prince has said he isn’t a fan, but perhaps he’ll be as
   hooked as the rest of the world now he’s sent his first tweet.
   Most Popular
     * Prince Harry and the Queen Dropped the SocialMedia Mic on Barack
       and
       Star Wars
       Prince William and Prince Harry May Be Stormtroopers in the Next
       Star Wars Movie
       By
       Josh Duboff
     * PRINCESS PRIDE Princesses Elizabeth and Margaret and their corgis
       in the Welsh Cottage of Royal Lodge.
       FROM THE MAGAZINE
       A Royal Family Friend Recalls the Bond Between Queen Elizabeth and
       Her Sister
       By
       Reinaldo Herrera
     * Prince Harry and the Queen Dropped the SocialMedia Mic on Barack
       and
       The Queen Turns 90
       Why Queen Elizabeth Has Two Different Birthdays
       By
       Josh Duboff

   Read More
   Prince Harry and the Queen Dropped the SocialMedia Mic on Barack and
   Star Wars
   Prince William and Prince Harry May Be Stormtroopers in the Next Star
   Wars Movie
   By
   Josh Duboff
   PRINCESS PRIDE Princesses Elizabeth and Margaret and their corgis in
   the Welsh Cottage of Royal Lodge.
   FROM THE MAGAZINE
   A Royal Family Friend Recalls the Bond Between Queen Elizabeth and Her
   Sister
   By
   Reinaldo Herrera
   Prince Harry and the Queen Dropped the SocialMedia Mic on Barack and
   The Queen Turns 90
   Why Queen Elizabeth Has Two Different Birthdays
   By
   Josh Duboff
   HWD
   A Close Look at The Irishman’s Younger-Looking, but Still World-Weary,
   Robert De Niro
   By
   Anthony Breznican

   Vanity Fair

     *
     *
     *
     *
     *

   (BUTTON) More from Vanity Fair
     * Promotions
     * Newsletter
     * Subscribe
     * Digital Edition
     * Inside the Issue

   (BUTTON) Contact
     * Contact VF
     * Customer Service
     * Advertising
     * Careers

     * Condé Nast Store
     * Reprints / Permissions
     * VF Media Kit
     * Sitemap
     * Accessibility Help

   © 2019 Condé Nast. All rights reserved. Use of this site constitutes
   acceptance of our User Agreement (updated 5/25/18) and Privacy Policy
   and Cookie Statement (updated 5/25/18) and Your California Privacy
   Rights. Vanity Fair may earn a portion of sales from products that are
   purchased through our site as part of our Affiliate Partnerships with
   retailers. The material on this site may not be reproduced,
   distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the
   prior written permission of Condé Nast. Ad Choices

   CN Entertainment
   [United States]

   IFRAME: https://js-sec.indexww.com/um/ixmatch.html
    ____________________
     * HIVE
     * HWD
     * VANITIES
     * COMPLETE ARCHIVE

     * Sign In
     * Newsletter
     * Video
     * VF Store
     * Magazine

   (BUTTON)

   Cover Story
   Hollywood

Star Wars: The Rise of Skywalker, The Ultimate Preview

After four decades, Star Wars is drawing to its epic conclusion. Lev Grossman
goes behind the scenes with director J.J. Abrams and the cast for the inside
scoop on The Rise of Skywalker. With exclusive photographs by Annie
Leibovitz.


    Lev Grossman


    Annie Leibovitz

   May 22, 2019 8:15 AM
   SHOOTING STARS
   Director J. J. Abrams sets up a shot of Daisy Ridley (Rey) in Jordan’s
   Wadi Rum desert, the setting for the planet Pasaana. In the desert,
   says Abrams, “there’s something about the way the sand interacts with
   the light.”
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.

   There’s a desert valley in southern Jordan called Wadi Rum, or
   sometimes “the Valley of the Moon.” There are stone inscriptions in
   Wadi Rum that are more than 2,000 years old. Lawrence of Arabia passed
   through there during the Arab Revolt against the Ottoman Empire. More
   recently, J. J. Abrams went there to film parts of the latest Star Wars
   movie, The Rise of Skywalker, because it’s largely uninhabited and
   starkly beautiful and looks plausibly alien, and one of the things that
   has always made the Star Wars movies feel so real—as if they had a real
   life of their own that continues on out beyond the edges of the
   screen—is the way they’re shot on location, with as few digital effects
   as possible. George Lucas shot the Tatooine scenes from A New Hope in
   southern Tunisia. For Skywalker, it’s Wadi Rum.

   They don’t do it that way because it’s easy. Abrams and his crew had to
   build miles of road into the desert. They basically had to set up a
   small town out there, populated by the cast and extras and crew—the
   creature-effects department alone had 70 people. The Jordanian military
   got involved. The Jordanian royal family got involved. There was sand.
   There were sandstorms, when all you could do was take cover and huddle
   in your tent and—if you’re John Boyega, who plays the ex-Stormtrooper
   Finn—listen to reggae.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.

   But in a way that’s the whole point: you’re out there so the world can
   get up in your grill and make its presence felt on film. “It’s the
   things that you can’t anticipate—the imperfections,” says Oscar Isaac,
   who plays the Resistance pilot Poe Dameron. “It’s very difficult to
   design imperfection, and the imperfections that you have in these
   environments immediately create a sense of authenticity. You just
   believe it more.” When Isaac arrived in Wadi Rum for his first week of
   shooting, Abrams had set up a massive greenscreen in the middle of the
   desert. “And I was like, ‘J. J., can I ask you a question? I notice
   we’re shooting on greenscreen.’ And he’s like, ‘So why the hell are we
   in the desert?’ And I’m like, ‘Yeah!’ And he said, ‘Well, because look:
   the way that the sand interacts with the light, and the type of shots
   you would set up—if you were designing the shot on a computer you would
   never even think to do that.’ There’s something about the way that the
   light and the environment and everything plays together.” It’s that
   something, the presence and the details and the analog imperfections of
   a real nondigital place, that makes Star Wars so powerful.

   It was powerful enough to bring 65,000 people to Chicago in April for
   Star Wars Celebration, a fan convention where you could see a giant
   Stormtrooper head made out of 36,440 tiny Lego Stormtrooper
   mini-figures, which is a world record of some kind, though I’m not sure
   exactly what, and where people were dressed up as Muppets who were
   themselves dressed up as Star Wars characters. But the main event was
   the launch of the trailer for The Rise of Skywalker, which was held in
   a 10,000-seat arena and was such a big deal that even though the
   trailer was going to be released on the Internet literally seconds
   after it was over, I—an at least theoretically respectable member of
   the media—was not only tagged, wristbanded, escorted, and
   metal-detected, but sniffed by a K-9 unit before I could go in.

   I sat down with Abrams a couple of hours later. For the occasion, he
   was wearing a suit so black and sharp, he could have been doing Men in
   Black cosplay, but his most distinctive feature is his dark curly hair,
   which is upswept in a way that is only slightly suggestive of devil
   horns. Abrams talks rapidly, as if he can barely keep up with the
   things his racing brain is telling him to say. When I told him that not
   only was Star Wars the No. 1 trending topic on Twitter, but that all 10
   of the Top 10 trending topics were Star Wars–related, and that he
   personally was No. 5, he was visibly stunned.

   Then he recovered enough to say: “Well, I aspire to No. 4.” (For the
   record, No. 4 was the late Supreme Leader Snoke, who frankly did seem
   beatable. If you’re curious, No. 11 was pro golfer Zach Johnson, who
   had just accidentally hit his ball with a practice swing at the
   Masters. Life goes on.)
   J.J. Abrams, alongside Stunt Coordinator Eunice Huthart, directs the
   Knights of Ren; elite fearsome enforcers of Kylo Ren’s dark will.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.

   Disney executives talk about how important it is to “event-ize” Star
   Wars movies; i.e., to make them feel not just like movies but like
   seriously momentous occasions. They won’t have much trouble with this
   one: The Rise of Skywalker isn’t just the last movie in the Star Wars
   trilogy that began in 2015 with The Force Awakens; it’s the last movie
   in a literal, actual trilogy of trilogies that started with the very
   first Star Wars movie back in 1977, which began the saga of the
   Skywalker family. The Rise of Skywalker will finally, after 42 years,
   bring that saga to an end.
   FIRST LOOK
   Vanity Fair reveals Keri Russell as the masked scoundrel Zorri Bliss,
   seen in the Thieves’ Quarter of the snow-dusted world Kijimi.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.

   We all thought the story was over in 1983 with Return of the Jedi, and
   then we really thought it was over in 2005 with Revenge of the Sith.
   But Star Wars has always been an unruly beast, too big and powerful
   (and profitable) to be contained in one movie, or even in a trilogy, or
   even in two trilogies, let alone numberless novels, TV shows, comics,
   video games, Happy Meals, and so on. Now Abrams has to gather all those
   threads and bring closure to a story that was started by somebody else,
   in an America that feels a very long time ago indeed. “That’s the
   challenge of this movie,” Abrams says. “It wasn’t just to make one film
   that as a stand-alone experience would be thrilling, and scary, and
   emotional, and funny, but one that if you were to watch all nine of the
   films, you’d feel like, Well, of course—that!”

   Like a lot of things that we now can’t imagine life without, Star Wars
   came really close to never happening in the first place. In 1971, Lucas
   was a serious young auteur just five years out of film school at U.S.C.
   He had only one full-length movie on his résumé, and that was THX 1138,
   which is the kind of visionary but grindingly earnest science-fiction
   epic that only the French could love. (They were pretty much the only
   ones who did.) Everybody expected Lucas to go on and make serious,
   gritty 1970s cinema like his peers, Brian De Palma and Francis Ford
   Coppola. At the time Lucas and Coppola were actively planning a radical
   epic set in Vietnam with the provocative title Apocalypse Now.
   FORCE MAJEURE
   First Order leaders General Hux (Domhnall Gleeson) and Allegiant
   General Pryde (Richard E. Grant) on the bridge of Kylo Ren’s destroyer.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.

   But Coppola would have to finish that one on his own, because Lucas
   went a different way. “I had decided there was no modern mythology,” he
   said in 1997. “I wanted to take old myths and put them into a new
   format that young people could relate to. Mythology always existed in
   unusual, unknown environments, so I chose space.” Lucas tried to
   acquire the rights to Flash Gordon (that would’ve been a dark timeline
   indeed), but when he couldn’t, he came up with his own original
   science-fictional epic instead. He called it The Star Wars. Like The
   Facebook, it would have to shed a direct article on its way to glory.

   Even though American Graffiti had made Lucas a bankable director, Star
   Wars still came together slowly. In the first draft, Luke was an old
   man, Leia was 14, and Han Solo was “a huge green-skinned monster with
   no nose and large gills.” Fox executives were baffled by Star Wars, and
   they squeezed Lucas relentlessly for time and money. We forget now how
   jerry-rigged the first movie was: the cantina aliens weren’t finished,
   and the monumental Star Destroyer that dominates the opening shot is,
   in reality, about three feet long. The Death Star interior is basically
   one set re-arranged several different ways. To make Greedo’s mouth
   move, the woman in the Greedo suit had to hold a clothespin in her
   mouth. “What I remember about working on the first film,” says John
   Williams, the legendary soundtrack composer, “is the fact that I didn’t
   ever think there would be a second film.” (He also, like everybody
   else, thought Luke and Leia were going to get together, so he wrote
   them a love theme.)

   But wherever real mythology comes from, Lucas had gone there and
   brought something back alive. People wanted movies that gave them
   something to believe in instead of relentlessly autopsying the beliefs
   that had failed them. We’d had enough of antiheroes. We needed some
   anti-antiheroes. “I realized after THX that people don’t care about how
   the country’s being ruined,” Lucas said. “We’ve got to regenerate
   optimism.” Like American Graffiti, Star Wars is a work of profound
   nostalgia, a post-Vietnam, post-Watergate anthem of longing for the
   restoration of a true and just power in the universe—the return of the
   king. And at the same time it’s a very personal hero’s journey, about a
   boy who must put right the sins of his father and master the strange
   power he finds within himself, and in doing so become a man.

   Star Wars is also an incredibly enduring vision of what it’s like to
   live in a world of super-advanced technology. Science fiction often
   ages badly, turning into kitsch or camp—just look at Flash Gordon—but
   Star Wars hasn’t. More than any filmmaker before him, Lucas
   successfully imagined what a science-fictional world would feel like to
   somebody who was actually inside it—which is to say, it would look as
   ordinary and workaday as the present. He even shot it like it was real,
   working close-in and mostly eschewing wide establishing shots, more
   like a documentary or a newsreel than a space opera. “It feels very
   grounded,” says Naomi Ackie, who’s making her Star Wars debut in
   Skywalker playing a character named Jannah, about whom she is allowed
   to say literally nothing. “There’s the kind of spectacular-ness, and
   the supernatural move-things-with-your-mind magic stuff, but then
   there’s also this really grounded, rugged nature where everything is
   distressed and old and kind of worn out and lived-in. And I think
   playing with those two ideas means that you get this feeling that it
   could almost be real. Like, in a galaxy far away, it could almost be
   the case that you could have this.”

   When Lucas made the first Star Wars sequel, The Empire Strikes Back, he
   cheekily labeled it Episode V, then went back and re-labeled the first
   movie as Episode IV, as if the movies were an old-fashioned serial that
   the rest of us were all just tuning in to. Around that time, he also
   started talking about Star Wars as a nine-part epic—so in 2012, when
   Lucas retired and sold Lucasfilm to Disney, it wasn’t exactly heresy
   that Disney announced more movies. At the time, Kathleen Kennedy had
   just been named co-chairperson of Lucasfilm, and she tapped Abrams to
   direct the first Disney-owned post-Lucas Star Wars movie. It was a bit
   like saying, Make the lightning strike again, please. Exactly here, if
   you could. Oh, and could you also earn back that $4 billion we just
   spent to buy Lucasfilm? (Narrator voice: He could.)

   At first blush, Abrams’s debut Star Wars movie, The Force Awakens,
   looked like an elaborate homage to the original. Just like in A New
   Hope, there’s a young Force-sensitive person on a poor desert
   planet—that’s Rey, played by Daisy Ridley—who finds a droid with a
   secret message that’s vital to the Rebellion (or wait, sorry, it’s the
   Resistance now). There’s a villain in a black mask, just like Darth
   Vader, except that it’s his grandson Kylo Ren (Adam Driver), né Ben
   Solo, son of Han and Leia. Kylo has a planet-killing weapon, much like
   the Death Star but way bigger, which becomes the target of a desperate
   attack by Resistance X-wings. There’s even a bar full of aliens.

     “This trilogy is about this young generation, this new generation,
     having to deal with all the debt that has come before.”

   Abrams also insisted on keeping to the analog aesthetic of the original
   trilogy: those aliens had to be latex and yak hair, not bits and bytes,
   and everything possible was shot on location using film cameras, not
   digital ones. Even Lucas had abandoned that approach by the time he
   made the second Star Wars trilogy, but many fans consider those movies
   to be a cautionary tale. “Famously, the prequels were mostly
   greenscreen environments,” Abrams says. “And that was George himself
   doing that, and it ended up looking exactly how he wanted it to
   look—and I always preferred the look of the original movies, because I
   just remember when you’re in the snow on Hoth, when you’re in the
   desert on Tatooine, and when you’re in the forests of Endor—it’s
   amazing. If you put a vaporator here, there, all of a sudden almost any
   natural location suddenly becomes a Star Wars location.”

   But the more interesting thing about The Force Awakens and its
   successor, The Last Jedi, written and directed by Rian Johnson, was how
   they subtly complicated Lucas’s vision. Thirty years have gone by since
   the ending of Return of the Jedi, during which time the newly reborn
   Republic became complacent and politically stagnant, allowing the rise
   of the reactionary neo-imperial First Order, whose origins we will
   learn more about in Skywalker. “It was almost like if the Argentine
   Nazis had sort of got together and actually started to bring that back
   in some real form,” Abrams says. Just like that, the rules of the Star
   Wars universe changed. It wasn’t all over when the Ewoks sang. Obi-Wan
   Kenobi and all those Bothans had died in vain. Even Han and Leia split
   up. It’s all a little less of a fairy tale now.

   The feather-haired godling Luke suffered the trauma of having a Padawan
   go bad on his watch. It’s an echo of what happened to his old mentor,
   Obi-Wan, with Anakin Skywalker, who became Darth Vader. But where
   Obi-Wan made peace with it, waiting serenely in the desert of Tatooine
   for the next Chosen One to arrive, Luke’s guilt curdled into shame. He
   hid himself away, so that his Chosen One, Rey, had to spend most of The
   Force Awakens searching for him, and then another whole movie
   convincing him with the help of Yoda’s Force ghost to keep the Jedi
   Order going at all. Star Wars arrived as an antidote to the
   disillusionment of the 1970s—but now, in its middle age, Star Wars is
   grappling with disillusionment of its own.
   DESERT POWER
   Joonas Suotamo (Chewbacca), Ridley, Anthony Daniels (C-3PO), and John
   Boyega (Finn) await the call to action for a chase scene.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.

   By dint of advanced Sith interrogation techniques, I was able to obtain
   valuable advance information about The Rise of Skywalker. Here it is:
   common emblem.

   Anthony Daniels, who plays C-3P0, is the only actor who has appeared in
   all nine movies of the Star Wars triple trilogy, so if anybody’s
   entitled to leak, it’s him. Daniels says he loved the script for The
   Rise of Skywalker, but he didn’t get it until the last minute, right
   before shooting started, and for some reason he just couldn’t memorize
   his part. “My first line would not go in my head!” he says. In person
   Daniels is like a C-3P0 whose preferences have been reset to charming
   and voluble. “The line that I couldn’t say was two words: ‘common
   emblem.’ Common emblem, common emblem—I would say them thousands of
   times. My wife would say it back. I just couldn’t say them!”

   Fortunately C-3P0’s mouth doesn’t move, so he could add the line in
   postproduction. Anyway, there’s the big scoop: “common emblem.” I don’t
   know what it means either. (Also I 100 percent guarantee that they will
   change the line before the movie comes out so that this scoop will end
   up being fake news.) Daniels also told me that C-3P0 does something in
   this movie that surprises everybody—but he wouldn’t say what. “He keeps
   his clothes on. It’s not like he suddenly does this thing, but …”

   The only other member of the old guard on the set this time was Billy
   Dee Williams, who plays the charismatic Lando Calrissian. At 82,
   Williams has lost none of his roguish charm, but now it comes wrapped
   in a kind of magisterial dignity. People tend to remember Lando for the
   deal he cut with Vader in The Empire Strikes Back, rather than for his
   redemptive comeback in Return of the Jedi, and Williams appears to have
   spent the last 45 years defending him. “He’s a survivor. It’s
   expediency for him,” Williams says. “You know, he was thrown into a
   situation which he didn’t look for and he had to try to figure out how
   to deal with an entity which is more than just a human.” And, he adds,
   with the weary air of somebody who has spent way too much time
   justifying the behavior of a fictional character, “nobody died!”
   HOT TAKE
   Members of the crew shade and shine Daniels, the only cast member to
   appear in all nine of the Skywalker films, while BB-8 looks on.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.

   Chewbacca is still here, too, but it’s not the same man in the suit.
   The original actor was Peter Mayhew, a seven-foot-three-inch gentle
   giant who was working as a hospital orderly in London when Lucas cast
   him in the first movie. Mayhew retired after The Force Awakens, and he
   died on April 30 at 74. His replacement is Joonas Suotamo, a
   fresh-faced former professional basketball player from Finland who
   always wanted to be an actor but was hard to cast because he’s six feet
   11 inches tall. “When I first met [Mayhew] he told me I was a wee bit
   too skinny,” Suotamo says. “But we also had a Wookiee boot camp, which
   lasted for a week. He told me all kinds of things about the moves that
   Chewbacca does, how they came to be and his reasoning behind them.”
   Suotamo has now played Chewbacca in four movies and enjoys it about as
   much as I’ve ever seen anybody enjoy anything. “It’s very much like
   silent-era film, with Buster Keaton and Charlie Chaplin,” he says.
   “He’s a mime character and that’s what he does, and I guess in that
   minimalism comes the beauty of the character.”

   Other things we know about Skywalker: We can safely assume that the
   Resistance and the First Order are headed toward a final smash, which
   will be a heavy lift for the good guys because, at the end of The Last
   Jedi, the Resistance was down, way down, to a double handful of
   survivors. They’ll face a First Order who suffered a stinging but
   largely symbolic loss at the Battle of Crait, and who, I feel
   confident, have learned something from the previous eight movies. The
   Empire built and lost two Death Stars. The First Order has already lost
   one super-weapon in The Force Awakens. Presumably it won’t make the
   same mistake twice, twice.

   But the stakes go even higher than that, cosmically high. Sources close
   to the movie say that Skywalker will at long last bring to a climax the
   millennia-long conflict between the Jedi Order and its dark shadow, the
   Sith.
   HORSING AROUND
   Finn and new ally Jannah (Naomi Ackie), atop hardy orbaks, lead the
   charge against the mechanized forces of the First Order. “It’s
   extremely surreal to be in it,” says Ackie, “and see how it works from
   the inside.”
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.
   STAR CROSSED
   Kylo Ren (Adam Driver) and Rey battle it out with lightsabers in a
   stormy confrontation. Their Force-connection—what Driver calls their
   “maybe-bond”—will turn out to run even deeper than previously revealed.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.

   The hottest area for speculation, however, is the identity of the
   titular Skywalker, because at this point there aren’t many Skywalkers
   left to rise. One is General Organa, the former Princess Leia, Luke’s
   sister—but Carrie Fisher, who plays her, passed away in 2016. That was
   a deeply painful loss for Abrams personally, but it also presented him
   with an impossible choice as a filmmaker. He needed Leia to tell the
   story, but Abrams didn’t feel like a digital Carrie Fisher could do the
   job, and there was no way Lucasfilm was going to re-cast the role.

   But then a strange thing happened. Abrams remembered that there was
   some footage of Fisher left over from The Force Awakens, scenes that
   had been changed or cut entirely, and he dug them up. “It’s hard to
   even talk about it without sounding like I’m being some kind of cosmic
   spiritual goofball,” Abrams says, “but it felt like we suddenly had
   found the impossible answer to the impossible question.” He started to
   write scenes around the old footage, fitting Leia’s dialogue into new
   contexts. He re-created the lighting to match the way Fisher had been
   lit. Bit by bit, she found her place in the new movie. “It was a
   bizarre kind of left side/right side of the brain sort of Venn diagram
   thing, of figuring out how to create the puzzle based on the pieces we
   had.” Fisher’s daughter, Billie Lourd, appears in the movies as a
   Resistance officer named Lieutenant Connix, and at first Abrams
   deliberately wrote her out of the scenes in case it was too painful—but
   Lourd said no, she wanted to be in them. “And so, there are moments
   where they’re talking; there are moments where they’re touching,”
   Abrams says. “There are moments in this movie where Carrie is there,
   and I really do feel there is an element of the uncanny, spiritual, you
   know, classic Carrie, that it would have happened this way, because
   somehow it worked. And I never thought it would.”

   The only other member of the surviving Skywalker bloodline—that we know
   of!—is Leia’s son and Luke’s former Padawan, the fallen Jedi Kylo Ren.
   Kylo probably isn’t capable of actual happiness, but things are
   definitely looking up for him: by the end of The Last Jedi he has taken
   control of the First Order and killed or at least outlived his actual
   father and both of his symbolic fathers-in-art, Luke and Supreme Leader
   Snoke. Sources at Disney also confirm that his long-rumored Knights of
   Ren will finally arrive in Skywalker. “And then he had been forging
   this maybe-bond with Rey,” Driver says, “and it kind of ends with the
   question in the air: is he going to pursue that relationship, or when
   the door of her ship goes up, does that also close that camaraderie
   that they were maybe forming?”
   SANDBLAST
   Camera operator Colin Anderson readies a take for a chase sequence
   spotlighting the heroics of Chewbacca, BB-8, and Rey.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.

   Darkness in the Star Wars movies tends to come from fear: for Anakin
   Skywalker, Kylo’s grandfather, it was his fear of losing his mother and
   his wife. After two movies it’s still not so easy to say exactly what
   Kylo Ren himself fears, even though he’s as operatically emo as Vader
   was stoic. He’s fixated on the past—he made a shrine to his own
   grandfather—but at the same time the past torments him. “Let the past
   die,” he tells Rey in The Last Jedi. “Kill it, if you have to. That’s
   the only way to become what you are meant to be.”

   Presumably whatever’s eating at Kylo started in his childhood: maybe
   being the kid of literally the two coolest people in the galaxy isn’t
   as fun as it sounds. Driver—who has obviously thought this through with
   a lot of rigor—points out that, as cool as they are, Han and Leia are
   both obsessively committed to lifestyles (smuggling, rebelling) that
   don’t leave much room for kids. He also points out that, unlike Luke
   and Rey, Kylo never got to go on a nifty voyage of self-discovery.
   Instead he grew up under the crushing pressure of massive expectations.
   “How do you form friendships out of that?” Driver says. “How do you
   understand the weight of that? And if there’s no one around you guiding
   you, or articulating things the right way … it can easily go awry.” By
   the emotional logic that governs the Star Wars universe—and also our
   own—Kylo Ren is going to have to confront the past, and his fears,
   whatever they are, or be destroyed by them.

   Where Lucas’s trilogies tended to follow the roots and branches of the
   Skywalker family tree—their personal saga was the saga of the galaxy
   writ small—the new movies have a slightly wider aperture and take in a
   new generation of heroes. There’s Rey, of course, who sources say will
   have progressed in her training since the end of The Last Jedi to the
   point where it’s almost complete. With that taken care of, all she has
   to do is reconstitute the entire Jedi Order from scratch, because as
   far as we know she’s the Last One.

   If Kylo Ren can’t be redeemed it will almost certainly fall to Rey to
   put him down, in spite of their maybe-bond. Their relationship is the
   closest thing the new trilogy has to a star-crossed love story on the
   order of Han and Leia: a source close to the movie says that their
   Force-connection will turn out to run even deeper than we thought.
   They’re uniquely suited to understand each other, but at the same time
   they are in every way each other’s inverse, down to Kylo’s perverse
   rejection of his family, which is the one thing Rey craves most. “I
   think there’s a part of Rey that’s like, dude, you fucking had it all,
   you had it all,” Ridley says. “That was always a big question during
   filming: you had it all and you let it go.”
   PUNCH IT!
   In a historic reunion, Lando Calrissian (Billy Dee Williams) retakes
   the helm of the Millennium Falcon, joined by Poe Dameron (Oscar Isaac),
   Chewbacca, D-O, and BB-8. “He’s a survivor,” Williams says of Lando.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.

   Rey is also, according to totally unsubstantiated Internet theories, a
   leading candidate to be the Skywalker of the title, pending some kind
   of head-snapping reveal about her ancestry. (For the record, the other
   leading unsubstantiated Internet theory has the “Skywalker” of the
   title referring to an entirely new order of Force users who will rise
   up and replace the Jedi.)

   Rey seems ready for it all, or as ready as anybody could be. “It’s nice
   having that shot at the beginning of the teaser,” Ridley says, over
   avocado toast at a fancy Chicago hotel, “because I think it’s quite a
   good visual representation of where she is now: confident, calm, less
   fearful.… It’s still sort of overwhelming, but in a different way. It
   feels more right—less like inevitable and more like there’s a focus to
   the journey.” Focus is a good word for Rey: on-screen Ridley’s dramatic
   eyebrows form a wickedly sharp arrow of concentration. I asked Ridley
   what she’s thinking about when Rey is using her Force powers, and it
   turns out Rey seems focused because Ridley is actually seriously
   focused. “I literally visualize it. When I was lifting rocks I was
   visualizing the rocks moving. And then I was like, Oh, my God, I made
   it happen! And obviously there’s loads of rocks on strings, so, no, I
   didn’t. But I visualize that it’s really going on.” (That scene, which
   comes at the end of The Last Jedi, is another example of classic
   nondigital Star Wars effects: those were real rocks. “It was actually
   really amazing,” Ridley says. “It was sort of like a baby mobile.”)

   There’s also Finn, the apostate Stormtrooper, played by the
   irrepressible Boyega, who in person practically vibrates with energy
   and speaks with a South London accent very different from Finn’s
   American one. In some ways Finn has gone through a complete character
   arc already: he confronted his past—by beating down his old boss,
   Captain Phasma—and found his courage and his moral center. He has had a
   tendency to panic, if not actively desert, in clutch situations, but at
   the Battle of Crait he proved that he was past that. “I think he’s just
   an active member of the Resistance now,” Boyega says. “Episode Eight,
   he couldn’t decide what team he was fighting for. But since then he’s
   made a clear decision.” (Cast members tend to refer to the Star Wars
   movies by their episode numbers: four is the original movie, seven is
   The Force Awakens, and so on.)

   Finn still has to make a clear decision about his romantic situation,
   though. As Boyega put it at Star Wars Celebration: “Finn is single and
   willing to mingle!” The movies have been teasing his emotional
   connections with both Rey and the Resistance mechanic Rose Tico, played
   by Kelly Marie Tran, with whom he shared a fleeting battlefield kiss in
   The Last Jedi. Rose seems like the more positive choice, given that she
   stops Finn from deserting early in the movie and saves his life at the
   Battle of Crait, and that the precedents for romantic involvements with
   Jedi are extremely bad. Tran is the first Asian-American woman to play
   a major role in a Star Wars movie, and she has been the target of both
   racist and sexist attacks online. But she has come through them as a
   fan favorite: when she appeared onstage in Chicago, she got a standing
   ovation.

   Finally there’s Poe, who has mostly struggled with his own cocky
   impulsiveness, because he’s a
   loose-cannon-who-just-can’t-play-by-the-rules. Poe will have to step up
   and become a leader, because the Resistance is seriously short on
   officer material. In fact, some of that transformation will already
   have happened where The Rise of Skywalker picks up, which is about a
   year after the end of The Last Jedi. “There has been a bit of shared
   history that you haven’t seen,” Isaac says. “Whereas in the other
   films, Poe is this kind of lone wolf, now he’s really part of a group.
   They’re going out and going on missions and have a much more familiar
   dynamic now.” Star Wars has always been about friendship as much as it
   is about romance, and as of the end of The Last Jedi, Rey, Finn, and
   Poe are all finally in the same place for the first time since The
   Force Awakens.

   The Rise of Skywalker introduces some new players, too. There’s a tiny
   one-wheeled droid called D-O and a large banana-slug alien named Klaud.
   Oh, and Naomi Ackie, Keri Russell, and Richard E. Grant have all joined
   the cast, though, again, we know practically nothing about who they’re
   playing. Going from being outside the Star Wars leviathan to being
   right in its belly can be a dizzying experience for a first-timer. “I
   actually tried to do this thing while we were filming,” Ackie says,
   “where I’d go one day, walking through London without seeing a Star
   Wars reference somewhere. And you can’t do it. You really can’t. So
   it’s extremely surreal to be in it and see how it works from the
   inside.”
   WELL MET
   Jordanian locals play the Aki-Aki, natives of the planet Pasaana.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.

   If anything, Star Wars is only getting more omnipresent. The franchise
   under Lucas was a colossus, but he still ran it essentially as a
   private concern. He could make movies or not, as his muse dictated—he
   was beholden to no shareholders. But Star Wars under Disney makes the
   old Star Wars look positively quaint. Between 1977 and 2005, Lucasfilm
   released six Star Wars movies; when Skywalker premieres in December,
   Disney will have released five Star Wars movies in five years. “I think
   there is a larger expectation that Disney has,” Kennedy says. “On the
   other hand, though, I think that Disney is very respectful of what this
   is, and right from the beginning we talked about the fragility of this
   form of storytelling. Because it’s something that means so much to fans
   that you can’t turn this into some kind of factory approach. You can’t
   even do what Marvel does, necessarily, where you pick characters and
   build new franchises around those characters. This needs to evolve
   differently.”

   A useful example of that fragility might be the relatively modest
   performance of Solo: A Star Wars Story in 2018. Solo was a perfectly
   good Star Wars movie that has made almost $400 million worldwide—but
   it’s also, according to industry estimates, the first one to actually
   lose money. In response Disney has gently but firmly pumped the brakes:
   the first movie in the next Star Wars trilogy, which will be helmed by
   David Benioff and D. B. Weiss, the duo behind Game of Thrones, won’t
   arrive till Christmas of 2022, with further installments every other
   year after that. There’s no official word as to what stories they’ll
   tell, or when a second trilogy being developed by Rian Johnson will
   appear.

   But even as the movies pause, Star Wars continues to colonize any and
   all other media. In addition to video games, comics, novels, cartoons,
   container-loads of merch, etc., there are not one but two live-action
   TV series in the pipeline for Disney+, Disney’s new streaming service:
   The Mandalorian, created by Jon Favreau, and an as-yet-untitled show
   about Cassian Andor from Rogue One. I have personally tried a
   virtual-reality experience called Vader Immortal, written and produced
   by Dark Knight screenwriter David Goyer. At the end of May, Disneyland
   will open Star Wars: Galaxy’s Edge, a massive, 14-acre, $1 billion
   attraction where you can fly the Millennium Falcon, be captured by the
   First Order, and drink a blue milk cocktail (it’s actually nondairy)
   and Coca-Cola products out of exclusive BB-8-shaped bottles at the
   cantina. It’s the largest single-theme expansion in the park’s history:
   Take that, Toy Story Land. The Disney World version will open in
   August.

   You realize now that, under Lucas, Star Wars always slightly had the
   brakes on—we were always kept a little starved for product. With Disney
   driving, we’ll really find out how big Star Wars can get.
   ENCORE
   Composer John Williams conducting the Star Wars score, drawing on
   themes and motifs he has woven across four decades. “I didn’t think
   there would ever be a second film,” he says.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.

   When people talk about the new Star Wars movies, they tend to talk
   about how faithful they are to the originals. What’s harder to say is
   how exactly the new films are different—how movies like Skywalker keep
   their connection to the past while at the same time finding a way to
   belong to the world of 2019. Because regardless of whether or not Star
   Wars has changed since 1977, the world around it has, profoundly.
   “There’s a loss of innocence, a sense of innocence that existed in the
   70s that I don’t think to any extent exists today,” Kennedy says. “I
   think that has to permeate the storytelling and the reaction to the
   stories and how they’re set up. It has to feel differently because
   we’re different.”

   We know things, as a people and as an audience, that we didn’t know
   back then. For example: back then it felt sort of O.K. to like Darth
   Vader, because even though he was evil he was also incredibly cool, and
   the kind of fascism he represented felt like a bogeyman from the
   distant past. But now fascism is rising again, which makes the whole
   First Order subplot look super-prescient, but it also reminds us that
   fascism is not even slightly cool in real life. “Evil needs to feel and
   look very real,” Kennedy says, “and what that means today may not be as
   black-and-white as it might have been in 1977, coming off a kind of
   World War II sensibility.” In the Star Wars–verse, Dark and Light are
   supposed to balance each other, but in the real world they just mix
   together into a hopelessly foggy, morally ambiguous gray.

   But the changes are liberating too. Star Wars doesn’t have to stay
   frozen in time; if anything it’s the opposite, if it doesn’t change
   it’ll die. It will turn into Flash Gordon. For Abrams, that means he
   can’t go through this process so haunted by the ghost of George Lucas
   (who is of course still alive, but you get what I’m saying) that he
   winds up doing a cinematic Lucas impression. At some point Abrams has
   to let Abrams be Abrams.

     It wasn’t all over when the Ewoks sang. Obi-Wan died in vain. Even
     Han and Leia split up. It’s all a little less of a fairy tale now.

   The Rise of Skywalker might be that point. “Working on nine, I found
   myself approaching it slightly differently,” he says. “Which is to say
   that, on seven, I felt beholden to Star Wars in a way that was
   interesting—I was doing what to the best of my ability I felt Star Wars
   should be.” But this time something changed. Abrams found himself
   making different choices—for the camera angles, the lighting, the
   story. “It felt slightly more renegade; it felt slightly more like, you
   know, Fuck it, I’m going to do the thing that feels right because it
   does, not because it adheres to something.”

   There are a lot of small subtle ways that Abrams’s Star Wars is
   different from Lucas’s, but if there’s a standout, it’s the way that
   the new movies look at history. Lucas’s Star Wars movies are bathed in
   the deep golden-sunset glow of the idyllic Old Republic, that more
   civilized age—but the new movies aren’t like that. They’re not
   nostalgic. They don’t long for the past; they’re more about the promise
   of the future. “This trilogy is about this young generation, this new
   generation, having to deal with all the debt that has come before,”
   Abrams says. “And it’s the sins of the father, and it’s the wisdom and
   the accomplishments of those who did great things, but it’s also those
   who committed atrocities, and the idea that this group is up against
   this unspeakable evil and are they prepared? Are they ready? What have
   they learned from before? It’s less about grandeur. It’s less about
   restoring an old age. It’s more about preserving a sense of freedom and
   not being one of the oppressed.”
   FROM THE ASHES
   Mark Hamill, as Luke, with R2-D2. Speculation is rampant about who will
   “rise” as the Skywalker of the movie’s title—and how that choice will
   reflect the way the world has changed since Star Wars debuted in 1977.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.

   The new generation doesn’t have that same connection to the old days
   that Luke and Leia did. It’s not like their parents destroyed the Old
   Republic. We don’t even know who their parents were! They’re too young
   to remember the Empire. They’re just here to clean up the mess they got
   left with, the disastrous consequences of bad decisions made by earlier
   generations, and try to survive long enough to see the future. Is any
   of this resonating with 2019? Might there possibly be a generation
   around here somewhere that’s worried about the consequences of its own
   decisions for the future? Star Wars has never been and probably never
   should be a vehicle for political arguments, but to paraphrase Ursula
   Le Guin, great science fiction is never really about the future. It’s
   about the present.

   You could even—if you’re into that kind of thing—imagine the story of
   the new Star Wars trilogy as a metaphor for the making of the new Star
   Wars trilogy. In fact, I was totally prepared—because I am into that
   kind of thing!—to try to push this overthought metafictional hot take
   onto Abrams … but I didn’t have to. Abrams got there ahead of me. “The
   idea of the movie is kind of how I felt going into the movie as a
   filmmaker,” he says, “which is to say that I’ve inherited all this
   stuff, great stuff, and good wisdom, and the good and the bad, and it’s
   all coming to this end, and the question is, do we have what it takes
   to succeed?”

   Kylo Ren has it all wrong: you can’t bring back the past and become
   your own grandfather, and you can’t kill the past, either. All you can
   do is make your peace with it and learn from it and move on. Abrams is
   doing that with Star Wars—and meanwhile the Resistance is going to have
   to do that, too, if they really are going to bring this saga to an end.
   Because we’ve been here before, watching a band of scrappy rebels take
   down a technofascist empire, and it seemed to work fine at the time—but
   it didn’t last. The same goes for the Jedi and their struggle with the
   Sith. To end this story, really end it, they’re going to have to figure
   out the conditions of a more permanent victory over the forces of
   darkness. Their past was imperfect at best, and the present is a
   complete disaster—but the future is all before them. This time,
   finally, they’re going to get it right.

   Costume design by Michael Kaplan; production design by Rick Carter and
   Kevin Jenkins; creature & droid FX creative supervisor, Neal Scanlan;
   for details, go to VF.com/credits.

More Great Star Wars Stories from Vanity Fair

   — All the images! Meet the characters, and go on set

   — Video: the author of our cover story opens his notebook

   — Faces, places, and empires: everything new revealed in the cover
   story

   — How J.J. Abrams included Carrie Fisher in on-screen moments

   — The Knights of Ren are back. But who are they?

   — From the archive (1999): Speaking with George Lucas on the eve of The
   Phantom Menace release

   There’s a desert valley in southern Jordan called Wadi Rum, or
   sometimes “the Valley of the Moon.” There are stone inscriptions in
   Wadi Rum that are more than 2,000 years old. Lawrence of Arabia passed
   through there during the Arab Revolt against the Ottoman Empire. More
   recently, J. J. Abrams went there to film parts of the latest Star Wars
   movie, The Rise of Skywalker, because it’s largely uninhabited and
   starkly beautiful and looks plausibly alien, and one of the things that
   has always made the Star Wars movies feel so real—as if they had a real
   life of their own that continues on out beyond the edges of the
   screen—is the way they’re shot on location, with as few digital effects
   as possible. George Lucas shot the Tatooine scenes from A New Hope in
   southern Tunisia. For Skywalker, it’s Wadi Rum.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.
   J.J. Abrams, alongside Stunt Coordinator Eunice Huthart, directs the
   Knights of Ren; elite fearsome enforcers of Kylo Ren’s dark will.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.
   FIRST LOOK
   Vanity Fair reveals Keri Russell as the masked scoundrel Zorri Bliss,
   seen in the Thieves’ Quarter of the snow-dusted world Kijimi.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.
   FORCE MAJEURE
   First Order leaders General Hux (Domhnall Gleeson) and Allegiant
   General Pryde (Richard E. Grant) on the bridge of Kylo Ren’s destroyer.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.

   DESERT POWER
   Joonas Suotamo (Chewbacca), Ridley, Anthony Daniels (C-3PO), and John
   Boyega (Finn) await the call to action for a chase scene.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.
   HOT TAKE
   Members of the crew shade and shine Daniels, the only cast member to
   appear in all nine of the Skywalker films, while BB-8 looks on.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.
   HORSING AROUND
   Finn and new ally Jannah (Naomi Ackie), atop hardy orbaks, lead the
   charge against the mechanized forces of the First Order. “It’s
   extremely surreal to be in it,” says Ackie, “and see how it works from
   the inside.”
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.
   STAR CROSSED
   Kylo Ren (Adam Driver) and Rey battle it out with lightsabers in a
   stormy confrontation. Their Force-connection—what Driver calls their
   “maybe-bond”—will turn out to run even deeper than previously revealed.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.
   SANDBLAST
   Camera operator Colin Anderson readies a take for a chase sequence
   spotlighting the heroics of Chewbacca, BB-8, and Rey.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.
   PUNCH IT!
   In a historic reunion, Lando Calrissian (Billy Dee Williams) retakes
   the helm of the Millennium Falcon, joined by Poe Dameron (Oscar Isaac),
   Chewbacca, D-O, and BB-8. “He’s a survivor,” Williams says of Lando.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.
   WELL MET
   Jordanian locals play the Aki-Aki, natives of the planet Pasaana.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.
   ENCORE
   Composer John Williams conducting the Star Wars score, drawing on
   themes and motifs he has woven across four decades. “I didn’t think
   there would ever be a second film,” he says.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.

   FROM THE ASHES
   Mark Hamill, as Luke, with R2-D2. Speculation is rampant about who will
   “rise” as the Skywalker of the movie’s title—and how that choice will
   reflect the way the world has changed since Star Wars debuted in 1977.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.

More Great Star Wars Stories from Vanity Fair

   You have read all of your free articles for this month.
   Login to read more!
   Get Vanity Fair’s Cocktail Hour.
   It’s our essential daily brief on culture, the news, and more. And it’s
   on the house.
   E-mail ____________________ (BUTTON) Submit
   Subscribed successfully!
   Failed to subscribe!

   Will be used in accordance with our Privacy Policy

   Outbrain

                                    Related

   news

   Report: Trump Allies Predict an Impeachment Spiral

   style

   Tiffany Trump Made a Surprise Appearance at, Yes, the U.N. General
   Assembly

   Arts & Culture

   In A Day - Everything Jennifer Lopez Does in a Day

   Arts & Culture

   Patrick Warburton (Joe Swanson) Reviews Impressions of His Voice

   news

   Greta Thunberg Is Officially Better at Twitter Than Trump

   news

   “Adam’s Fantasyland Became a Reality”: Inside the Crash of WeWork’s
   Magic Millennial Real Estate Kingdom

   © Condé Nast 2019

   ×

You are viewing {{data.count}} of {{data.max}} free articles this month

   Get unlimited access to Vanity Fair — plus, a free tote. Join Now ▸

Youʼve read your last article this month

   Get unlimited access to Vanity Fair — plus, a free tote. Join Now ▸

You are viewing {{data.count}} of {{data.max}} free articles this month

   Get unlimited access to Vanity Fair — plus, a free tote. Join Now ▸

Youʼve read your last article this month

   Get unlimited access to Vanity Fair — plus, a free tote. Join Now ▸
   Already a subscriber?
   Sign in
   Link your subscription
   Already a subscriber?
   Sign in
   Link your subscription
   IFRAME: https://www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-KSG89LT

   Skip to main content
   (BUTTON) Open Navigation Menu

   HWD
   Sign In
     * Subscribe

   Search
     * HIVE
          + Business
          + Technology
          + Politics
          + The Players
     * HWD
          + Movies
          + Television
          + Awards
          + Reviews
     * VANITIES
          + Celebrity
          + Fashion
          + Beauty
          + Royals
     * COMPLETE ARCHIVE

   (BUTTON) Close Related Items Drawer
     * HWD

Meet the Brains Behind the Disney+ Content Flood
       By
       Joy Press
     * HWD

What a Kevin Feige Star Wars Movie Might Look Like
       By
       Anthony Breznican
     * HWD

SNL Hire Shane Gillis Doesn’t Quite Apologize for Racist, Homophobic Remarks
       By
       Laura Bradley
     * HWD

Can a Book Like The Goldfinch Possibly Become a Great Movie?
       By
       Vanity Fair

   Cover Story
   Summer 2019

Star Wars: The Rise of Skywalker, The Ultimate Preview

   After four decades, Star Wars is drawing to its epic conclusion. Lev
   Grossman goes behind the scenes with director J.J. Abrams and the cast
   for the inside scoop on The Rise of Skywalker. With exclusive
   photographs by Annie Leibovitz.
   By
   Lev Grossman
   Photography by
   Annie Leibovitz
   May 22, 2019
     *
     *
     *

   Daisy Ridley on set in Jordan as the character as Rey.
   SHOOTING STARS
   Director J. J. Abrams sets up a shot of Daisy Ridley (Rey) in Jordan’s
   Wadi Rum desert, the setting for the planet Pasaana. In the desert,
   says Abrams, “there’s something about the way the sand interacts with
   the light.”Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.
     *
     *
     *

   There’s a desert valley in southern Jordan called Wadi Rum, or
   sometimes “the Valley of the Moon.” There are stone inscriptions in
   Wadi Rum that are more than 2,000 years old. Lawrence of Arabia passed
   through there during the Arab Revolt against the Ottoman Empire. More
   recently, J. J. Abrams went there to film parts of the latest Star Wars
   movie, The Rise of Skywalker, because it’s largely uninhabited and
   starkly beautiful and looks plausibly alien, and one of the things that
   has always made the Star Wars movies feel so real—as if they had a real
   life of their own that continues on out beyond the edges of the
   screen—is the way they’re shot on location, with as few digital effects
   as possible. George Lucas shot the Tatooine scenes from A New Hope in
   southern Tunisia. For Skywalker, it’s Wadi Rum.

   They don’t do it that way because it’s easy. Abrams and his crew had to
   build miles of road into the desert. They basically had to set up a
   small town out there, populated by the cast and extras and crew—the
   creature-effects department alone had 70 people. The Jordanian military
   got involved. The Jordanian royal family got involved. There was sand.
   There were sandstorms, when all you could do was take cover and huddle
   in your tent and—if you’re John Boyega, who plays the ex-Stormtrooper
   Finn—listen to reggae.
   The 2019 Summer Cover of Vanity Fair with Adam Driver
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.
   The 2019 Summer Cover of Vanity Fair
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.

   But in a way that’s the whole point: you’re out there so the world can
   get up in your grill and make its presence felt on film. “It’s the
   things that you can’t anticipate—the imperfections,” says Oscar Isaac,
   who plays the Resistance pilot Poe Dameron. “It’s very difficult to
   design imperfection, and the imperfections that you have in these
   environments immediately create a sense of authenticity. You just
   believe it more.” When Isaac arrived in Wadi Rum for his first week of
   shooting, Abrams had set up a massive greenscreen in the middle of the
   desert. “And I was like, ‘J. J., can I ask you a question? I notice
   we’re shooting on greenscreen.’ And he’s like, ‘So why the hell are we
   in the desert?’ And I’m like, ‘Yeah!’ And he said, ‘Well, because look:
   the way that the sand interacts with the light, and the type of shots
   you would set up—if you were designing the shot on a computer you would
   never even think to do that.’ There’s something about the way that the
   light and the environment and everything plays together.” It’s that
   something, the presence and the details and the analog imperfections of
   a real nondigital place, that makes Star Wars so powerful.

   IFRAME:
   https://audm.herokuapp.com/player-embed/?pub=vf&articleID=star-wars-pre
   view

   It was powerful enough to bring 65,000 people to Chicago in April for
   Star Wars Celebration, a fan convention where you could see a giant
   Stormtrooper head made out of 36,440 tiny Lego Stormtrooper
   mini-figures, which is a world record of some kind, though I’m not sure
   exactly what, and where people were dressed up as Muppets who were
   themselves dressed up as Star Wars characters. But the main event was
   the launch of the trailer for The Rise of Skywalker, which was held in
   a 10,000-seat arena and was such a big deal that even though the
   trailer was going to be released on the Internet literally seconds
   after it was over, I—an at least theoretically respectable member of
   the media—was not only tagged, wristbanded, escorted, and
   metal-detected, but sniffed by a K-9 unit before I could go in.

   I sat down with Abrams a couple of hours later. For the occasion, he
   was wearing a suit so black and sharp, he could have been doing Men in
   Black cosplay, but his most distinctive feature is his dark curly hair,
   which is upswept in a way that is only slightly suggestive of devil
   horns. Abrams talks rapidly, as if he can barely keep up with the
   things his racing brain is telling him to say. When I told him that not
   only was Star Wars the No. 1 trending topic on Twitter, but that all 10
   of the Top 10 trending topics were Star Wars–related, and that he
   personally was No. 5, he was visibly stunned.
   Advertisement

   Then he recovered enough to say: “Well, I aspire to No. 4.” (For the
   record, No. 4 was the late Supreme Leader Snoke, who frankly did seem
   beatable. If you’re curious, No. 11 was pro golfer Zach Johnson, who
   had just accidentally hit his ball with a practice swing at the
   Masters. Life goes on.)
   J.J. Abrams alongside Stunt Coordinator Eunice Huthart and the Knights
   of Ren.

   J.J. Abrams, alongside Stunt Coordinator Eunice Huthart, directs the
   Knights of Ren; elite fearsome enforcers of Kylo Ren’s dark will.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.

   Disney executives talk about how important it is to “event-ize” Star
   Wars movies; i.e., to make them feel not just like movies but like
   seriously momentous occasions. They won’t have much trouble with this
   one: The Rise of Skywalker isn’t just the last movie in the Star Wars
   trilogy that began in 2015 with The Force Awakens; it’s the last movie
   in a literal, actual trilogy of trilogies that started with the very
   first Star Wars movie back in 1977, which began the saga of the
   Skywalker family. The Rise of Skywalker will finally, after 42 years,
   bring that saga to an end.
   Keri Russell as the masked scoundrel Zorri Bliss.

   FIRST LOOK
   Vanity Fair reveals Keri Russell as the masked scoundrel Zorri Bliss,
   seen in the Thieves’ Quarter of the snow-dusted world Kijimi.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.

   We all thought the story was over in 1983 with Return of the Jedi, and
   then we really thought it was over in 2005 with Revenge of the Sith.
   But Star Wars has always been an unruly beast, too big and powerful
   (and profitable) to be contained in one movie, or even in a trilogy, or
   even in two trilogies, let alone numberless novels, TV shows, comics,
   video games, Happy Meals, and so on. Now Abrams has to gather all those
   threads and bring closure to a story that was started by somebody else,
   in an America that feels a very long time ago indeed. “That’s the
   challenge of this movie,” Abrams says. “It wasn’t just to make one film
   that as a stand-alone experience would be thrilling, and scary, and
   emotional, and funny, but one that if you were to watch all nine of the
   films, you’d feel like, Well, of course—that!”

   Like a lot of things that we now can’t imagine life without, Star Wars
   came really close to never happening in the first place. In 1971, Lucas
   was a serious young auteur just five years out of film school at U.S.C.
   He had only one full-length movie on his résumé, and that was THX 1138,
   which is the kind of visionary but grindingly earnest science-fiction
   epic that only the French could love. (They were pretty much the only
   ones who did.) Everybody expected Lucas to go on and make serious,
   gritty 1970s cinema like his peers, Brian De Palma and Francis Ford
   Coppola. At the time Lucas and Coppola were actively planning a radical
   epic set in Vietnam with the provocative title Apocalypse Now.
   General Hux Allegiant General Pryde on the bridge of Kylo Rens
   destroyer.

   FORCE MAJEURE
   First Order leaders General Hux (Domhnall Gleeson) and Allegiant
   General Pryde (Richard E. Grant) on the bridge of Kylo Ren’s destroyer.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.

   But Coppola would have to finish that one on his own, because Lucas
   went a different way. “I had decided there was no modern mythology,” he
   said in 1997. “I wanted to take old myths and put them into a new
   format that young people could relate to. Mythology always existed in
   unusual, unknown environments, so I chose space.” Lucas tried to
   acquire the rights to Flash Gordon (that would’ve been a dark timeline
   indeed), but when he couldn’t, he came up with his own original
   science-fictional epic instead. He called it The Star Wars. Like The
   Facebook, it would have to shed a direct article on its way to glory.

   Even though American Graffiti had made Lucas a bankable director, Star
   Wars still came together slowly. In the first draft, Luke was an old
   man, Leia was 14, and Han Solo was “a huge green-skinned monster with
   no nose and large gills.” Fox executives were baffled by Star Wars, and
   they squeezed Lucas relentlessly for time and money. We forget now how
   jerry-rigged the first movie was: the cantina aliens weren’t finished,
   and the monumental Star Destroyer that dominates the opening shot is,
   in reality, about three feet long. The Death Star interior is basically
   one set re-arranged several different ways. To make Greedo’s mouth
   move, the woman in the Greedo suit had to hold a clothespin in her
   mouth. “What I remember about working on the first film,” says John
   Williams, the legendary soundtrack composer, “is the fact that I didn’t
   ever think there would be a second film.” (He also, like everybody
   else, thought Luke and Leia were going to get together, so he wrote
   them a love theme.)

   But wherever real mythology comes from, Lucas had gone there and
   brought something back alive. People wanted movies that gave them
   something to believe in instead of relentlessly autopsying the beliefs
   that had failed them. We’d had enough of antiheroes. We needed some
   anti-antiheroes. “I realized after THX that people don’t care about how
   the country’s being ruined,” Lucas said. “We’ve got to regenerate
   optimism.” Like American Graffiti, Star Wars is a work of profound
   nostalgia, a post-Vietnam, post-Watergate anthem of longing for the
   restoration of a true and just power in the universe—the return of the
   king. And at the same time it’s a very personal hero’s journey, about a
   boy who must put right the sins of his father and master the strange
   power he finds within himself, and in doing so become a man.
   Advertisement

   Star Wars is also an incredibly enduring vision of what it’s like to
   live in a world of super-advanced technology. Science fiction often
   ages badly, turning into kitsch or camp—just look at Flash Gordon—but
   Star Wars hasn’t. More than any filmmaker before him, Lucas
   successfully imagined what a science-fictional world would feel like to
   somebody who was actually inside it—which is to say, it would look as
   ordinary and workaday as the present. He even shot it like it was real,
   working close-in and mostly eschewing wide establishing shots, more
   like a documentary or a newsreel than a space opera. “It feels very
   grounded,” says Naomi Ackie, who’s making her Star Wars debut in
   Skywalker playing a character named Jannah, about whom she is allowed
   to say literally nothing. “There’s the kind of spectacular-ness, and
   the supernatural move-things-with-your-mind magic stuff, but then
   there’s also this really grounded, rugged nature where everything is
   distressed and old and kind of worn out and lived-in. And I think
   playing with those two ideas means that you get this feeling that it
   could almost be real. Like, in a galaxy far away, it could almost be
   the case that you could have this.”

   When Lucas made the first Star Wars sequel, The Empire Strikes Back, he
   cheekily labeled it Episode V, then went back and re-labeled the first
   movie as Episode IV, as if the movies were an old-fashioned serial that
   the rest of us were all just tuning in to. Around that time, he also
   started talking about Star Wars as a nine-part epic—so in 2012, when
   Lucas retired and sold Lucasfilm to Disney, it wasn’t exactly heresy
   that Disney announced more movies. At the time, Kathleen Kennedy had
   just been named co-chairperson of Lucasfilm, and she tapped Abrams to
   direct the first Disney-owned post-Lucas Star Wars movie. It was a bit
   like saying, Make the lightning strike again, please. Exactly here, if
   you could. Oh, and could you also earn back that $4 billion we just
   spent to buy Lucasfilm? (Narrator voice: He could.)

   At first blush, Abrams’s debut Star Wars movie, The Force Awakens,
   looked like an elaborate homage to the original. Just like in A New
   Hope, there’s a young Force-sensitive person on a poor desert
   planet—that’s Rey, played by Daisy Ridley—who finds a droid with a
   secret message that’s vital to the Rebellion (or wait, sorry, it’s the
   Resistance now). There’s a villain in a black mask, just like Darth
   Vader, except that it’s his grandson Kylo Ren (Adam Driver), né Ben
   Solo, son of Han and Leia. Kylo has a planet-killing weapon, much like
   the Death Star but way bigger, which becomes the target of a desperate
   attack by Resistance X-wings. There’s even a bar full of aliens.

   “This trilogy is about this young generation, this new generation,
   having to deal with all the debt that has come before.”

   Abrams also insisted on keeping to the analog aesthetic of the original
   trilogy: those aliens had to be latex and yak hair, not bits and bytes,
   and everything possible was shot on location using film cameras, not
   digital ones. Even Lucas had abandoned that approach by the time he
   made the second Star Wars trilogy, but many fans consider those movies
   to be a cautionary tale. “Famously, the prequels were mostly
   greenscreen environments,” Abrams says. “And that was George himself
   doing that, and it ended up looking exactly how he wanted it to
   look—and I always preferred the look of the original movies, because I
   just remember when you’re in the snow on Hoth, when you’re in the
   desert on Tatooine, and when you’re in the forests of Endor—it’s
   amazing. If you put a vaporator here, there, all of a sudden almost any
   natural location suddenly becomes a Star Wars location.”
   Advertisement

   But the more interesting thing about The Force Awakens and its
   successor, The Last Jedi, written and directed by Rian Johnson, was how
   they subtly complicated Lucas’s vision. Thirty years have gone by since
   the ending of Return of the Jedi, during which time the newly reborn
   Republic became complacent and politically stagnant, allowing the rise
   of the reactionary neo-imperial First Order, whose origins we will
   learn more about in Skywalker. “It was almost like if the Argentine
   Nazis had sort of got together and actually started to bring that back
   in some real form,” Abrams says. Just like that, the rules of the Star
   Wars universe changed. It wasn’t all over when the Ewoks sang. Obi-Wan
   Kenobi and all those Bothans had died in vain. Even Han and Leia split
   up. It’s all a little less of a fairy tale now.

   The feather-haired godling Luke suffered the trauma of having a Padawan
   go bad on his watch. It’s an echo of what happened to his old mentor,
   Obi-Wan, with Anakin Skywalker, who became Darth Vader. But where
   Obi-Wan made peace with it, waiting serenely in the desert of Tatooine
   for the next Chosen One to arrive, Luke’s guilt curdled into shame. He
   hid himself away, so that his Chosen One, Rey, had to spend most of The
   Force Awakens searching for him, and then another whole movie
   convincing him with the help of Yoda’s Force ghost to keep the Jedi
   Order going at all. Star Wars arrived as an antidote to the
   disillusionment of the 1970s—but now, in its middle age, Star Wars is
   grappling with disillusionment of its own.
   Joonas Suotamo Ridley Anthony Daniels and John Boyega on set in Jordan.

   DESERT POWER
   Joonas Suotamo (Chewbacca), Ridley, Anthony Daniels (C-3PO), and John
   Boyega (Finn) await the call to action for a chase scene.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.

   By dint of advanced Sith interrogation techniques, I was able to obtain
   valuable advance information about The Rise of Skywalker. Here it is:
   common emblem.

   Anthony Daniels, who plays C-3P0, is the only actor who has appeared in
   all nine movies of the Star Wars triple trilogy, so if anybody’s
   entitled to leak, it’s him. Daniels says he loved the script for The
   Rise of Skywalker, but he didn’t get it until the last minute, right
   before shooting started, and for some reason he just couldn’t memorize
   his part. “My first line would not go in my head!” he says. In person
   Daniels is like a C-3P0 whose preferences have been reset to charming
   and voluble. “The line that I couldn’t say was two words: ‘common
   emblem.’ Common emblem, common emblem—I would say them thousands of
   times. My wife would say it back. I just couldn’t say them!”

   Fortunately C-3P0’s mouth doesn’t move, so he could add the line in
   postproduction. Anyway, there’s the big scoop: “common emblem.” I don’t
   know what it means either. (Also I 100 percent guarantee that they will
   change the line before the movie comes out so that this scoop will end
   up being fake news.) Daniels also told me that C-3P0 does something in
   this movie that surprises everybody—but he wouldn’t say what. “He keeps
   his clothes on. It’s not like he suddenly does this thing, but …”

   The only other member of the old guard on the set this time was Billy
   Dee Williams, who plays the charismatic Lando Calrissian. At 82,
   Williams has lost none of his roguish charm, but now it comes wrapped
   in a kind of magisterial dignity. People tend to remember Lando for the
   deal he cut with Vader in The Empire Strikes Back, rather than for his
   redemptive comeback in Return of the Jedi, and Williams appears to have
   spent the last 45 years defending him. “He’s a survivor. It’s
   expediency for him,” Williams says. “You know, he was thrown into a
   situation which he didn’t look for and he had to try to figure out how
   to deal with an entity which is more than just a human.” And, he adds,
   with the weary air of somebody who has spent way too much time
   justifying the behavior of a fictional character, “nobody died!”
   Members of the crew shade and shine Daniels on set in Jordan.

   HOT TAKE
   Members of the crew shade and shine Daniels, the only cast member to
   appear in all nine of the Skywalker films, while BB-8 looks on.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.

   Chewbacca is still here, too, but it’s not the same man in the suit.
   The original actor was Peter Mayhew, a seven-foot-three-inch gentle
   giant who was working as a hospital orderly in London when Lucas cast
   him in the first movie. Mayhew retired after The Force Awakens, and he
   died on April 30 at 74. His replacement is Joonas Suotamo, a
   fresh-faced former professional basketball player from Finland who
   always wanted to be an actor but was hard to cast because he’s six feet
   11 inches tall. “When I first met [Mayhew] he told me I was a wee bit
   too skinny,” Suotamo says. “But we also had a Wookiee boot camp, which
   lasted for a week. He told me all kinds of things about the moves that
   Chewbacca does, how they came to be and his reasoning behind them.”
   Suotamo has now played Chewbacca in four movies and enjoys it about as
   much as I’ve ever seen anybody enjoy anything. “It’s very much like
   silent-era film, with Buster Keaton and Charlie Chaplin,” he says.
   “He’s a mime character and that’s what he does, and I guess in that
   minimalism comes the beauty of the character.”
   Advertisement

   Other things we know about Skywalker: We can safely assume that the
   Resistance and the First Order are headed toward a final smash, which
   will be a heavy lift for the good guys because, at the end of The Last
   Jedi, the Resistance was down, way down, to a double handful of
   survivors. They’ll face a First Order who suffered a stinging but
   largely symbolic loss at the Battle of Crait, and who, I feel
   confident, have learned something from the previous eight movies. The
   Empire built and lost two Death Stars. The First Order has already lost
   one super-weapon in The Force Awakens. Presumably it won’t make the
   same mistake twice, twice.

   But the stakes go even higher than that, cosmically high. Sources close
   to the movie say that Skywalker will at long last bring to a climax the
   millennia-long conflict between the Jedi Order and its dark shadow, the
   Sith.
   Finn and new ally Jannah atop hardy orbaks.

   HORSING AROUND
   Finn and new ally Jannah (Naomi Ackie), atop hardy orbaks, lead the
   charge against the mechanized forces of the First Order. “It’s
   extremely surreal to be in it,” says Ackie, “and see how it works from
   the inside.”
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.
   Kylo Ren and Rey battle it out with lightsabers.

   STAR CROSSED
   Kylo Ren (Adam Driver) and Rey battle it out with lightsabers in a
   stormy confrontation. Their Force-connection—what Driver calls their
   “maybe-bond”—will turn out to run even deeper than previously revealed.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.

   The hottest area for speculation, however, is the identity of the
   titular Skywalker, because at this point there aren’t many Skywalkers
   left to rise. One is General Organa, the former Princess Leia, Luke’s
   sister—but Carrie Fisher, who plays her, passed away in 2016. That was
   a deeply painful loss for Abrams personally, but it also presented him
   with an impossible choice as a filmmaker. He needed Leia to tell the
   story, but Abrams didn’t feel like a digital Carrie Fisher could do the
   job, and there was no way Lucasfilm was going to re-cast the role.

   But then a strange thing happened. Abrams remembered that there was
   some footage of Fisher left over from The Force Awakens, scenes that
   had been changed or cut entirely, and he dug them up. “It’s hard to
   even talk about it without sounding like I’m being some kind of cosmic
   spiritual goofball,” Abrams says, “but it felt like we suddenly had
   found the impossible answer to the impossible question.” He started to
   write scenes around the old footage, fitting Leia’s dialogue into new
   contexts. He re-created the lighting to match the way Fisher had been
   lit. Bit by bit, she found her place in the new movie. “It was a
   bizarre kind of left side/right side of the brain sort of Venn diagram
   thing, of figuring out how to create the puzzle based on the pieces we
   had.” Fisher’s daughter, Billie Lourd, appears in the movies as a
   Resistance officer named Lieutenant Connix, and at first Abrams
   deliberately wrote her out of the scenes in case it was too painful—but
   Lourd said no, she wanted to be in them. “And so, there are moments
   where they’re talking; there are moments where they’re touching,”
   Abrams says. “There are moments in this movie where Carrie is there,
   and I really do feel there is an element of the uncanny, spiritual, you
   know, classic Carrie, that it would have happened this way, because
   somehow it worked. And I never thought it would.”

   The only other member of the surviving Skywalker bloodline—that we know
   of!—is Leia’s son and Luke’s former Padawan, the fallen Jedi Kylo Ren.
   Kylo probably isn’t capable of actual happiness, but things are
   definitely looking up for him: by the end of The Last Jedi he has taken
   control of the First Order and killed or at least outlived his actual
   father and both of his symbolic fathers-in-art, Luke and Supreme Leader
   Snoke. Sources at Disney also confirm that his long-rumored Knights of
   Ren will finally arrive in Skywalker. “And then he had been forging
   this maybe-bond with Rey,” Driver says, “and it kind of ends with the
   question in the air: is he going to pursue that relationship, or when
   the door of her ship goes up, does that also close that camaraderie
   that they were maybe forming?”
   Spotlighting the heroics of Chewbacca BB8 and Rey.

   SANDBLAST
   Camera operator Colin Anderson readies a take for a chase sequence
   spotlighting the heroics of Chewbacca, BB-8, and Rey.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.

   Darkness in the Star Wars movies tends to come from fear: for Anakin
   Skywalker, Kylo’s grandfather, it was his fear of losing his mother and
   his wife. After two movies it’s still not so easy to say exactly what
   Kylo Ren himself fears, even though he’s as operatically emo as Vader
   was stoic. He’s fixated on the past—he made a shrine to his own
   grandfather—but at the same time the past torments him. “Let the past
   die,” he tells Rey in The Last Jedi. “Kill it, if you have to. That’s
   the only way to become what you are meant to be.”
   Advertisement

   Presumably whatever’s eating at Kylo started in his childhood: maybe
   being the kid of literally the two coolest people in the galaxy isn’t
   as fun as it sounds. Driver—who has obviously thought this through with
   a lot of rigor—points out that, as cool as they are, Han and Leia are
   both obsessively committed to lifestyles (smuggling, rebelling) that
   don’t leave much room for kids. He also points out that, unlike Luke
   and Rey, Kylo never got to go on a nifty voyage of self-discovery.
   Instead he grew up under the crushing pressure of massive expectations.
   “How do you form friendships out of that?” Driver says. “How do you
   understand the weight of that? And if there’s no one around you guiding
   you, or articulating things the right way … it can easily go awry.” By
   the emotional logic that governs the Star Wars universe—and also our
   own—Kylo Ren is going to have to confront the past, and his fears,
   whatever they are, or be destroyed by them.

   Where Lucas’s trilogies tended to follow the roots and branches of the
   Skywalker family tree—their personal saga was the saga of the galaxy
   writ small—the new movies have a slightly wider aperture and take in a
   new generation of heroes. There’s Rey, of course, who sources say will
   have progressed in her training since the end of The Last Jedi to the
   point where it’s almost complete. With that taken care of, all she has
   to do is reconstitute the entire Jedi Order from scratch, because as
   far as we know she’s the Last One.

   If Kylo Ren can’t be redeemed it will almost certainly fall to Rey to
   put him down, in spite of their maybe-bond. Their relationship is the
   closest thing the new trilogy has to a star-crossed love story on the
   order of Han and Leia: a source close to the movie says that their
   Force-connection will turn out to run even deeper than we thought.
   They’re uniquely suited to understand each other, but at the same time
   they are in every way each other’s inverse, down to Kylo’s perverse
   rejection of his family, which is the one thing Rey craves most. “I
   think there’s a part of Rey that’s like, dude, you fucking had it all,
   you had it all,” Ridley says. “That was always a big question during
   filming: you had it all and you let it go.”
   Billy Dee Williams as Lando Calrissian and Oscar Isaac Poe Dameron with
   Chewbacca DO and BB8.

   PUNCH IT!
   In a historic reunion, Lando Calrissian (Billy Dee Williams) retakes
   the helm of the Millennium Falcon, joined by Poe Dameron (Oscar Isaac),
   Chewbacca, D-O, and BB-8. “He’s a survivor,” Williams says of Lando.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.

   Rey is also, according to totally unsubstantiated Internet theories, a
   leading candidate to be the Skywalker of the title, pending some kind
   of head-snapping reveal about her ancestry. (For the record, the other
   leading unsubstantiated Internet theory has the “Skywalker” of the
   title referring to an entirely new order of Force users who will rise
   up and replace the Jedi.)

   Rey seems ready for it all, or as ready as anybody could be. “It’s nice
   having that shot at the beginning of the teaser,” Ridley says, over
   avocado toast at a fancy Chicago hotel, “because I think it’s quite a
   good visual representation of where she is now: confident, calm, less
   fearful.… It’s still sort of overwhelming, but in a different way. It
   feels more right—less like inevitable and more like there’s a focus to
   the journey.” Focus is a good word for Rey: on-screen Ridley’s dramatic
   eyebrows form a wickedly sharp arrow of concentration. I asked Ridley
   what she’s thinking about when Rey is using her Force powers, and it
   turns out Rey seems focused because Ridley is actually seriously
   focused. “I literally visualize it. When I was lifting rocks I was
   visualizing the rocks moving. And then I was like, Oh, my God, I made
   it happen! And obviously there’s loads of rocks on strings, so, no, I
   didn’t. But I visualize that it’s really going on.” (That scene, which
   comes at the end of The Last Jedi, is another example of classic
   nondigital Star Wars effects: those were real rocks. “It was actually
   really amazing,” Ridley says. “It was sort of like a baby mobile.”)
   Advertisement

   There’s also Finn, the apostate Stormtrooper, played by the
   irrepressible Boyega, who in person practically vibrates with energy
   and speaks with a South London accent very different from Finn’s
   American one. In some ways Finn has gone through a complete character
   arc already: he confronted his past—by beating down his old boss,
   Captain Phasma—and found his courage and his moral center. He has had a
   tendency to panic, if not actively desert, in clutch situations, but at
   the Battle of Crait he proved that he was past that. “I think he’s just
   an active member of the Resistance now,” Boyega says. “Episode Eight,
   he couldn’t decide what team he was fighting for. But since then he’s
   made a clear decision.” (Cast members tend to refer to the Star Wars
   movies by their episode numbers: four is the original movie, seven is
   The Force Awakens, and so on.)

   Finn still has to make a clear decision about his romantic situation,
   though. As Boyega put it at Star Wars Celebration: “Finn is single and
   willing to mingle!” The movies have been teasing his emotional
   connections with both Rey and the Resistance mechanic Rose Tico, played
   by Kelly Marie Tran, with whom he shared a fleeting battlefield kiss in
   The Last Jedi. Rose seems like the more positive choice, given that she
   stops Finn from deserting early in the movie and saves his life at the
   Battle of Crait, and that the precedents for romantic involvements with
   Jedi are extremely bad. Tran is the first Asian-American woman to play
   a major role in a Star Wars movie, and she has been the target of both
   racist and sexist attacks online. But she has come through them as a
   fan favorite: when she appeared onstage in Chicago, she got a standing
   ovation.

   Finally there’s Poe, who has mostly struggled with his own cocky
   impulsiveness, because he’s a
   loose-cannon-who-just-can’t-play-by-the-rules. Poe will have to step up
   and become a leader, because the Resistance is seriously short on
   officer material. In fact, some of that transformation will already
   have happened where The Rise of Skywalker picks up, which is about a
   year after the end of The Last Jedi. “There has been a bit of shared
   history that you haven’t seen,” Isaac says. “Whereas in the other
   films, Poe is this kind of lone wolf, now he’s really part of a group.
   They’re going out and going on missions and have a much more familiar
   dynamic now.” Star Wars has always been about friendship as much as it
   is about romance, and as of the end of The Last Jedi, Rey, Finn, and
   Poe are all finally in the same place for the first time since The
   Force Awakens.

   The Rise of Skywalker introduces some new players, too. There’s a tiny
   one-wheeled droid called D-O and a large banana-slug alien named Klaud.
   Oh, and Naomi Ackie, Keri Russell, and Richard E. Grant have all joined
   the cast, though, again, we know practically nothing about who they’re
   playing. Going from being outside the Star Wars leviathan to being
   right in its belly can be a dizzying experience for a first-timer. “I
   actually tried to do this thing while we were filming,” Ackie says,
   “where I’d go one day, walking through London without seeing a Star
   Wars reference somewhere. And you can’t do it. You really can’t. So
   it’s extremely surreal to be in it and see how it works from the
   inside.”
   Jordanian locals play the AkiAki during the photoshoot.

   WELL MET
   Jordanian locals play the Aki-Aki, natives of the planet Pasaana.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.

   If anything, Star Wars is only getting more omnipresent. The franchise
   under Lucas was a colossus, but he still ran it essentially as a
   private concern. He could make movies or not, as his muse dictated—he
   was beholden to no shareholders. But Star Wars under Disney makes the
   old Star Wars look positively quaint. Between 1977 and 2005, Lucasfilm
   released six Star Wars movies; when Skywalker premieres in December,
   Disney will have released five Star Wars movies in five years. “I think
   there is a larger expectation that Disney has,” Kennedy says. “On the
   other hand, though, I think that Disney is very respectful of what this
   is, and right from the beginning we talked about the fragility of this
   form of storytelling. Because it’s something that means so much to fans
   that you can’t turn this into some kind of factory approach. You can’t
   even do what Marvel does, necessarily, where you pick characters and
   build new franchises around those characters. This needs to evolve
   differently.”
   Advertisement

   A useful example of that fragility might be the relatively modest
   performance of Solo: A Star Wars Story in 2018. Solo was a perfectly
   good Star Wars movie that has made almost $400 million worldwide—but
   it’s also, according to industry estimates, the first one to actually
   lose money. In response Disney has gently but firmly pumped the brakes:
   the first movie in the next Star Wars trilogy, which will be helmed by
   David Benioff and D. B. Weiss, the duo behind Game of Thrones, won’t
   arrive till Christmas of 2022, with further installments every other
   year after that. There’s no official word as to what stories they’ll
   tell, or when a second trilogy being developed by Rian Johnson will
   appear.

   But even as the movies pause, Star Wars continues to colonize any and
   all other media. In addition to video games, comics, novels, cartoons,
   container-loads of merch, etc., there are not one but two live-action
   TV series in the pipeline for Disney+, Disney’s new streaming service:
   The Mandalorian, created by Jon Favreau, and an as-yet-untitled show
   about Cassian Andor from Rogue One. I have personally tried a
   virtual-reality experience called Vader Immortal, written and produced
   by Dark Knight screenwriter David Goyer. At the end of May, Disneyland
   will open Star Wars: Galaxy’s Edge, a massive, 14-acre, $1 billion
   attraction where you can fly the Millennium Falcon, be captured by the
   First Order, and drink a blue milk cocktail (it’s actually nondairy)
   and Coca-Cola products out of exclusive BB-8-shaped bottles at the
   cantina. It’s the largest single-theme expansion in the park’s history:
   Take that, Toy Story Land. The Disney World version will open in
   August.

   You realize now that, under Lucas, Star Wars always slightly had the
   brakes on—we were always kept a little starved for product. With Disney
   driving, we’ll really find out how big Star Wars can get.
   Composer John Williams conducting the Star Wars score.

   ENCORE
   Composer John Williams conducting the Star Wars score, drawing on
   themes and motifs he has woven across four decades. “I didn’t think
   there would ever be a second film,” he says.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.

   When people talk about the new Star Wars movies, they tend to talk
   about how faithful they are to the originals. What’s harder to say is
   how exactly the new films are different—how movies like Skywalker keep
   their connection to the past while at the same time finding a way to
   belong to the world of 2019. Because regardless of whether or not Star
   Wars has changed since 1977, the world around it has, profoundly.
   “There’s a loss of innocence, a sense of innocence that existed in the
   70s that I don’t think to any extent exists today,” Kennedy says. “I
   think that has to permeate the storytelling and the reaction to the
   stories and how they’re set up. It has to feel differently because
   we’re different.”

   We know things, as a people and as an audience, that we didn’t know
   back then. For example: back then it felt sort of O.K. to like Darth
   Vader, because even though he was evil he was also incredibly cool, and
   the kind of fascism he represented felt like a bogeyman from the
   distant past. But now fascism is rising again, which makes the whole
   First Order subplot look super-prescient, but it also reminds us that
   fascism is not even slightly cool in real life. “Evil needs to feel and
   look very real,” Kennedy says, “and what that means today may not be as
   black-and-white as it might have been in 1977, coming off a kind of
   World War II sensibility.” In the Star Wars–verse, Dark and Light are
   supposed to balance each other, but in the real world they just mix
   together into a hopelessly foggy, morally ambiguous gray.
   Advertisement

   But the changes are liberating too. Star Wars doesn’t have to stay
   frozen in time; if anything it’s the opposite, if it doesn’t change
   it’ll die. It will turn into Flash Gordon. For Abrams, that means he
   can’t go through this process so haunted by the ghost of George Lucas
   (who is of course still alive, but you get what I’m saying) that he
   winds up doing a cinematic Lucas impression. At some point Abrams has
   to let Abrams be Abrams.

   It wasn’t all over when the Ewoks sang. Obi-Wan died in vain. Even Han
   and Leia split up. It’s all a little less of a fairy tale now.

   The Rise of Skywalker might be that point. “Working on nine, I found
   myself approaching it slightly differently,” he says. “Which is to say
   that, on seven, I felt beholden to Star Wars in a way that was
   interesting—I was doing what to the best of my ability I felt Star Wars
   should be.” But this time something changed. Abrams found himself
   making different choices—for the camera angles, the lighting, the
   story. “It felt slightly more renegade; it felt slightly more like, you
   know, Fuck it, I’m going to do the thing that feels right because it
   does, not because it adheres to something.”

   There are a lot of small subtle ways that Abrams’s Star Wars is
   different from Lucas’s, but if there’s a standout, it’s the way that
   the new movies look at history. Lucas’s Star Wars movies are bathed in
   the deep golden-sunset glow of the idyllic Old Republic, that more
   civilized age—but the new movies aren’t like that. They’re not
   nostalgic. They don’t long for the past; they’re more about the promise
   of the future. “This trilogy is about this young generation, this new
   generation, having to deal with all the debt that has come before,”
   Abrams says. “And it’s the sins of the father, and it’s the wisdom and
   the accomplishments of those who did great things, but it’s also those
   who committed atrocities, and the idea that this group is up against
   this unspeakable evil and are they prepared? Are they ready? What have
   they learned from before? It’s less about grandeur. It’s less about
   restoring an old age. It’s more about preserving a sense of freedom and
   not being one of the oppressed.”
   Mark Hamill as Luke with R2D2.

   FROM THE ASHES
   Mark Hamill, as Luke, with R2-D2. Speculation is rampant about who will
   “rise” as the Skywalker of the movie’s title—and how that choice will
   reflect the way the world has changed since Star Wars debuted in 1977.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.

   The new generation doesn’t have that same connection to the old days
   that Luke and Leia did. It’s not like their parents destroyed the Old
   Republic. We don’t even know who their parents were! They’re too young
   to remember the Empire. They’re just here to clean up the mess they got
   left with, the disastrous consequences of bad decisions made by earlier
   generations, and try to survive long enough to see the future. Is any
   of this resonating with 2019? Might there possibly be a generation
   around here somewhere that’s worried about the consequences of its own
   decisions for the future? Star Wars has never been and probably never
   should be a vehicle for political arguments, but to paraphrase Ursula
   Le Guin, great science fiction is never really about the future. It’s
   about the present.

   You could even—if you’re into that kind of thing—imagine the story of
   the new Star Wars trilogy as a metaphor for the making of the new Star
   Wars trilogy. In fact, I was totally prepared—because I am into that
   kind of thing!—to try to push this overthought metafictional hot take
   onto Abrams … but I didn’t have to. Abrams got there ahead of me. “The
   idea of the movie is kind of how I felt going into the movie as a
   filmmaker,” he says, “which is to say that I’ve inherited all this
   stuff, great stuff, and good wisdom, and the good and the bad, and it’s
   all coming to this end, and the question is, do we have what it takes
   to succeed?”

   Kylo Ren has it all wrong: you can’t bring back the past and become
   your own grandfather, and you can’t kill the past, either. All you can
   do is make your peace with it and learn from it and move on. Abrams is
   doing that with Star Wars—and meanwhile the Resistance is going to have
   to do that, too, if they really are going to bring this saga to an end.
   Because we’ve been here before, watching a band of scrappy rebels take
   down a technofascist empire, and it seemed to work fine at the time—but
   it didn’t last. The same goes for the Jedi and their struggle with the
   Sith. To end this story, really end it, they’re going to have to figure
   out the conditions of a more permanent victory over the forces of
   darkness. Their past was imperfect at best, and the present is a
   complete disaster—but the future is all before them. This time,
   finally, they’re going to get it right.
   Advertisement

   Costume design by Michael Kaplan; production design by Rick Carter and
   Kevin Jenkins; creature & droid FX creative supervisor, Neal Scanlan;
   for details, go to VF.com/credits.

More Great Star Wars Stories from Vanity Fair

   — All the images! Meet the characters, and go on set

   — Video: the author of our cover story opens his notebook

   — Faces, places, and empires: everything new revealed in the cover
   story

   — How J.J. Abrams included Carrie Fisher in on-screen moments

   — The Knights of Ren are back. But who are they?

   — From the archive (1999): Speaking with George Lucas on the eve of The
   Phantom Menace release

   Read More
   HWD
   What a Kevin Feige Star Wars Movie Might Look Like
   By
   Anthony Breznican
   HWD
   Disney CEO Bob Iger Promises Netflix and Disney+ Are “Very Different”
   By
   Kevin Fitzpatrick
   HWD
   Meet the Brains Behind the Disney+ Content Flood
   By
   Joy Press
   HWD
   Jurassic World 3 Wrangles Jeff Goldblum, Laura Dern, Sam Neill to
   Return
   By
   Yohana Desta

   HWD

     *
     *
     *
     *
     *

   (BUTTON) More from Vanity Fair
     * Promotions
     * Newsletter
     * Subscribe
     * Digital Edition
     * Inside the Issue

   (BUTTON) Contact
     * Contact VF
     * Customer Service
     * Advertising
     * Careers

     * Condé Nast Store
     * Reprints / Permissions
     * VF Media Kit
     * Sitemap
     * Accessibility Help

   © 2019 Condé Nast. All rights reserved. Use of this site constitutes
   acceptance of our User Agreement (updated 5/25/18) and Privacy Policy
   and Cookie Statement (updated 5/25/18) and Your California Privacy
   Rights. Vanity Fair may earn a portion of sales from products that are
   purchased through our site as part of our Affiliate Partnerships with
   retailers. The material on this site may not be reproduced,
   distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the
   prior written permission of Condé Nast. Ad Choices

   CN Entertainment
   [United States]

   IFRAME: https://js-sec.indexww.com/um/ixmatch.html
   IFRAME: https://www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-KSG89LT

   Skip to main content
   (BUTTON) Open Navigation Menu

   The Hive
   Sign In
     * Subscribe

   Search
     * HIVE
          + Business
          + Technology
          + Politics
          + The Players
     * HWD
          + Movies
          + Television
          + Awards
          + Reviews
     * VANITIES
          + Celebrity
          + Fashion
          + Beauty
          + Royals
     * COMPLETE ARCHIVE

   (BUTTON) Close Related Items Drawer
     * Hive

Report: Trump Wanted to Obliterate the U.S. Economy to Get Revenge on China
       By
       Bess Levin
     * Hive

The Virtual Border Wall Business Is Booming For Palmer Luckey
       By
       Eric Lutz
     * Hive

Is Trump Just Bluffing About Striking Iran?
       By
       Eric Lutz
     * Hive

Trump Blames Tariff Consequences on Companies Making “Excuses”
       By
       Kevin Fitzpatrick

   Trade War

Trump’s Cold War with China Could Literally Break the Internet

   Worsening tensions could push China to split from Silicon Valley,
   raising the specter of a completely bifurcated digital world.
   By
   Eric Lutz
   May 22, 2019
     *
     *
     *

   President of Honor a subbrand of Chinese telecommunications company
   Huawei George Zhao shows off an Honor 20 Pro smartphone.
   President of Honor, a sub-brand of Chinese telecommunications company
   Huawei, George Zhao, shows off an Honor 20 Pro smartphone.By TOLGA
   AKMEN/AFP/Getty Images.
     *
     *
     *

   The tech cold war between the United States and China is continuing to
   escalate. Just days after the Trump administration blacklisted China’s
   largest tech firm, Huawei, it’s reportedly weighing a ban against
   additional Chinese companies as part of its broader standoff with
   Beijing, cutting off their access to American technology. The move is
   likely to inflame tensions, and could accelerate the division between
   companies that rely on American tech, and those that use Chinese,
   potentially setting Beijing on a path to technological independence.
   “Even the briefest of bans will be proof to them that China can no
   longer rely on outsiders,” Bloomberg’s Tim Culpan wrote Sunday. “This
   can only accelerate the process of creating a digital iron curtain that
   separates the world into two distinct, mutually exclusive technological
   spheres.”

   The standoff has been brewing for months as Donald Trump battles
   Chinese President Xi Jinping over a relationship the president says has
   “taken so advantage” of the U.S., but it boiled over last week when the
   administration blacklisted Huawei, accusing the Chinese tech giant of
   being “involved in activities contrary to the national security or
   foreign policy interests of the United States”—namely, helping the
   Chinese government engage in foreign espionage. Major western tech
   companies including Google and chipmakers like Intel and Qualcomm have
   cut off supply to Huawei. Still, China has stood firm. On Monday,
   Huawei founder Ren Zhengfei said the administration “underestimates”
   China’s strength and welcomed the fight as step toward global tech
   domination. “We have sacrificed ourselves and our families for our
   ideal: to stand on top of the world,” Ren told Chinese media. “To reach
   this ideal, sooner or later there will be conflict with the U.S.”

   That conflict has already hurt Huawei, and could bring some pain to
   American companies that do business with the world’s second-largest
   economy, as the Associated Press noted Tuesday. But in the longer term,
   it could spur China to greater independence from the U.S., raising the
   specter of the bifurcated internet that Eric Schmidt—the former C.E.O.
   of Google’s parent company, Alphabet—and others have predicted. “I
   think the most likely scenario now is not a splintering,” Schmidt said
   last year, “but rather a bifurcation into a Chinese-led internet and a
   non-Chinese internet led by America.” China has already set 2025 as its
   target for technological independence. If it no longer sees the U.S. as
   a reliable partner, it is ever more likely to begin a push to
   manufacture all its products domestically. Such bifurcation could
   change the tech sphere as we know it, creating not only different
   digital universes for different populations (a censored Web in
   authoritarian China, and a free Web everywhere else), but different
   megalithic hardware companies, depending on the region.

   Tensions are already high between the countries over the Huawei
   dispute, but they’re likely to grow as the U.S. considers adding to the
   blacklist. Hikvision, the world’s largest manufacturer of video
   surveillance equipment and one of the companies that could fall under
   the axe, has faced bipartisan scrutiny in the U.S. over its role in the
   Chinese government’s use of artificial intelligence to track and
   control its minority Muslim population. But the move has drawn
   condemnation from Beijing, which is accusing the administration of
   “arbitrarily” hitting at Chinese industry to gain an upper hand in its
   trade war. “China opposes the United States’s practice of abusing state
   power and arbitrarily discrediting and suppressing foreign enterprises,
   including Chinese enterprises, Lu Kang, a spokesperson for the Chinese
   foreign ministry, said in a briefing Wednesday.
   Most Popular
     * News
       Trump’s Personal Assistant Is Leaving the White House
       By
       Tina Nguyen
     * News
       GOP Strategists Fear Trump’s “Pocahontas” Thing Isn’t Working
       By
       Tina Nguyen
     * News
       Mark Sanford Is Trump’s Next 2020 Republican Challenger
       By
       Kevin Fitzpatrick

   Read More
   Hive
   Report: Trump Wanted to Obliterate the U.S. Economy to Get Revenge on
   China
   By
   Bess Levin
   Hive
   Trump Blames Tariff Consequences on Companies Making “Excuses”
   By
   Kevin Fitzpatrick
   Hive
   Can Elizabeth Warren Pass the Blackjewel Test?
   By
   T.A. Frank
   Hive
   Aides Admit Trump Was Faking Those “Phone Calls” With China
   By
   Tina Nguyen

   The Hive

     *
     *
     *
     *
     *

   (BUTTON) More from Vanity Fair
     * Promotions
     * Newsletter
     * Subscribe
     * Digital Edition
     * Inside the Issue

   (BUTTON) Contact
     * Contact VF
     * Customer Service
     * Advertising
     * Careers

     * Condé Nast Store
     * Reprints / Permissions
     * VF Media Kit
     * Sitemap
     * Accessibility Help

   © 2019 Condé Nast. All rights reserved. Use of this site constitutes
   acceptance of our User Agreement (updated 5/25/18) and Privacy Policy
   and Cookie Statement (updated 5/25/18) and Your California Privacy
   Rights. Vanity Fair may earn a portion of sales from products that are
   purchased through our site as part of our Affiliate Partnerships with
   retailers. The material on this site may not be reproduced,
   distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the
   prior written permission of Condé Nast. Ad Choices

   CN Entertainment
   [United States]

   IFRAME: https://js-sec.indexww.com/um/ixmatch.html
   IFRAME: https://www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-KSG89LT

   Skip to main content
   (BUTTON) Open Navigation Menu

   Vanity Fair
   Sign In
     * Subscribe

   Search
     * HIVE
          + Business
          + Technology
          + Politics
          + The Players
     * HWD
          + Movies
          + Television
          + Awards
          + Reviews
     * VANITIES
          + Celebrity
          + Fashion
          + Beauty
          + Royals
     * COMPLETE ARCHIVE

   (BUTTON) Close Related Items Drawer
     * HWD

The Biggest Threat to Biden’s Campaign? “His Own Mouth,” Says Colbert
       By
       Laura Bradley
     * Vanities

Priyanka Chopra, Nicholas Braun, and Nicky Hilton Rothschild Kick Off Fashion
Week at Vanity Fair’s Best-Dressed List Party
       By
       Erin Vanderhoof
     * HWD

Is Richard Linklater Planning a Boyhood-Style Musical With Beanie Feldstein
and Ben Platt?
       By
       Yohana Desta
     * HWD

Colbert Presses Biden on His Gaffes: “Are You Going Nuts?”
       By
       Laura Bradley

   In Conversation

Jake Gyllenhaal Is Big on Exfoliation and Gary Shteyngart–Style Narcissism

   The actor, now on Broadway in the two-man show Sea Wall/A Life,
   reprises his role as the face of Calvin Klein Eternity for this month’s
   new eau de parfum. Not that he needs it. “I do believe in showering as
   a spiritual practice and a physical practice.”
   By
   Laura Regensdorf
   September 9, 2019
     *
     *
     *

   Jake Gyllenhaal
   By Taylor Jewell/Invision/AP/Shutterstock.
     *
     *
     *

   Jake Gyllenhaal thinks I’m hot. He said as much one afternoon this
   summer, while we were sitting at a two-top on the back patio of Lucali,
   the Brooklyn pizza joint with the perpetual mile-long wait list. (He’s
   a regular. The owner, Mark Iacono, had opened up early and was already
   churning out pies.) Or rather, the actor’s actual words were, “You
   might want to use that.” He was holding out a paper napkin with one
   hand, as the other pantomimed a fanning gesture. A pearlescent sweat
   mustache dotted my upper lip, and Gyllenhaal had apparently taken
   notice. Of my hotness.

   I peeled off my blazer, casting aside a flush of embarrassment. It was
   summer in the city, and a wood-fired oven was blazing inside. Besides,
   isn’t that what a perceptive actor is supposed to take in: the subtle
   discomfort of his wilting tablemate?

   In a way, that is what Gyllenhaal has been doing every night at the
   Hudson Theatre since the two-man Broadway show, Sea Wall/A Life, began
   previews in late July. It’s a diptych of grief stories: a gut punch of
   a monologue delivered by Tom Sturridge, followed by an antic solo turn
   by Gyllenhaal, who plays a thirty-something toggling between losing a
   dad and welcoming a son. (“I read somewhere that to be born is to risk
   death,” his character says, the weight of fatherhood looming.) But even
   on an empty stage, Gyllenhaal is hardly alone. “I have never done a
   show where I speak to the audience the entire time,” he says,
   describing an unusual cocoon of intimacy in the thousand-seat venue
   (four times what the production first counted when it ran Off-Broadway
   this past spring). “We don’t have any rules in our show. Whatever
   happens, happens.”

   Like what? “A phone goes off. A lot of actors would be
   like”—Gyllenhaal’s voice slides into mock effrontery—“ ‘How dare you
   destroy the sanctity of the sacred space of theater.’ “ He credits the
   director Carrie Cracknell with holding the two men to task. “Every time
   it felt like we were performing, she’d call us on bullshit, and so in
   that sense, the idea that we’re separate from the audience also feels
   like bullshit. If something happens that’s human—particularly when
   we’re talking about the mess of being human—it makes no sense to try
   and pretend like it doesn’t exist.” That’s why he comically apologizes,
   mid-play, as he wiggles past the front row. I wonder if he’s ever
   extended a tissue to a crying theatergoer. Or a perspiring one.

   But what brought us to Lucali (besides the promise of a good slice) was
   a different kind of role: Gyllenhaal as the face of Calvin Klein
   Eternity. In 2017 he played the family man in a Cary Fukunaga-directed
   commercial, opposite Liya Kebede and their fictional child. (The
   internet gushed about Gyllenhaal’s “hot dad” moment, but in reality
   he's the hot uncle to his sister Maggie's kids.) Now, Gyllenhaal is
   fronting a more intense eau de parfum version. Is it a bit like when a
   well-received show transfers to Broadway? “I’m totally willing to make
   that connection,” he said with a laugh—and totally willing to talk
   about cinematic scents, fictional narcissism, and his own preferred way
   to sweat.

   Vanity Fair: Fatherhood is a recurring theme, in the play and in that
   original Eternity campaign. Has your family been laying on the
   pressure?

   Jake Gyllenhaal: My dad in particular just was fascinated with the
   choice [of] being a father in an ad. He was like, “So what is this all
   about?” When the Calvin Klein team brought it up to me, what felt a lot
   more interesting was the idea of family, outside of selling a fragrance
   with sex. It was obviously the implication of sex because there was a
   child, but the child was a product of love. A lot of the roles I do are
   me asking myself questions, and I can’t separate—whether it be an
   advertisement or a movie—being honest from any of those things. And I
   love my nieces, I love sort of the idea of having my own child, so I
   wanted to explore that. I’m doing a show on Broadway that’s about being
   a son, being a father, and I think I’m at a place in my life where my
   parents are at a certain age and our positions start to change. My
   parents have made movies themselves, and my mom in particular was
   always asking questions about family and exploring that idea.
   Most Popular
     * Hollywood
       It: Chapter Two: Why Jessica Chastain Was Covered in 4,500 Gallons
       of Fake Blood
       By
       Paul Chi
     * Hollywood
       In Judy, Renée Zellweger Zooms Over the Rainbow
       By
       K. Austin Collins
     * Hollywood
       Adam Sandler Sparkles in the Safdie Brothers’ Uncut Gems
       By
       K. Austin Collins

   Advertisement

   I’m just in the middle of Sheila Heti’s Motherhood, and the book deals
   with the idea of being an artist or a mother, and whether one
   sublimates the other.

   Well, I watch someone like Stephen Sondheim, who I would say is the
   preeminent poet-lyricist of our time, particularly in musical
   theater—and he’s birthed child after child with his creations. I did
   one of his shows [Sunday in the Park with George], and the first act is
   about an artist’s being obsessed with their work and not being able to
   commit to their life. And then in the second act—this is my
   interpretation—is an artist who was well renowned, made a lot of money,
   but wasn’t, as my high school art history teacher said, a
   "meta-historical artist" that transcends decades and generations. And
   yet he discovers at the end of that show that making a family is his
   triumph. The only things we leave behind are children and art, and that
   is the never-ending question.

   Given the themes of Sea Wall/A Life, is there a lingering heaviness
   that you need to, say, exorcise in the bathtub at night?

   No. I’m a real wonderful mess, you know? I’ve learned to accept a lot
   about myself. I’ve put myself through a lot of weird physical things
   for roles I’ve done, emotional things for roles I’ve done. The other
   day Carrie [Cracknell, the director] was like, "Both of you looked
   wrecked at the end of that [Off-Broadway] run." And it’s interesting
   because I’ve never laughed so much in my life. Yet the energy you’re
   exchanging does take it from you. I do believe in showering as a
   spiritual practice and a physical practice. Since working in South
   Korea on a movie, I’ve found exfoliation to be a really wonderful, very
   manly thing, which I didn’t appreciate as much before.

   Clearly you’re invested in taking care of yourself. Are there things
   you do for wellness, and then things you call bullshit on?

   I think it’s all bullshit if you want it to be bullshit, and it’s not
   if you don’t. I feel that way about pretty much everything as long as
   you’re not hurting anyone. I believe in sweat, in whatever form. For
   me, my best form of self-care is intimacy; that makes me sweat. And
   then I believe in the balance of rest and exercise. It’s really that
   simple for me. Because I have an older sister who is an actor—and
   because she has taught me since I was a kid and I’ve looked up to
   her—skin care is important. People can definitely get me for that, but
   you’d be laughing your way to wherever. I think caring for yourself is
   really important, particularly nowadays as men. Being vulnerable and
   admitting those vulnerabilities is very, very important.

   Some actors use scent to help get into character. Have you ever done
   that, whether with forest-y scents or unshowered stink?

   I’ve used and tried it all. Nothing works. In the end, it’s all about
   good writing.

   On the flip side, John Waters gave the audience scratch-and-sniff
   Odorama cards for Polyester. If you could imagine a film of yours that
   deserves a scratch-and-sniff card, what would it be?

   I’m thinking of Zeffirelli’s Romeo and Juliet—what that
   scratch-and-sniff card would smell like, because if it smells the way
   that movie looks, my god. And Nightcrawler—new leather car smells. It
   has top notes of blood and fecal matter.

   John Waters would definitely approve.

   Yes, he would!

   Tell me about the upcoming adaptation of Gary Shteyngart's Lake
   Success. It seems like slipping into a character that narcissistic is
   perhaps less appealing than the father role for Eternity?
   Most Popular
     * Hollywood
       It: Chapter Two: Why Jessica Chastain Was Covered in 4,500 Gallons
       of Fake Blood
       By
       Paul Chi
     * Hollywood
       In Judy, Renée Zellweger Zooms Over the Rainbow
       By
       K. Austin Collins
     * Hollywood
       Adam Sandler Sparkles in the Safdie Brothers’ Uncut Gems
       By
       K. Austin Collins

   Advertisement

   I do want to try that on. In fact, I live in it all the time—we
   subscribe to it daily and hourly, minute by minute. I’m really
   fascinated to explore someone who is a narcissist and who is obsessed
   with capitalism and all the trappings around it. Is it possible to pull
   someone from that, into their humanness? Are we too far gone? Gary’s
   writing—that you love him and understand something about him even as
   you are disgusted—I just think that’s so human. We live in a world
   where there are a lot of black-and-whites, and the spectrum really
   doesn’t exist in many other spaces.

   You joined Instagram recently, and it's a similarly sanitized space.
   You don’t see a lot of the uncomfortable.

   I totally agree. In my world, there are a lot of people tailoring
   themselves and altering the beautiful parts of their personalities to
   show people something that is probably not fully true. I’ve done it for
   many years in different ways, and I think my desire to be a part of
   something like Instagram is just to say, "I am a part of everything
   with everyone." I don’t want to isolate myself in some idea of what an
   artist is supposed to be. If I’m interested in the unknown in my work,
   Instagram is an unknown to me. Why would I avoid it? And I’m
   discovering some interesting things! I say that with a wink. Curiosity
   is everything, and if we lose it, we’re fucked.

   Read More
   HWD
   A Close Look at The Irishman’s Younger-Looking, but Still World-Weary,
   Robert De Niro
   By
   Anthony Breznican
   HWD
   What a Kevin Feige Star Wars Movie Might Look Like
   By
   Anthony Breznican
   Hive
   Facebook May Be Getting Yet Another Antitrust Headache
   By
   Alison Durkee
   Hive
   “We Are Always Fucked”: Agita at New York Magazine as Pam Wasserstein
   Sells to Vox
   By
   Joe Pompeo

   Vanity Fair

     *
     *
     *
     *
     *

   (BUTTON) More from Vanity Fair
     * Promotions
     * Newsletter
     * Subscribe
     * Digital Edition
     * Inside the Issue

   (BUTTON) Contact
     * Contact VF
     * Customer Service
     * Advertising
     * Careers

     * Condé Nast Store
     * Reprints / Permissions
     * VF Media Kit
     * Sitemap
     * Accessibility Help

   © 2019 Condé Nast. All rights reserved. Use of this site constitutes
   acceptance of our User Agreement (updated 5/25/18) and Privacy Policy
   and Cookie Statement (updated 5/25/18) and Your California Privacy
   Rights. Vanity Fair may earn a portion of sales from products that are
   purchased through our site as part of our Affiliate Partnerships with
   retailers. The material on this site may not be reproduced,
   distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the
   prior written permission of Condé Nast. Ad Choices

   CN Entertainment
   [United States]

   IFRAME: https://js-sec.indexww.com/um/ixmatch.html
   IFRAME: https://www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-KSG89LT

   Skip to main content
   (BUTTON) Open Navigation Menu

   Vanity Fair
   Sign In
     * Subscribe

   Search
     * HIVE
          + Business
          + Technology
          + Politics
          + The Players
     * HWD
          + Movies
          + Television
          + Awards
          + Reviews
     * VANITIES
          + Celebrity
          + Fashion
          + Beauty
          + Royals
     * COMPLETE ARCHIVE

   (BUTTON) Close Related Items Drawer
     * Prince Harry and the Queen Dropped the SocialMedia Mic on Barack
       and
       Star Wars

Prince William and Prince Harry May Be Stormtroopers in the Next Star Wars
Movie
       By
       Josh Duboff
     * PRINCESS PRIDE Princesses Elizabeth and Margaret and their corgis
       in the Welsh Cottage of Royal Lodge.
       FROM THE MAGAZINE

A Royal Family Friend Recalls the Bond Between Queen Elizabeth and Her Sister
       By
       Reinaldo Herrera
     * Prince Harry and the Queen Dropped the SocialMedia Mic on Barack
       and
       The Queen Turns 90

Why Queen Elizabeth Has Two Different Birthdays
       By
       Josh Duboff
     * Vanities

The Queen’s Staff Is “Cock-a-Hoop” Over a Long-Awaited Raise
       By
       Erin Vanderhoof

   Royal Watch

Prince Harry and the Queen Dropped the Social-Media Mic on Barack and
Michelle Obama

   “Boom, really, please.”
   By
   Katie Nicholl
   April 29, 2016
     *
     *
     *

     *
     *
     *

     https://twitter.com/KensingtonRoyal/status/726062251354914817

   It’s not the first time the Queen has shown the world she has a sense
   of humor, but it’s definitely one of the funniest moments we can
   recall. In a video destined to go viral, Prince Harry convinced his
   grandmother to watch a message from the president and First Lady ahead
   of the much anticipated Invictus Games in Orlando—on camera!

   In what has been dubbed a “Prince Harry Production” by Kensington
   Palace, the prince arranged for the cameras to be allowed into Windsor
   Castle last Wednesday, and, being the good sport that she is, the Queen
   agreed. Harry and his 90-year-old grandmother were filmed in a sitting
   room at Windsor Castle looking through the Invictus Games brochure when
   Harry’s iPhone goes off.

   As a message from Michelle Obama pops onto his screen, the Queen, in a
   cardigan and pearls, leans in for a better look. The Obamas, who last
   week visited the Queen at Windsor Castle for lunch, ping into view.

   “Hey Prince Harry,” says a stern looking Michelle, arms crossed
   standing next to her husband. “Remember when you told us to bring it at
   the Invictus Games?”

   “Careful what you wish for,” interjects the president waving his finger
   as a team of serviceman joke around in the background and one says
   “boom.”

   “Boom, really, please,” remarks the Queen, deadpan.   Yes, it’s
   definitely Her Majesty and, yes, it’s almost as good as the time the
   Queen allowed James Bond (a.k.a. Daniel Craig) into Buckingham Palace
   to film a secret cameo for the Olympics Opening ceremony.
   Prince Harry and the Queen Dropped the SocialMedia Mic on Barack and

   We can’t stop playing it. And it’s great to see Prince Harry on
   Twitter. The prince has said he isn’t a fan, but perhaps he’ll be as
   hooked as the rest of the world now he’s sent his first tweet.
   Most Popular
     * Prince Harry and the Queen Dropped the SocialMedia Mic on Barack
       and
       Star Wars
       Prince William and Prince Harry May Be Stormtroopers in the Next
       Star Wars Movie
       By
       Josh Duboff
     * PRINCESS PRIDE Princesses Elizabeth and Margaret and their corgis
       in the Welsh Cottage of Royal Lodge.
       FROM THE MAGAZINE
       A Royal Family Friend Recalls the Bond Between Queen Elizabeth and
       Her Sister
       By
       Reinaldo Herrera
     * Prince Harry and the Queen Dropped the SocialMedia Mic on Barack
       and
       The Queen Turns 90
       Why Queen Elizabeth Has Two Different Birthdays
       By
       Josh Duboff

   Read More
   Prince Harry and the Queen Dropped the SocialMedia Mic on Barack and
   Star Wars
   Prince William and Prince Harry May Be Stormtroopers in the Next Star
   Wars Movie
   By
   Josh Duboff
   PRINCESS PRIDE Princesses Elizabeth and Margaret and their corgis in
   the Welsh Cottage of Royal Lodge.
   FROM THE MAGAZINE
   A Royal Family Friend Recalls the Bond Between Queen Elizabeth and Her
   Sister
   By
   Reinaldo Herrera
   Prince Harry and the Queen Dropped the SocialMedia Mic on Barack and
   The Queen Turns 90
   Why Queen Elizabeth Has Two Different Birthdays
   By
   Josh Duboff
   HWD
   A Close Look at The Irishman’s Younger-Looking, but Still World-Weary,
   Robert De Niro
   By
   Anthony Breznican

   Vanity Fair

     *
     *
     *
     *
     *

   (BUTTON) More from Vanity Fair
     * Promotions
     * Newsletter
     * Subscribe
     * Digital Edition
     * Inside the Issue

   (BUTTON) Contact
     * Contact VF
     * Customer Service
     * Advertising
     * Careers

     * Condé Nast Store
     * Reprints / Permissions
     * VF Media Kit
     * Sitemap
     * Accessibility Help

   © 2019 Condé Nast. All rights reserved. Use of this site constitutes
   acceptance of our User Agreement (updated 5/25/18) and Privacy Policy
   and Cookie Statement (updated 5/25/18) and Your California Privacy
   Rights. Vanity Fair may earn a portion of sales from products that are
   purchased through our site as part of our Affiliate Partnerships with
   retailers. The material on this site may not be reproduced,
   distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the
   prior written permission of Condé Nast. Ad Choices

   CN Entertainment
   [United States]

   IFRAME: https://js-sec.indexww.com/um/ixmatch.html
    ____________________
     * HIVE
     * HWD
     * VANITIES
     * COMPLETE ARCHIVE

     * Sign In
     * Newsletter
     * Video
     * VF Store
     * Magazine

   (BUTTON)

   Cover Story
   Hollywood

Star Wars: The Rise of Skywalker, The Ultimate Preview

After four decades, Star Wars is drawing to its epic conclusion. Lev Grossman
goes behind the scenes with director J.J. Abrams and the cast for the inside
scoop on The Rise of Skywalker. With exclusive photographs by Annie
Leibovitz.


    Lev Grossman


    Annie Leibovitz

   May 22, 2019 8:15 AM
   SHOOTING STARS
   Director J. J. Abrams sets up a shot of Daisy Ridley (Rey) in Jordan’s
   Wadi Rum desert, the setting for the planet Pasaana. In the desert,
   says Abrams, “there’s something about the way the sand interacts with
   the light.”
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.

   There’s a desert valley in southern Jordan called Wadi Rum, or
   sometimes “the Valley of the Moon.” There are stone inscriptions in
   Wadi Rum that are more than 2,000 years old. Lawrence of Arabia passed
   through there during the Arab Revolt against the Ottoman Empire. More
   recently, J. J. Abrams went there to film parts of the latest Star Wars
   movie, The Rise of Skywalker, because it’s largely uninhabited and
   starkly beautiful and looks plausibly alien, and one of the things that
   has always made the Star Wars movies feel so real—as if they had a real
   life of their own that continues on out beyond the edges of the
   screen—is the way they’re shot on location, with as few digital effects
   as possible. George Lucas shot the Tatooine scenes from A New Hope in
   southern Tunisia. For Skywalker, it’s Wadi Rum.

   They don’t do it that way because it’s easy. Abrams and his crew had to
   build miles of road into the desert. They basically had to set up a
   small town out there, populated by the cast and extras and crew—the
   creature-effects department alone had 70 people. The Jordanian military
   got involved. The Jordanian royal family got involved. There was sand.
   There were sandstorms, when all you could do was take cover and huddle
   in your tent and—if you’re John Boyega, who plays the ex-Stormtrooper
   Finn—listen to reggae.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.

   But in a way that’s the whole point: you’re out there so the world can
   get up in your grill and make its presence felt on film. “It’s the
   things that you can’t anticipate—the imperfections,” says Oscar Isaac,
   who plays the Resistance pilot Poe Dameron. “It’s very difficult to
   design imperfection, and the imperfections that you have in these
   environments immediately create a sense of authenticity. You just
   believe it more.” When Isaac arrived in Wadi Rum for his first week of
   shooting, Abrams had set up a massive greenscreen in the middle of the
   desert. “And I was like, ‘J. J., can I ask you a question? I notice
   we’re shooting on greenscreen.’ And he’s like, ‘So why the hell are we
   in the desert?’ And I’m like, ‘Yeah!’ And he said, ‘Well, because look:
   the way that the sand interacts with the light, and the type of shots
   you would set up—if you were designing the shot on a computer you would
   never even think to do that.’ There’s something about the way that the
   light and the environment and everything plays together.” It’s that
   something, the presence and the details and the analog imperfections of
   a real nondigital place, that makes Star Wars so powerful.

   It was powerful enough to bring 65,000 people to Chicago in April for
   Star Wars Celebration, a fan convention where you could see a giant
   Stormtrooper head made out of 36,440 tiny Lego Stormtrooper
   mini-figures, which is a world record of some kind, though I’m not sure
   exactly what, and where people were dressed up as Muppets who were
   themselves dressed up as Star Wars characters. But the main event was
   the launch of the trailer for The Rise of Skywalker, which was held in
   a 10,000-seat arena and was such a big deal that even though the
   trailer was going to be released on the Internet literally seconds
   after it was over, I—an at least theoretically respectable member of
   the media—was not only tagged, wristbanded, escorted, and
   metal-detected, but sniffed by a K-9 unit before I could go in.

   I sat down with Abrams a couple of hours later. For the occasion, he
   was wearing a suit so black and sharp, he could have been doing Men in
   Black cosplay, but his most distinctive feature is his dark curly hair,
   which is upswept in a way that is only slightly suggestive of devil
   horns. Abrams talks rapidly, as if he can barely keep up with the
   things his racing brain is telling him to say. When I told him that not
   only was Star Wars the No. 1 trending topic on Twitter, but that all 10
   of the Top 10 trending topics were Star Wars–related, and that he
   personally was No. 5, he was visibly stunned.

   Then he recovered enough to say: “Well, I aspire to No. 4.” (For the
   record, No. 4 was the late Supreme Leader Snoke, who frankly did seem
   beatable. If you’re curious, No. 11 was pro golfer Zach Johnson, who
   had just accidentally hit his ball with a practice swing at the
   Masters. Life goes on.)
   J.J. Abrams, alongside Stunt Coordinator Eunice Huthart, directs the
   Knights of Ren; elite fearsome enforcers of Kylo Ren’s dark will.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.

   Disney executives talk about how important it is to “event-ize” Star
   Wars movies; i.e., to make them feel not just like movies but like
   seriously momentous occasions. They won’t have much trouble with this
   one: The Rise of Skywalker isn’t just the last movie in the Star Wars
   trilogy that began in 2015 with The Force Awakens; it’s the last movie
   in a literal, actual trilogy of trilogies that started with the very
   first Star Wars movie back in 1977, which began the saga of the
   Skywalker family. The Rise of Skywalker will finally, after 42 years,
   bring that saga to an end.
   FIRST LOOK
   Vanity Fair reveals Keri Russell as the masked scoundrel Zorri Bliss,
   seen in the Thieves’ Quarter of the snow-dusted world Kijimi.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.

   We all thought the story was over in 1983 with Return of the Jedi, and
   then we really thought it was over in 2005 with Revenge of the Sith.
   But Star Wars has always been an unruly beast, too big and powerful
   (and profitable) to be contained in one movie, or even in a trilogy, or
   even in two trilogies, let alone numberless novels, TV shows, comics,
   video games, Happy Meals, and so on. Now Abrams has to gather all those
   threads and bring closure to a story that was started by somebody else,
   in an America that feels a very long time ago indeed. “That’s the
   challenge of this movie,” Abrams says. “It wasn’t just to make one film
   that as a stand-alone experience would be thrilling, and scary, and
   emotional, and funny, but one that if you were to watch all nine of the
   films, you’d feel like, Well, of course—that!”

   Like a lot of things that we now can’t imagine life without, Star Wars
   came really close to never happening in the first place. In 1971, Lucas
   was a serious young auteur just five years out of film school at U.S.C.
   He had only one full-length movie on his résumé, and that was THX 1138,
   which is the kind of visionary but grindingly earnest science-fiction
   epic that only the French could love. (They were pretty much the only
   ones who did.) Everybody expected Lucas to go on and make serious,
   gritty 1970s cinema like his peers, Brian De Palma and Francis Ford
   Coppola. At the time Lucas and Coppola were actively planning a radical
   epic set in Vietnam with the provocative title Apocalypse Now.
   FORCE MAJEURE
   First Order leaders General Hux (Domhnall Gleeson) and Allegiant
   General Pryde (Richard E. Grant) on the bridge of Kylo Ren’s destroyer.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.

   But Coppola would have to finish that one on his own, because Lucas
   went a different way. “I had decided there was no modern mythology,” he
   said in 1997. “I wanted to take old myths and put them into a new
   format that young people could relate to. Mythology always existed in
   unusual, unknown environments, so I chose space.” Lucas tried to
   acquire the rights to Flash Gordon (that would’ve been a dark timeline
   indeed), but when he couldn’t, he came up with his own original
   science-fictional epic instead. He called it The Star Wars. Like The
   Facebook, it would have to shed a direct article on its way to glory.

   Even though American Graffiti had made Lucas a bankable director, Star
   Wars still came together slowly. In the first draft, Luke was an old
   man, Leia was 14, and Han Solo was “a huge green-skinned monster with
   no nose and large gills.” Fox executives were baffled by Star Wars, and
   they squeezed Lucas relentlessly for time and money. We forget now how
   jerry-rigged the first movie was: the cantina aliens weren’t finished,
   and the monumental Star Destroyer that dominates the opening shot is,
   in reality, about three feet long. The Death Star interior is basically
   one set re-arranged several different ways. To make Greedo’s mouth
   move, the woman in the Greedo suit had to hold a clothespin in her
   mouth. “What I remember about working on the first film,” says John
   Williams, the legendary soundtrack composer, “is the fact that I didn’t
   ever think there would be a second film.” (He also, like everybody
   else, thought Luke and Leia were going to get together, so he wrote
   them a love theme.)

   But wherever real mythology comes from, Lucas had gone there and
   brought something back alive. People wanted movies that gave them
   something to believe in instead of relentlessly autopsying the beliefs
   that had failed them. We’d had enough of antiheroes. We needed some
   anti-antiheroes. “I realized after THX that people don’t care about how
   the country’s being ruined,” Lucas said. “We’ve got to regenerate
   optimism.” Like American Graffiti, Star Wars is a work of profound
   nostalgia, a post-Vietnam, post-Watergate anthem of longing for the
   restoration of a true and just power in the universe—the return of the
   king. And at the same time it’s a very personal hero’s journey, about a
   boy who must put right the sins of his father and master the strange
   power he finds within himself, and in doing so become a man.

   Star Wars is also an incredibly enduring vision of what it’s like to
   live in a world of super-advanced technology. Science fiction often
   ages badly, turning into kitsch or camp—just look at Flash Gordon—but
   Star Wars hasn’t. More than any filmmaker before him, Lucas
   successfully imagined what a science-fictional world would feel like to
   somebody who was actually inside it—which is to say, it would look as
   ordinary and workaday as the present. He even shot it like it was real,
   working close-in and mostly eschewing wide establishing shots, more
   like a documentary or a newsreel than a space opera. “It feels very
   grounded,” says Naomi Ackie, who’s making her Star Wars debut in
   Skywalker playing a character named Jannah, about whom she is allowed
   to say literally nothing. “There’s the kind of spectacular-ness, and
   the supernatural move-things-with-your-mind magic stuff, but then
   there’s also this really grounded, rugged nature where everything is
   distressed and old and kind of worn out and lived-in. And I think
   playing with those two ideas means that you get this feeling that it
   could almost be real. Like, in a galaxy far away, it could almost be
   the case that you could have this.”

   When Lucas made the first Star Wars sequel, The Empire Strikes Back, he
   cheekily labeled it Episode V, then went back and re-labeled the first
   movie as Episode IV, as if the movies were an old-fashioned serial that
   the rest of us were all just tuning in to. Around that time, he also
   started talking about Star Wars as a nine-part epic—so in 2012, when
   Lucas retired and sold Lucasfilm to Disney, it wasn’t exactly heresy
   that Disney announced more movies. At the time, Kathleen Kennedy had
   just been named co-chairperson of Lucasfilm, and she tapped Abrams to
   direct the first Disney-owned post-Lucas Star Wars movie. It was a bit
   like saying, Make the lightning strike again, please. Exactly here, if
   you could. Oh, and could you also earn back that $4 billion we just
   spent to buy Lucasfilm? (Narrator voice: He could.)

   At first blush, Abrams’s debut Star Wars movie, The Force Awakens,
   looked like an elaborate homage to the original. Just like in A New
   Hope, there’s a young Force-sensitive person on a poor desert
   planet—that’s Rey, played by Daisy Ridley—who finds a droid with a
   secret message that’s vital to the Rebellion (or wait, sorry, it’s the
   Resistance now). There’s a villain in a black mask, just like Darth
   Vader, except that it’s his grandson Kylo Ren (Adam Driver), né Ben
   Solo, son of Han and Leia. Kylo has a planet-killing weapon, much like
   the Death Star but way bigger, which becomes the target of a desperate
   attack by Resistance X-wings. There’s even a bar full of aliens.

     “This trilogy is about this young generation, this new generation,
     having to deal with all the debt that has come before.”

   Abrams also insisted on keeping to the analog aesthetic of the original
   trilogy: those aliens had to be latex and yak hair, not bits and bytes,
   and everything possible was shot on location using film cameras, not
   digital ones. Even Lucas had abandoned that approach by the time he
   made the second Star Wars trilogy, but many fans consider those movies
   to be a cautionary tale. “Famously, the prequels were mostly
   greenscreen environments,” Abrams says. “And that was George himself
   doing that, and it ended up looking exactly how he wanted it to
   look—and I always preferred the look of the original movies, because I
   just remember when you’re in the snow on Hoth, when you’re in the
   desert on Tatooine, and when you’re in the forests of Endor—it’s
   amazing. If you put a vaporator here, there, all of a sudden almost any
   natural location suddenly becomes a Star Wars location.”

   But the more interesting thing about The Force Awakens and its
   successor, The Last Jedi, written and directed by Rian Johnson, was how
   they subtly complicated Lucas’s vision. Thirty years have gone by since
   the ending of Return of the Jedi, during which time the newly reborn
   Republic became complacent and politically stagnant, allowing the rise
   of the reactionary neo-imperial First Order, whose origins we will
   learn more about in Skywalker. “It was almost like if the Argentine
   Nazis had sort of got together and actually started to bring that back
   in some real form,” Abrams says. Just like that, the rules of the Star
   Wars universe changed. It wasn’t all over when the Ewoks sang. Obi-Wan
   Kenobi and all those Bothans had died in vain. Even Han and Leia split
   up. It’s all a little less of a fairy tale now.

   The feather-haired godling Luke suffered the trauma of having a Padawan
   go bad on his watch. It’s an echo of what happened to his old mentor,
   Obi-Wan, with Anakin Skywalker, who became Darth Vader. But where
   Obi-Wan made peace with it, waiting serenely in the desert of Tatooine
   for the next Chosen One to arrive, Luke’s guilt curdled into shame. He
   hid himself away, so that his Chosen One, Rey, had to spend most of The
   Force Awakens searching for him, and then another whole movie
   convincing him with the help of Yoda’s Force ghost to keep the Jedi
   Order going at all. Star Wars arrived as an antidote to the
   disillusionment of the 1970s—but now, in its middle age, Star Wars is
   grappling with disillusionment of its own.
   DESERT POWER
   Joonas Suotamo (Chewbacca), Ridley, Anthony Daniels (C-3PO), and John
   Boyega (Finn) await the call to action for a chase scene.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.

   By dint of advanced Sith interrogation techniques, I was able to obtain
   valuable advance information about The Rise of Skywalker. Here it is:
   common emblem.

   Anthony Daniels, who plays C-3P0, is the only actor who has appeared in
   all nine movies of the Star Wars triple trilogy, so if anybody’s
   entitled to leak, it’s him. Daniels says he loved the script for The
   Rise of Skywalker, but he didn’t get it until the last minute, right
   before shooting started, and for some reason he just couldn’t memorize
   his part. “My first line would not go in my head!” he says. In person
   Daniels is like a C-3P0 whose preferences have been reset to charming
   and voluble. “The line that I couldn’t say was two words: ‘common
   emblem.’ Common emblem, common emblem—I would say them thousands of
   times. My wife would say it back. I just couldn’t say them!”

   Fortunately C-3P0’s mouth doesn’t move, so he could add the line in
   postproduction. Anyway, there’s the big scoop: “common emblem.” I don’t
   know what it means either. (Also I 100 percent guarantee that they will
   change the line before the movie comes out so that this scoop will end
   up being fake news.) Daniels also told me that C-3P0 does something in
   this movie that surprises everybody—but he wouldn’t say what. “He keeps
   his clothes on. It’s not like he suddenly does this thing, but …”

   The only other member of the old guard on the set this time was Billy
   Dee Williams, who plays the charismatic Lando Calrissian. At 82,
   Williams has lost none of his roguish charm, but now it comes wrapped
   in a kind of magisterial dignity. People tend to remember Lando for the
   deal he cut with Vader in The Empire Strikes Back, rather than for his
   redemptive comeback in Return of the Jedi, and Williams appears to have
   spent the last 45 years defending him. “He’s a survivor. It’s
   expediency for him,” Williams says. “You know, he was thrown into a
   situation which he didn’t look for and he had to try to figure out how
   to deal with an entity which is more than just a human.” And, he adds,
   with the weary air of somebody who has spent way too much time
   justifying the behavior of a fictional character, “nobody died!”
   HOT TAKE
   Members of the crew shade and shine Daniels, the only cast member to
   appear in all nine of the Skywalker films, while BB-8 looks on.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.

   Chewbacca is still here, too, but it’s not the same man in the suit.
   The original actor was Peter Mayhew, a seven-foot-three-inch gentle
   giant who was working as a hospital orderly in London when Lucas cast
   him in the first movie. Mayhew retired after The Force Awakens, and he
   died on April 30 at 74. His replacement is Joonas Suotamo, a
   fresh-faced former professional basketball player from Finland who
   always wanted to be an actor but was hard to cast because he’s six feet
   11 inches tall. “When I first met [Mayhew] he told me I was a wee bit
   too skinny,” Suotamo says. “But we also had a Wookiee boot camp, which
   lasted for a week. He told me all kinds of things about the moves that
   Chewbacca does, how they came to be and his reasoning behind them.”
   Suotamo has now played Chewbacca in four movies and enjoys it about as
   much as I’ve ever seen anybody enjoy anything. “It’s very much like
   silent-era film, with Buster Keaton and Charlie Chaplin,” he says.
   “He’s a mime character and that’s what he does, and I guess in that
   minimalism comes the beauty of the character.”

   Other things we know about Skywalker: We can safely assume that the
   Resistance and the First Order are headed toward a final smash, which
   will be a heavy lift for the good guys because, at the end of The Last
   Jedi, the Resistance was down, way down, to a double handful of
   survivors. They’ll face a First Order who suffered a stinging but
   largely symbolic loss at the Battle of Crait, and who, I feel
   confident, have learned something from the previous eight movies. The
   Empire built and lost two Death Stars. The First Order has already lost
   one super-weapon in The Force Awakens. Presumably it won’t make the
   same mistake twice, twice.

   But the stakes go even higher than that, cosmically high. Sources close
   to the movie say that Skywalker will at long last bring to a climax the
   millennia-long conflict between the Jedi Order and its dark shadow, the
   Sith.
   HORSING AROUND
   Finn and new ally Jannah (Naomi Ackie), atop hardy orbaks, lead the
   charge against the mechanized forces of the First Order. “It’s
   extremely surreal to be in it,” says Ackie, “and see how it works from
   the inside.”
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.
   STAR CROSSED
   Kylo Ren (Adam Driver) and Rey battle it out with lightsabers in a
   stormy confrontation. Their Force-connection—what Driver calls their
   “maybe-bond”—will turn out to run even deeper than previously revealed.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.

   The hottest area for speculation, however, is the identity of the
   titular Skywalker, because at this point there aren’t many Skywalkers
   left to rise. One is General Organa, the former Princess Leia, Luke’s
   sister—but Carrie Fisher, who plays her, passed away in 2016. That was
   a deeply painful loss for Abrams personally, but it also presented him
   with an impossible choice as a filmmaker. He needed Leia to tell the
   story, but Abrams didn’t feel like a digital Carrie Fisher could do the
   job, and there was no way Lucasfilm was going to re-cast the role.

   But then a strange thing happened. Abrams remembered that there was
   some footage of Fisher left over from The Force Awakens, scenes that
   had been changed or cut entirely, and he dug them up. “It’s hard to
   even talk about it without sounding like I’m being some kind of cosmic
   spiritual goofball,” Abrams says, “but it felt like we suddenly had
   found the impossible answer to the impossible question.” He started to
   write scenes around the old footage, fitting Leia’s dialogue into new
   contexts. He re-created the lighting to match the way Fisher had been
   lit. Bit by bit, she found her place in the new movie. “It was a
   bizarre kind of left side/right side of the brain sort of Venn diagram
   thing, of figuring out how to create the puzzle based on the pieces we
   had.” Fisher’s daughter, Billie Lourd, appears in the movies as a
   Resistance officer named Lieutenant Connix, and at first Abrams
   deliberately wrote her out of the scenes in case it was too painful—but
   Lourd said no, she wanted to be in them. “And so, there are moments
   where they’re talking; there are moments where they’re touching,”
   Abrams says. “There are moments in this movie where Carrie is there,
   and I really do feel there is an element of the uncanny, spiritual, you
   know, classic Carrie, that it would have happened this way, because
   somehow it worked. And I never thought it would.”

   The only other member of the surviving Skywalker bloodline—that we know
   of!—is Leia’s son and Luke’s former Padawan, the fallen Jedi Kylo Ren.
   Kylo probably isn’t capable of actual happiness, but things are
   definitely looking up for him: by the end of The Last Jedi he has taken
   control of the First Order and killed or at least outlived his actual
   father and both of his symbolic fathers-in-art, Luke and Supreme Leader
   Snoke. Sources at Disney also confirm that his long-rumored Knights of
   Ren will finally arrive in Skywalker. “And then he had been forging
   this maybe-bond with Rey,” Driver says, “and it kind of ends with the
   question in the air: is he going to pursue that relationship, or when
   the door of her ship goes up, does that also close that camaraderie
   that they were maybe forming?”
   SANDBLAST
   Camera operator Colin Anderson readies a take for a chase sequence
   spotlighting the heroics of Chewbacca, BB-8, and Rey.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.

   Darkness in the Star Wars movies tends to come from fear: for Anakin
   Skywalker, Kylo’s grandfather, it was his fear of losing his mother and
   his wife. After two movies it’s still not so easy to say exactly what
   Kylo Ren himself fears, even though he’s as operatically emo as Vader
   was stoic. He’s fixated on the past—he made a shrine to his own
   grandfather—but at the same time the past torments him. “Let the past
   die,” he tells Rey in The Last Jedi. “Kill it, if you have to. That’s
   the only way to become what you are meant to be.”

   Presumably whatever’s eating at Kylo started in his childhood: maybe
   being the kid of literally the two coolest people in the galaxy isn’t
   as fun as it sounds. Driver—who has obviously thought this through with
   a lot of rigor—points out that, as cool as they are, Han and Leia are
   both obsessively committed to lifestyles (smuggling, rebelling) that
   don’t leave much room for kids. He also points out that, unlike Luke
   and Rey, Kylo never got to go on a nifty voyage of self-discovery.
   Instead he grew up under the crushing pressure of massive expectations.
   “How do you form friendships out of that?” Driver says. “How do you
   understand the weight of that? And if there’s no one around you guiding
   you, or articulating things the right way … it can easily go awry.” By
   the emotional logic that governs the Star Wars universe—and also our
   own—Kylo Ren is going to have to confront the past, and his fears,
   whatever they are, or be destroyed by them.

   Where Lucas’s trilogies tended to follow the roots and branches of the
   Skywalker family tree—their personal saga was the saga of the galaxy
   writ small—the new movies have a slightly wider aperture and take in a
   new generation of heroes. There’s Rey, of course, who sources say will
   have progressed in her training since the end of The Last Jedi to the
   point where it’s almost complete. With that taken care of, all she has
   to do is reconstitute the entire Jedi Order from scratch, because as
   far as we know she’s the Last One.

   If Kylo Ren can’t be redeemed it will almost certainly fall to Rey to
   put him down, in spite of their maybe-bond. Their relationship is the
   closest thing the new trilogy has to a star-crossed love story on the
   order of Han and Leia: a source close to the movie says that their
   Force-connection will turn out to run even deeper than we thought.
   They’re uniquely suited to understand each other, but at the same time
   they are in every way each other’s inverse, down to Kylo’s perverse
   rejection of his family, which is the one thing Rey craves most. “I
   think there’s a part of Rey that’s like, dude, you fucking had it all,
   you had it all,” Ridley says. “That was always a big question during
   filming: you had it all and you let it go.”
   PUNCH IT!
   In a historic reunion, Lando Calrissian (Billy Dee Williams) retakes
   the helm of the Millennium Falcon, joined by Poe Dameron (Oscar Isaac),
   Chewbacca, D-O, and BB-8. “He’s a survivor,” Williams says of Lando.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.

   Rey is also, according to totally unsubstantiated Internet theories, a
   leading candidate to be the Skywalker of the title, pending some kind
   of head-snapping reveal about her ancestry. (For the record, the other
   leading unsubstantiated Internet theory has the “Skywalker” of the
   title referring to an entirely new order of Force users who will rise
   up and replace the Jedi.)

   Rey seems ready for it all, or as ready as anybody could be. “It’s nice
   having that shot at the beginning of the teaser,” Ridley says, over
   avocado toast at a fancy Chicago hotel, “because I think it’s quite a
   good visual representation of where she is now: confident, calm, less
   fearful.… It’s still sort of overwhelming, but in a different way. It
   feels more right—less like inevitable and more like there’s a focus to
   the journey.” Focus is a good word for Rey: on-screen Ridley’s dramatic
   eyebrows form a wickedly sharp arrow of concentration. I asked Ridley
   what she’s thinking about when Rey is using her Force powers, and it
   turns out Rey seems focused because Ridley is actually seriously
   focused. “I literally visualize it. When I was lifting rocks I was
   visualizing the rocks moving. And then I was like, Oh, my God, I made
   it happen! And obviously there’s loads of rocks on strings, so, no, I
   didn’t. But I visualize that it’s really going on.” (That scene, which
   comes at the end of The Last Jedi, is another example of classic
   nondigital Star Wars effects: those were real rocks. “It was actually
   really amazing,” Ridley says. “It was sort of like a baby mobile.”)

   There’s also Finn, the apostate Stormtrooper, played by the
   irrepressible Boyega, who in person practically vibrates with energy
   and speaks with a South London accent very different from Finn’s
   American one. In some ways Finn has gone through a complete character
   arc already: he confronted his past—by beating down his old boss,
   Captain Phasma—and found his courage and his moral center. He has had a
   tendency to panic, if not actively desert, in clutch situations, but at
   the Battle of Crait he proved that he was past that. “I think he’s just
   an active member of the Resistance now,” Boyega says. “Episode Eight,
   he couldn’t decide what team he was fighting for. But since then he’s
   made a clear decision.” (Cast members tend to refer to the Star Wars
   movies by their episode numbers: four is the original movie, seven is
   The Force Awakens, and so on.)

   Finn still has to make a clear decision about his romantic situation,
   though. As Boyega put it at Star Wars Celebration: “Finn is single and
   willing to mingle!” The movies have been teasing his emotional
   connections with both Rey and the Resistance mechanic Rose Tico, played
   by Kelly Marie Tran, with whom he shared a fleeting battlefield kiss in
   The Last Jedi. Rose seems like the more positive choice, given that she
   stops Finn from deserting early in the movie and saves his life at the
   Battle of Crait, and that the precedents for romantic involvements with
   Jedi are extremely bad. Tran is the first Asian-American woman to play
   a major role in a Star Wars movie, and she has been the target of both
   racist and sexist attacks online. But she has come through them as a
   fan favorite: when she appeared onstage in Chicago, she got a standing
   ovation.

   Finally there’s Poe, who has mostly struggled with his own cocky
   impulsiveness, because he’s a
   loose-cannon-who-just-can’t-play-by-the-rules. Poe will have to step up
   and become a leader, because the Resistance is seriously short on
   officer material. In fact, some of that transformation will already
   have happened where The Rise of Skywalker picks up, which is about a
   year after the end of The Last Jedi. “There has been a bit of shared
   history that you haven’t seen,” Isaac says. “Whereas in the other
   films, Poe is this kind of lone wolf, now he’s really part of a group.
   They’re going out and going on missions and have a much more familiar
   dynamic now.” Star Wars has always been about friendship as much as it
   is about romance, and as of the end of The Last Jedi, Rey, Finn, and
   Poe are all finally in the same place for the first time since The
   Force Awakens.

   The Rise of Skywalker introduces some new players, too. There’s a tiny
   one-wheeled droid called D-O and a large banana-slug alien named Klaud.
   Oh, and Naomi Ackie, Keri Russell, and Richard E. Grant have all joined
   the cast, though, again, we know practically nothing about who they’re
   playing. Going from being outside the Star Wars leviathan to being
   right in its belly can be a dizzying experience for a first-timer. “I
   actually tried to do this thing while we were filming,” Ackie says,
   “where I’d go one day, walking through London without seeing a Star
   Wars reference somewhere. And you can’t do it. You really can’t. So
   it’s extremely surreal to be in it and see how it works from the
   inside.”
   WELL MET
   Jordanian locals play the Aki-Aki, natives of the planet Pasaana.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.

   If anything, Star Wars is only getting more omnipresent. The franchise
   under Lucas was a colossus, but he still ran it essentially as a
   private concern. He could make movies or not, as his muse dictated—he
   was beholden to no shareholders. But Star Wars under Disney makes the
   old Star Wars look positively quaint. Between 1977 and 2005, Lucasfilm
   released six Star Wars movies; when Skywalker premieres in December,
   Disney will have released five Star Wars movies in five years. “I think
   there is a larger expectation that Disney has,” Kennedy says. “On the
   other hand, though, I think that Disney is very respectful of what this
   is, and right from the beginning we talked about the fragility of this
   form of storytelling. Because it’s something that means so much to fans
   that you can’t turn this into some kind of factory approach. You can’t
   even do what Marvel does, necessarily, where you pick characters and
   build new franchises around those characters. This needs to evolve
   differently.”

   A useful example of that fragility might be the relatively modest
   performance of Solo: A Star Wars Story in 2018. Solo was a perfectly
   good Star Wars movie that has made almost $400 million worldwide—but
   it’s also, according to industry estimates, the first one to actually
   lose money. In response Disney has gently but firmly pumped the brakes:
   the first movie in the next Star Wars trilogy, which will be helmed by
   David Benioff and D. B. Weiss, the duo behind Game of Thrones, won’t
   arrive till Christmas of 2022, with further installments every other
   year after that. There’s no official word as to what stories they’ll
   tell, or when a second trilogy being developed by Rian Johnson will
   appear.

   But even as the movies pause, Star Wars continues to colonize any and
   all other media. In addition to video games, comics, novels, cartoons,
   container-loads of merch, etc., there are not one but two live-action
   TV series in the pipeline for Disney+, Disney’s new streaming service:
   The Mandalorian, created by Jon Favreau, and an as-yet-untitled show
   about Cassian Andor from Rogue One. I have personally tried a
   virtual-reality experience called Vader Immortal, written and produced
   by Dark Knight screenwriter David Goyer. At the end of May, Disneyland
   will open Star Wars: Galaxy’s Edge, a massive, 14-acre, $1 billion
   attraction where you can fly the Millennium Falcon, be captured by the
   First Order, and drink a blue milk cocktail (it’s actually nondairy)
   and Coca-Cola products out of exclusive BB-8-shaped bottles at the
   cantina. It’s the largest single-theme expansion in the park’s history:
   Take that, Toy Story Land. The Disney World version will open in
   August.

   You realize now that, under Lucas, Star Wars always slightly had the
   brakes on—we were always kept a little starved for product. With Disney
   driving, we’ll really find out how big Star Wars can get.
   ENCORE
   Composer John Williams conducting the Star Wars score, drawing on
   themes and motifs he has woven across four decades. “I didn’t think
   there would ever be a second film,” he says.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.

   When people talk about the new Star Wars movies, they tend to talk
   about how faithful they are to the originals. What’s harder to say is
   how exactly the new films are different—how movies like Skywalker keep
   their connection to the past while at the same time finding a way to
   belong to the world of 2019. Because regardless of whether or not Star
   Wars has changed since 1977, the world around it has, profoundly.
   “There’s a loss of innocence, a sense of innocence that existed in the
   70s that I don’t think to any extent exists today,” Kennedy says. “I
   think that has to permeate the storytelling and the reaction to the
   stories and how they’re set up. It has to feel differently because
   we’re different.”

   We know things, as a people and as an audience, that we didn’t know
   back then. For example: back then it felt sort of O.K. to like Darth
   Vader, because even though he was evil he was also incredibly cool, and
   the kind of fascism he represented felt like a bogeyman from the
   distant past. But now fascism is rising again, which makes the whole
   First Order subplot look super-prescient, but it also reminds us that
   fascism is not even slightly cool in real life. “Evil needs to feel and
   look very real,” Kennedy says, “and what that means today may not be as
   black-and-white as it might have been in 1977, coming off a kind of
   World War II sensibility.” In the Star Wars–verse, Dark and Light are
   supposed to balance each other, but in the real world they just mix
   together into a hopelessly foggy, morally ambiguous gray.

   But the changes are liberating too. Star Wars doesn’t have to stay
   frozen in time; if anything it’s the opposite, if it doesn’t change
   it’ll die. It will turn into Flash Gordon. For Abrams, that means he
   can’t go through this process so haunted by the ghost of George Lucas
   (who is of course still alive, but you get what I’m saying) that he
   winds up doing a cinematic Lucas impression. At some point Abrams has
   to let Abrams be Abrams.

     It wasn’t all over when the Ewoks sang. Obi-Wan died in vain. Even
     Han and Leia split up. It’s all a little less of a fairy tale now.

   The Rise of Skywalker might be that point. “Working on nine, I found
   myself approaching it slightly differently,” he says. “Which is to say
   that, on seven, I felt beholden to Star Wars in a way that was
   interesting—I was doing what to the best of my ability I felt Star Wars
   should be.” But this time something changed. Abrams found himself
   making different choices—for the camera angles, the lighting, the
   story. “It felt slightly more renegade; it felt slightly more like, you
   know, Fuck it, I’m going to do the thing that feels right because it
   does, not because it adheres to something.”

   There are a lot of small subtle ways that Abrams’s Star Wars is
   different from Lucas’s, but if there’s a standout, it’s the way that
   the new movies look at history. Lucas’s Star Wars movies are bathed in
   the deep golden-sunset glow of the idyllic Old Republic, that more
   civilized age—but the new movies aren’t like that. They’re not
   nostalgic. They don’t long for the past; they’re more about the promise
   of the future. “This trilogy is about this young generation, this new
   generation, having to deal with all the debt that has come before,”
   Abrams says. “And it’s the sins of the father, and it’s the wisdom and
   the accomplishments of those who did great things, but it’s also those
   who committed atrocities, and the idea that this group is up against
   this unspeakable evil and are they prepared? Are they ready? What have
   they learned from before? It’s less about grandeur. It’s less about
   restoring an old age. It’s more about preserving a sense of freedom and
   not being one of the oppressed.”
   FROM THE ASHES
   Mark Hamill, as Luke, with R2-D2. Speculation is rampant about who will
   “rise” as the Skywalker of the movie’s title—and how that choice will
   reflect the way the world has changed since Star Wars debuted in 1977.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.

   The new generation doesn’t have that same connection to the old days
   that Luke and Leia did. It’s not like their parents destroyed the Old
   Republic. We don’t even know who their parents were! They’re too young
   to remember the Empire. They’re just here to clean up the mess they got
   left with, the disastrous consequences of bad decisions made by earlier
   generations, and try to survive long enough to see the future. Is any
   of this resonating with 2019? Might there possibly be a generation
   around here somewhere that’s worried about the consequences of its own
   decisions for the future? Star Wars has never been and probably never
   should be a vehicle for political arguments, but to paraphrase Ursula
   Le Guin, great science fiction is never really about the future. It’s
   about the present.

   You could even—if you’re into that kind of thing—imagine the story of
   the new Star Wars trilogy as a metaphor for the making of the new Star
   Wars trilogy. In fact, I was totally prepared—because I am into that
   kind of thing!—to try to push this overthought metafictional hot take
   onto Abrams … but I didn’t have to. Abrams got there ahead of me. “The
   idea of the movie is kind of how I felt going into the movie as a
   filmmaker,” he says, “which is to say that I’ve inherited all this
   stuff, great stuff, and good wisdom, and the good and the bad, and it’s
   all coming to this end, and the question is, do we have what it takes
   to succeed?”

   Kylo Ren has it all wrong: you can’t bring back the past and become
   your own grandfather, and you can’t kill the past, either. All you can
   do is make your peace with it and learn from it and move on. Abrams is
   doing that with Star Wars—and meanwhile the Resistance is going to have
   to do that, too, if they really are going to bring this saga to an end.
   Because we’ve been here before, watching a band of scrappy rebels take
   down a technofascist empire, and it seemed to work fine at the time—but
   it didn’t last. The same goes for the Jedi and their struggle with the
   Sith. To end this story, really end it, they’re going to have to figure
   out the conditions of a more permanent victory over the forces of
   darkness. Their past was imperfect at best, and the present is a
   complete disaster—but the future is all before them. This time,
   finally, they’re going to get it right.

   Costume design by Michael Kaplan; production design by Rick Carter and
   Kevin Jenkins; creature & droid FX creative supervisor, Neal Scanlan;
   for details, go to VF.com/credits.

More Great Star Wars Stories from Vanity Fair

   — All the images! Meet the characters, and go on set

   — Video: the author of our cover story opens his notebook

   — Faces, places, and empires: everything new revealed in the cover
   story

   — How J.J. Abrams included Carrie Fisher in on-screen moments

   — The Knights of Ren are back. But who are they?

   — From the archive (1999): Speaking with George Lucas on the eve of The
   Phantom Menace release

   There’s a desert valley in southern Jordan called Wadi Rum, or
   sometimes “the Valley of the Moon.” There are stone inscriptions in
   Wadi Rum that are more than 2,000 years old. Lawrence of Arabia passed
   through there during the Arab Revolt against the Ottoman Empire. More
   recently, J. J. Abrams went there to film parts of the latest Star Wars
   movie, The Rise of Skywalker, because it’s largely uninhabited and
   starkly beautiful and looks plausibly alien, and one of the things that
   has always made the Star Wars movies feel so real—as if they had a real
   life of their own that continues on out beyond the edges of the
   screen—is the way they’re shot on location, with as few digital effects
   as possible. George Lucas shot the Tatooine scenes from A New Hope in
   southern Tunisia. For Skywalker, it’s Wadi Rum.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.
   J.J. Abrams, alongside Stunt Coordinator Eunice Huthart, directs the
   Knights of Ren; elite fearsome enforcers of Kylo Ren’s dark will.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.
   FIRST LOOK
   Vanity Fair reveals Keri Russell as the masked scoundrel Zorri Bliss,
   seen in the Thieves’ Quarter of the snow-dusted world Kijimi.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.
   FORCE MAJEURE
   First Order leaders General Hux (Domhnall Gleeson) and Allegiant
   General Pryde (Richard E. Grant) on the bridge of Kylo Ren’s destroyer.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.

   DESERT POWER
   Joonas Suotamo (Chewbacca), Ridley, Anthony Daniels (C-3PO), and John
   Boyega (Finn) await the call to action for a chase scene.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.
   HOT TAKE
   Members of the crew shade and shine Daniels, the only cast member to
   appear in all nine of the Skywalker films, while BB-8 looks on.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.
   HORSING AROUND
   Finn and new ally Jannah (Naomi Ackie), atop hardy orbaks, lead the
   charge against the mechanized forces of the First Order. “It’s
   extremely surreal to be in it,” says Ackie, “and see how it works from
   the inside.”
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.
   STAR CROSSED
   Kylo Ren (Adam Driver) and Rey battle it out with lightsabers in a
   stormy confrontation. Their Force-connection—what Driver calls their
   “maybe-bond”—will turn out to run even deeper than previously revealed.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.
   SANDBLAST
   Camera operator Colin Anderson readies a take for a chase sequence
   spotlighting the heroics of Chewbacca, BB-8, and Rey.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.
   PUNCH IT!
   In a historic reunion, Lando Calrissian (Billy Dee Williams) retakes
   the helm of the Millennium Falcon, joined by Poe Dameron (Oscar Isaac),
   Chewbacca, D-O, and BB-8. “He’s a survivor,” Williams says of Lando.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.
   WELL MET
   Jordanian locals play the Aki-Aki, natives of the planet Pasaana.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.
   ENCORE
   Composer John Williams conducting the Star Wars score, drawing on
   themes and motifs he has woven across four decades. “I didn’t think
   there would ever be a second film,” he says.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.

   FROM THE ASHES
   Mark Hamill, as Luke, with R2-D2. Speculation is rampant about who will
   “rise” as the Skywalker of the movie’s title—and how that choice will
   reflect the way the world has changed since Star Wars debuted in 1977.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.

More Great Star Wars Stories from Vanity Fair

   You have read all of your free articles for this month.
   Login to read more!
   Get Vanity Fair’s Cocktail Hour.
   It’s our essential daily brief on culture, the news, and more. And it’s
   on the house.
   E-mail ____________________ (BUTTON) Submit
   Subscribed successfully!
   Failed to subscribe!

   Will be used in accordance with our Privacy Policy

   Outbrain

                                    Related

   news

   Report: Trump Allies Predict an Impeachment Spiral

   style

   Tiffany Trump Made a Surprise Appearance at, Yes, the U.N. General
   Assembly

   Arts & Culture

   In A Day - Everything Jennifer Lopez Does in a Day

   Arts & Culture

   Patrick Warburton (Joe Swanson) Reviews Impressions of His Voice

   news

   Greta Thunberg Is Officially Better at Twitter Than Trump

   news

   “Adam’s Fantasyland Became a Reality”: Inside the Crash of WeWork’s
   Magic Millennial Real Estate Kingdom

   © Condé Nast 2019

   ×

You are viewing {{data.count}} of {{data.max}} free articles this month

   Get unlimited access to Vanity Fair — plus, a free tote. Join Now ▸

Youʼve read your last article this month

   Get unlimited access to Vanity Fair — plus, a free tote. Join Now ▸

You are viewing {{data.count}} of {{data.max}} free articles this month

   Get unlimited access to Vanity Fair — plus, a free tote. Join Now ▸

Youʼve read your last article this month

   Get unlimited access to Vanity Fair — plus, a free tote. Join Now ▸
   Already a subscriber?
   Sign in
   Link your subscription
   Already a subscriber?
   Sign in
   Link your subscription
    ____________________
     * HIVE
     * HWD
     * VANITIES
     * COMPLETE ARCHIVE

     * Sign In
     * Newsletter
     * Video
     * VF Store
     * Magazine

   (BUTTON)

   Trade War
   News

Trump’s Cold War with China Could Literally Break the Internet

Worsening tensions could push China to split from Silicon Valley, raising the
specter of a completely bifurcated digital world.


    Eric Lutz

   May 22, 2019 2:30 PM
   Shoppers browse a Huawei store at a Shanghai mall in 2019.
   By TOLGA AKMEN/AFP/Getty Images.

   The tech cold war between the United States and China is continuing to
   escalate. Just days after the Trump administration blacklisted China’s
   largest tech firm, Huawei, it’s reportedly weighing a ban against
   additional Chinese companies as part of its broader standoff with
   Beijing, cutting off their access to American technology. The move is
   likely to inflame tensions, and could accelerate the division between
   companies that rely on American tech, and those that use Chinese,
   potentially setting Beijing on a path to technological independence.
   “Even the briefest of bans will be proof to them that China can no
   longer rely on outsiders,” Bloomberg’s Tim Culpan wrote Sunday. “This
   can only accelerate the process of creating a digital iron curtain that
   separates the world into two distinct, mutually exclusive technological
   spheres.”

   The standoff has been brewing for months as Donald Trump battles
   Chinese President Xi Jinping over a relationship the president says has
   “taken so advantage” of the U.S., but it boiled over last week when the
   administration blacklisted Huawei, accusing the Chinese tech giant of
   being “involved in activities contrary to the national security or
   foreign policy interests of the United States”—namely, helping the
   Chinese government engage in foreign espionage. Major western tech
   companies including Google and chipmakers like Intel and Qualcomm have
   cut off supply to Huawei. Still, China has stood firm. On Monday,
   Huawei founder Ren Zhengfei said the administration “underestimates”
   China’s strength and welcomed the fight as step toward global tech
   domination. “We have sacrificed ourselves and our families for our
   ideal: to stand on top of the world,” Ren told Chinese media. “To reach
   this ideal, sooner or later there will be conflict with the U.S.”

   That conflict has already hurt Huawei, and could bring some pain to
   American companies that do business with the world’s second-largest
   economy, as the Associated Press noted Tuesday. But in the longer term,
   it could spur China to greater independence from the U.S., raising the
   specter of the bifurcated internet that Eric Schmidt—the former C.E.O.
   of Google’s parent company, Alphabet—and others have predicted. “I
   think the most likely scenario now is not a splintering,” Schmidt said
   last year, “but rather a bifurcation into a Chinese-led internet and a
   non-Chinese internet led by America.” China has already set 2025 as its
   target for technological independence. If it no longer sees the U.S. as
   a reliable partner, it is ever more likely to begin a push to
   manufacture all its products domestically. Such bifurcation could
   change the tech sphere as we know it, creating not only different
   digital universes for different populations (a censored Web in
   authoritarian China, and a free Web everywhere else), but different
   megalithic hardware companies, depending on the region.
   View more

   Tensions are already high between the countries over the Huawei
   dispute, but they’re likely to grow as the U.S. considers adding to the
   blacklist. Hikvision, the world’s largest manufacturer of video
   surveillance equipment and one of the companies that could fall under
   the axe, has faced bipartisan scrutiny in the U.S. over its role in the
   Chinese government’s use of artificial intelligence to track and
   control its minority Muslim population. But the move has drawn
   condemnation from Beijing, which is accusing the administration of
   “arbitrarily” hitting at Chinese industry to gain an upper hand in its
   trade war. “China opposes the United States’s practice of abusing state
   power and arbitrarily discrediting and suppressing foreign enterprises,
   including Chinese enterprises, Lu Kang, a spokesperson for the Chinese
   foreign ministry, said in a briefing Wednesday.

   The tech cold war between the United States and China is continuing to
   escalate. Just days after the Trump administration blacklisted China’s
   largest tech firm, Huawei, it’s reportedly weighing a ban against
   additional Chinese companies as part of its broader standoff with
   Beijing, cutting off their access to American technology. The move is
   likely to inflame tensions, and could accelerate the division between
   companies that rely on American tech, and those that use Chinese,
   potentially setting Beijing on a path to technological independence.
   “Even the briefest of bans will be proof to them that China can no
   longer rely on outsiders,” Bloomberg’s Tim Culpan wrote Sunday. “This
   can only accelerate the process of creating a digital iron curtain that
   separates the world into two distinct, mutually exclusive technological
   spheres.”
   You have read all of your free articles for this month.
   Login to read more!
   Get Vanity Fair’s Cocktail Hour.
   It’s our essential daily brief on culture, the news, and more. And it’s
   on the house.
   E-mail ____________________ (BUTTON) Submit
   Subscribed successfully!
   Failed to subscribe!

   Will be used in accordance with our Privacy Policy

   Outbrain

                                    Related

   news

   Report: Trump Allies Predict an Impeachment Spiral

   style

   Tiffany Trump Made a Surprise Appearance at, Yes, the U.N. General
   Assembly

   Arts & Culture

   In A Day - Everything Jennifer Lopez Does in a Day

   Arts & Culture

   Patrick Warburton (Joe Swanson) Reviews Impressions of His Voice

   news

   Greta Thunberg Is Officially Better at Twitter Than Trump

   news

   “Adam’s Fantasyland Became a Reality”: Inside the Crash of WeWork’s
   Magic Millennial Real Estate Kingdom

   © Condé Nast 2019

   ×

You are viewing {{data.count}} of {{data.max}} free articles this month

   Get unlimited access to Vanity Fair — plus, a free tote. Join Now ▸

Youʼve read your last article this month

   Get unlimited access to Vanity Fair — plus, a free tote. Join Now ▸

You are viewing {{data.count}} of {{data.max}} free articles this month

   Get unlimited access to Vanity Fair — plus, a free tote. Join Now ▸

Youʼve read your last article this month

   Get unlimited access to Vanity Fair — plus, a free tote. Join Now ▸
   Already a subscriber?
   Sign in
   Link your subscription
   Already a subscriber?
   Sign in
   Link your subscription
    ____________________
     * HIVE
     * HWD
     * VANITIES
     * COMPLETE ARCHIVE

     * Sign In
     * Newsletter
     * Video
     * VF Store
     * Magazine

   (BUTTON)

   In Conversation
   Beauty
   Style

Jake Gyllenhaal Is Big on Exfoliation and Gary Shteyngart–Style Narcissism

The actor, now on Broadway in the two-man show Sea Wall/A Life, reprises his
role as the face of Calvin Klein Eternity for this month’s new eau de parfum.
Not that he needs it. “I do believe in showering as a spiritual practice and
a physical practice.”


    Laura Regensdorf

   September 9, 2019 8:00 AM
   By Taylor Jewell/Invision/AP/Shutterstock.

   Jake Gyllenhaal thinks I’m hot. He said as much one afternoon this
   summer, while we were sitting at a two-top on the back patio of Lucali,
   the Brooklyn pizza joint with the perpetual mile-long wait list. (He’s
   a regular. The owner, Mark Iacono, had opened up early and was already
   churning out pies.) Or rather, the actor’s actual words were, “You
   might want to use that.” He was holding out a paper napkin with one
   hand, as the other pantomimed a fanning gesture. A pearlescent sweat
   mustache dotted my upper lip, and Gyllenhaal had apparently taken
   notice. Of my hotness.

   I peeled off my blazer, casting aside a flush of embarrassment. It was
   summer in the city, and a wood-fired oven was blazing inside. Besides,
   isn’t that what a perceptive actor is supposed to take in: the subtle
   discomfort of his wilting tablemate?

   In a way, that is what Gyllenhaal has been doing every night at the
   Hudson Theatre since the two-man Broadway show, Sea Wall/A Life, began
   previews in late July. It’s a diptych of grief stories: a gut punch of
   a monologue delivered by Tom Sturridge, followed by an antic solo turn
   by Gyllenhaal, who plays a thirty-something toggling between losing a
   dad and welcoming a son. (“I read somewhere that to be born is to risk
   death,” his character says, the weight of fatherhood looming.) But even
   on an empty stage, Gyllenhaal is hardly alone. “I have never done a
   show where I speak to the audience the entire time,” he says,
   describing an unusual cocoon of intimacy in the thousand-seat venue
   (four times what the production first counted when it ran Off-Broadway
   this past spring). “We don’t have any rules in our show. Whatever
   happens, happens.”
   View more

   Like what? “A phone goes off. A lot of actors would be
   like”—Gyllenhaal’s voice slides into mock effrontery—“ ‘How dare you
   destroy the sanctity of the sacred space of theater.’ “ He credits the
   director Carrie Cracknell with holding the two men to task. “Every time
   it felt like we were performing, she’d call us on bullshit, and so in
   that sense, the idea that we’re separate from the audience also feels
   like bullshit. If something happens that’s human—particularly when
   we’re talking about the mess of being human—it makes no sense to try
   and pretend like it doesn’t exist.” That’s why he comically apologizes,
   mid-play, as he wiggles past the front row. I wonder if he’s ever
   extended a tissue to a crying theatergoer. Or a perspiring one.

   But what brought us to Lucali (besides the promise of a good slice) was
   a different kind of role: Gyllenhaal as the face of Calvin Klein
   Eternity. In 2017 he played the family man in a Cary Fukunaga-directed
   commercial, opposite Liya Kebede and their fictional child. (The
   internet gushed about Gyllenhaal’s “hot dad” moment, but in reality
   heʼs the hot uncle to his sister Maggieʼs kids.) Now, Gyllenhaal is
   fronting a more intense eau de parfum version. Is it a bit like when a
   well-received show transfers to Broadway? “I’m totally willing to make
   that connection,” he said with a laugh—and totally willing to talk
   about cinematic scents, fictional narcissism, and his own preferred way
   to sweat.

   Vanity Fair: Fatherhood is a recurring theme, in the play and in that
   original Eternity campaign. Has your family been laying on the
   pressure?

   Jake Gyllenhaal: My dad in particular just was fascinated with the
   choice [of] being a father in an ad. He was like, “So what is this all
   about?” When the Calvin Klein team brought it up to me, what felt a lot
   more interesting was the idea of family, outside of selling a fragrance
   with sex. It was obviously the implication of sex because there was a
   child, but the child was a product of love. A lot of the roles I do are
   me asking myself questions, and I can’t separate—whether it be an
   advertisement or a movie—being honest from any of those things. And I
   love my nieces, I love sort of the idea of having my own child, so I
   wanted to explore that. I’m doing a show on Broadway that’s about being
   a son, being a father, and I think I’m at a place in my life where my
   parents are at a certain age and our positions start to change. My
   parents have made movies themselves, and my mom in particular was
   always asking questions about family and exploring that idea.

   I’m just in the middle of Sheila Heti’s Motherhood, and the book deals
   with the idea of being an artist or a mother, and whether one
   sublimates the other.

   Well, I watch someone like Stephen Sondheim, who I would say is the
   preeminent poet-lyricist of our time, particularly in musical
   theater—and he’s birthed child after child with his creations. I did
   one of his shows [Sunday in the Park with George], and the first act is
   about an artist’s being obsessed with their work and not being able to
   commit to their life. And then in the second act—this is my
   interpretation—is an artist who was well renowned, made a lot of money,
   but wasn’t, as my high school art history teacher said, a
   "meta-historical artist" that transcends decades and generations. And
   yet he discovers at the end of that show that making a family is his
   triumph. The only things we leave behind are children and art, and that
   is the never-ending question.

   Given the themes of Sea Wall/A Life, is there a lingering heaviness
   that you need to, say, exorcise in the bathtub at night?

   No. I’m a real wonderful mess, you know? I’ve learned to accept a lot
   about myself. I’ve put myself through a lot of weird physical things
   for roles I’ve done, emotional things for roles I’ve done. The other
   day Carrie [Cracknell, the director] was like, "Both of you looked
   wrecked at the end of that [Off-Broadway] run." And it’s interesting
   because I’ve never laughed so much in my life. Yet the energy you’re
   exchanging does take it from you. I do believe in showering as a
   spiritual practice and a physical practice. Since working in South
   Korea on a movie, I’ve found exfoliation to be a really wonderful, very
   manly thing, which I didn’t appreciate as much before.

   Clearly you’re invested in taking care of yourself. Are there things
   you do for wellness, and then things you call bullshit on?

   I think it’s all bullshit if you want it to be bullshit, and it’s not
   if you don’t. I feel that way about pretty much everything as long as
   you’re not hurting anyone. I believe in sweat, in whatever form. For
   me, my best form of self-care is intimacy; that makes me sweat. And
   then I believe in the balance of rest and exercise. It’s really that
   simple for me. Because I have an older sister who is an actor—and
   because she has taught me since I was a kid and I’ve looked up to
   her—skin care is important. People can definitely get me for that, but
   you’d be laughing your way to wherever. I think caring for yourself is
   really important, particularly nowadays as men. Being vulnerable and
   admitting those vulnerabilities is very, very important.

   Some actors use scent to help get into character. Have you ever done
   that, whether with forest-y scents or unshowered stink?

   I’ve used and tried it all. Nothing works. In the end, it’s all about
   good writing.

   On the flip side, John Waters gave the audience scratch-and-sniff
   Odorama cards for Polyester. If you could imagine a film of yours that
   deserves a scratch-and-sniff card, what would it be?

   I’m thinking of Zeffirelli’s Romeo and Juliet—what that
   scratch-and-sniff card would smell like, because if it smells the way
   that movie looks, my god. And Nightcrawler—new leather car smells. It
   has top notes of blood and fecal matter.

   John Waters would definitely approve.

   Yes, he would!

   Tell me about the upcoming adaptation of Gary Shteyngartʼs Lake
   Success. It seems like slipping into a character that narcissistic is
   perhaps less appealing than the father role for Eternity?

   I do want to try that on. In fact, I live in it all the time—we
   subscribe to it daily and hourly, minute by minute. I’m really
   fascinated to explore someone who is a narcissist and who is obsessed
   with capitalism and all the trappings around it. Is it possible to pull
   someone from that, into their humanness? Are we too far gone? Gary’s
   writing—that you love him and understand something about him even as
   you are disgusted—I just think that’s so human. We live in a world
   where there are a lot of black-and-whites, and the spectrum really
   doesn’t exist in many other spaces.

   You joined Instagram recently, and itʼs a similarly sanitized space.
   You don’t see a lot of the uncomfortable.

   I totally agree. In my world, there are a lot of people tailoring
   themselves and altering the beautiful parts of their personalities to
   show people something that is probably not fully true. I’ve done it for
   many years in different ways, and I think my desire to be a part of
   something like Instagram is just to say, "I am a part of everything
   with everyone." I don’t want to isolate myself in some idea of what an
   artist is supposed to be. If I’m interested in the unknown in my work,
   Instagram is an unknown to me. Why would I avoid it? And I’m
   discovering some interesting things! I say that with a wink. Curiosity
   is everything, and if we lose it, we’re fucked.

   Jake Gyllenhaal thinks I’m hot. He said as much one afternoon this
   summer, while we were sitting at a two-top on the back patio of Lucali,
   the Brooklyn pizza joint with the perpetual mile-long wait list. (He’s
   a regular. The owner, Mark Iacono, had opened up early and was already
   churning out pies.) Or rather, the actor’s actual words were, “You
   might want to use that.” He was holding out a paper napkin with one
   hand, as the other pantomimed a fanning gesture. A pearlescent sweat
   mustache dotted my upper lip, and Gyllenhaal had apparently taken
   notice. Of my hotness.
   You have read all of your free articles for this month.
   Login to read more!
   Get Vanity Fair’s Cocktail Hour.
   It’s our essential daily brief on culture, the news, and more. And it’s
   on the house.
   E-mail ____________________ (BUTTON) Submit
   Subscribed successfully!
   Failed to subscribe!

   Will be used in accordance with our Privacy Policy

   Outbrain

                                    Related

   news

   Report: Trump Allies Predict an Impeachment Spiral

   style

   Tiffany Trump Made a Surprise Appearance at, Yes, the U.N. General
   Assembly

   Arts & Culture

   In A Day - Everything Jennifer Lopez Does in a Day

   Arts & Culture

   Patrick Warburton (Joe Swanson) Reviews Impressions of His Voice

   news

   Greta Thunberg Is Officially Better at Twitter Than Trump

   news

   “Adam’s Fantasyland Became a Reality”: Inside the Crash of WeWork’s
   Magic Millennial Real Estate Kingdom

   © Condé Nast 2019

   ×

You are viewing {{data.count}} of {{data.max}} free articles this month

   Get unlimited access to Vanity Fair — plus, a free tote. Join Now ▸

Youʼve read your last article this month

   Get unlimited access to Vanity Fair — plus, a free tote. Join Now ▸

You are viewing {{data.count}} of {{data.max}} free articles this month

   Get unlimited access to Vanity Fair — plus, a free tote. Join Now ▸

Youʼve read your last article this month

   Get unlimited access to Vanity Fair — plus, a free tote. Join Now ▸
   Already a subscriber?
   Sign in
   Link your subscription
   Already a subscriber?
   Sign in
   Link your subscription
   IFRAME: https://www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-KSG89LT

   Skip to main content
   (BUTTON) Open Navigation Menu

   HWD
   Sign In
     * Subscribe

   Search
     * HIVE
          + Business
          + Technology
          + Politics
          + The Players
     * HWD
          + Movies
          + Television
          + Awards
          + Reviews
     * VANITIES
          + Celebrity
          + Fashion
          + Beauty
          + Royals
     * COMPLETE ARCHIVE

   Star Wars

Star Wars: The Truth About Kylo Ren and Rey’s Connection

   Daisy Ridley and Adam Driver discuss the intergalactic will they/won’t
   they.
   By
   Joanna Robinson
   May 22, 2019
     *
     *
     *

   Kylo Ren and Rey battle it out with lightsabers. STAR CROSSED
   Kylo Ren (Adam Driver) and Rey battle it out with lightsabers in a
   stormy confrontation. Their Force-connection—what Driver calls their
   “maybe-bond”—will turn out to run even deeper than previously
   revealed.Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.
     *
     *
     *

   For a certain segment of the Star Wars fandom, the juiciest nugget from
   Vanity Fair’s exclusive new cover story on The Rise of Skywalker has to
   be this: “a source close to the movie says that [Kylo Ren and Rey’s]
   Force-connection will turn out to run even deeper than we thought.” For
   lack of any more obvious Anakin and Padmé or Han and Leia-type romances
   in the trilogy, fans have latched on to Kylo and Rey as potential
   star-crossed lovers ripped apart by opposite sides of the Force. But do
   actors Daisy Ridley and Adam Driver see them that way? Vanity Fair
   contributor Lev Grossman attempted to find out.

   Unlike some potential romances that have preoccupied fans, the Kylo and
   Rey relationship has gotten plenty of support from inside the Star Wars
   production team. When speaking about The Force Awakens, director J.J.
   Abrams referred to Star Wars as “a fairy tale” calling out both Kylo as
   a “prince” and the duo’s “interesting relationship moving forward.”
   Mark Hamill referred to the pair’s “romantic tension” in The Last Jedi.
   But things looked decisively done between the two at the end of Episode
   VIII. And, at any rate, Rey has a lot more on her mind—like saving the
   galaxy. So where do they go from here?

   When speaking about their characters with Grossman, both Ridley and
   Driver wound up describing similarly lonely and isolated childhoods for
   these Force-sensitive figures. Rey was literally abandoned by her
   parents—whoever they may be—and so has trouble comprehending how Kylo
   could shun his. But Ridley herself is much more understanding of the
   stress that might come from being raised by Han Solo and Leia Organa:
   “Having the two coolest parents and sometimes I’m sure it works
   amazingly, and sometimes it just might not.”

   For Driver, this concept is the key to understanding Kylo Ren. “If you
   were the product of those two people, two very strong personalities who
   seemed to be almost more committed to a cause than anything else,
   what’s that like?” he says. Ben Solo is born to privilege, yes, but
   also tremendous pressure. Driver likens the Skywalker–Solos to a royal
   family, and notes the isolating power of being born with those
   spectacular gifts: “How do you form friendships out of that? How do you
   understand the weight of that? . . . It can easily go awry.” Burdened
   by her own talents, Rey also feels that solitude. “It’s a bit lonely
   having that much on one’s shoulders,” Ridley says.

   Though their shared childhood isolation set them on two very different
   paths, the Rian Johnson-directed Last Jedi showed Kylo and Rey finding
   kinship in each other. Ridley describes them as “two quite powerful
   people who feel.” Driver adds that his character “had been forging this
   maybe-bond with Rey. The Last Jedi ends with the question in the air:
   is he going to pursue that relationship more or, when the door of her
   ship goes up, does that also close that camaraderie? This idea of being
   alone.”

   If Kylo is still questioning, Rey is, at least initially, more
   resolute. Ridley says that as The Rise of Skywalker begins, “Rey is
   less inclined to believe that Kylo potentially could redeem himself.”

   Looking back over the long arc of nine films, it’s easy to see the
   Skywalker saga as not only a story about repairing fractured bonds and
   escaping repeated patterns of a specific bloodline, but also the
   families we create for ourselves. John Boyega’s Finn and Oscar Isaac’s
   Poe Dameron are both options of support for Rey as she tries to build
   something new out of the ashes of her first attempt to reach Kylo Ren.
   “It’s not about just one person,” Isaac says of how his character deals
   with the strain of leadership and heroism in The Rise of Skywalker.
   “[It’s about] reaching out to his family, and particularly Finn is his
   family.”
   Most Popular
     * What a Kevin Feige Star Wars Movie Might Look Like
       By
       Anthony Breznican
     * SoftBank Reportedly Wants WeWork to “Shelve” Its IPO
       By
       Eric Lutz
     * Howard Schultz Just Made Trump’s 2020 Campaign Harder
       By
       Eric Lutz
     *

   Advertisement

   Ridley says Rey is also part of that relationship, but kept apart a bit
   due to her Force sensitivity. Will Kylo Ren and Rey reforge their own
   connection? And, if they do, will it be love or simply friendship that
   unites them? The answer, Driver says, is incredibly complicated: “I
   don’t think it’s any one thing. The strength in what Rian [Johnson]
   wrote and what J.J. [Abrams] wrote is it’s never all one thing.”

   For more, read Lev Grossman’s cover story about the latest adventure in
   the galaxy far, far away, and keep coming back to VF.com for even more
   details from behind the scenes. The summer issue of Vanity Fair will be
   on newsstands in New York and Los Angeles on May 30, and nationally on
   June 4.

More Great Star Wars Stories from Vanity Fair

   — Read our exclusive, behind-the-scenes look at Star Wars: The Rise of
   Skywalker

   — Plus, all the images! Meet the characters, and go on set

   — Video: the author of our cover story opens his notebook

   — Faces, places, and empires: everything new revealed in the cover
   story

   — How J.J. Abrams included Carrie Fisher in on-screen moments

   — From the archive (2002): The forbidden romance between Anakin
   Skywalker and Queen Amidala
     __________________________________________________________________

Star Wars: The Rise of Skywalker Photos: Meet the Characters and Go on Set

     * Members of the crew shade and shine Daniels on set in Jordan.
     * J.J. Abrams alongside Stunt Coordinator Eunice Huthart and the
       Knights of Ren.
     * Keri Russell as the masked scoundrel Zorri Bliss.

   1 / 16 (BUTTON)
   (BUTTON)
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.
   HOT TAKE
   Members of the crew shade and shine Daniels, the only cast member to
   appear in all nine of the Skywalker films, while BB-8 looks on.
     __________________________________________________________________

   Read More
   HWD
   What a Kevin Feige Star Wars Movie Might Look Like
   By
   Anthony Breznican
   icon
   Arts & Culture
   Marvel Writers Explain How They Wrote MCU Blockbusters
   By
   Vanity Fair
   icon
   Arts & Culture
   Patrick Warburton (Joe Swanson) Reviews Impressions of His Voice
   By
   Vanity Fair
   icon
   Arts & Culture
   Director Explains How She Made “The Babadook” and “The Nightingale”
   By
   Vanity Fair

   HWD

     *
     *
     *
     *
     *

   (BUTTON) More from Vanity Fair
     * Promotions
     * Newsletter
     * Subscribe
     * Digital Edition
     * Inside the Issue

   (BUTTON) Contact
     * Contact VF
     * Customer Service
     * Advertising
     * Careers

     * Condé Nast Store
     * Reprints / Permissions
     * VF Media Kit
     * Sitemap
     * Accessibility Help

   © 2019 Condé Nast. All rights reserved. Use of this site constitutes
   acceptance of our User Agreement (updated 5/25/18) and Privacy Policy
   and Cookie Statement (updated 5/25/18) and Your California Privacy
   Rights. Vanity Fair may earn a portion of sales from products that are
   purchased through our site as part of our Affiliate Partnerships with
   retailers. The material on this site may not be reproduced,
   distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the
   prior written permission of Condé Nast. Ad Choices

   CN Entertainment
   [United States]

   IFRAME: https://js-sec.indexww.com/um/ixmatch.html
    ____________________
     * HIVE
     * HWD
     * VANITIES
     * COMPLETE ARCHIVE

     * Sign In
     * Newsletter
     * Video
     * VF Store
     * Magazine

   (BUTTON)

   Star Wars
   Hollywood

Star Wars: The Truth About Kylo Ren and Rey’s Connection

Daisy Ridley and Adam Driver discuss the intergalactic will they/won’t they.


    Joanna Robinson

   May 22, 2019 8:15 AM
   STAR CROSSED
   Kylo Ren (Adam Driver) and Rey battle it out with lightsabers in a
   stormy confrontation. Their Force-connection—what Driver calls their
   “maybe-bond”—will turn out to run even deeper than previously revealed.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.

   For a certain segment of the Star Wars fandom, the juiciest nugget from
   Vanity Fair’s exclusive new cover story on The Rise of Skywalker has to
   be this: “a source close to the movie says that [Kylo Ren and Rey’s]
   Force-connection will turn out to run even deeper than we thought.” For
   lack of any more obvious Anakin and Padmé or Han and Leia-type romances
   in the trilogy, fans have latched on to Kylo and Rey as potential
   star-crossed lovers ripped apart by opposite sides of the Force. But do
   actors Daisy Ridley and Adam Driver see them that way? Vanity Fair
   contributor Lev Grossman attempted to find out.

   Unlike some potential romances that have preoccupied fans, the Kylo and
   Rey relationship has gotten plenty of support from inside the Star Wars
   production team. When speaking about The Force Awakens, director J.J.
   Abrams referred to Star Wars as “a fairy tale” calling out both Kylo as
   a “prince” and the duo’s “interesting relationship moving forward.”
   Mark Hamill referred to the pair’s “romantic tension” in The Last Jedi.
   But things looked decisively done between the two at the end of Episode
   VIII. And, at any rate, Rey has a lot more on her mind—like saving the
   galaxy. So where do they go from here?

   When speaking about their characters with Grossman, both Ridley and
   Driver wound up describing similarly lonely and isolated childhoods for
   these Force-sensitive figures. Rey was literally abandoned by her
   parents—whoever they may be—and so has trouble comprehending how Kylo
   could shun his. But Ridley herself is much more understanding of the
   stress that might come from being raised by Han Solo and Leia Organa:
   “Having the two coolest parents and sometimes I’m sure it works
   amazingly, and sometimes it just might not.”

   For Driver, this concept is the key to understanding Kylo Ren. “If you
   were the product of those two people, two very strong personalities who
   seemed to be almost more committed to a cause than anything else,
   what’s that like?” he says. Ben Solo is born to privilege, yes, but
   also tremendous pressure. Driver likens the Skywalker–Solos to a royal
   family, and notes the isolating power of being born with those
   spectacular gifts: “How do you form friendships out of that? How do you
   understand the weight of that? . . . It can easily go awry.” Burdened
   by her own talents, Rey also feels that solitude. “It’s a bit lonely
   having that much on one’s shoulders,” Ridley says.

   Though their shared childhood isolation set them on two very different
   paths, the Rian Johnson-directed Last Jedi showed Kylo and Rey finding
   kinship in each other. Ridley describes them as “two quite powerful
   people who feel.” Driver adds that his character “had been forging this
   maybe-bond with Rey. The Last Jedi ends with the question in the air:
   is he going to pursue that relationship more or, when the door of her
   ship goes up, does that also close that camaraderie? This idea of being
   alone.”

   If Kylo is still questioning, Rey is, at least initially, more
   resolute. Ridley says that as The Rise of Skywalker begins, “Rey is
   less inclined to believe that Kylo potentially could redeem himself.”

   Looking back over the long arc of nine films, it’s easy to see the
   Skywalker saga as not only a story about repairing fractured bonds and
   escaping repeated patterns of a specific bloodline, but also the
   families we create for ourselves. John Boyega’s Finn and Oscar Isaac’s
   Poe Dameron are both options of support for Rey as she tries to build
   something new out of the ashes of her first attempt to reach Kylo Ren.
   “It’s not about just one person,” Isaac says of how his character deals
   with the strain of leadership and heroism in The Rise of Skywalker.
   “[It’s about] reaching out to his family, and particularly Finn is his
   family.”

   Ridley says Rey is also part of that relationship, but kept apart a bit
   due to her Force sensitivity. Will Kylo Ren and Rey reforge their own
   connection? And, if they do, will it be love or simply friendship that
   unites them? The answer, Driver says, is incredibly complicated: “I
   don’t think it’s any one thing. The strength in what Rian [Johnson]
   wrote and what J.J. [Abrams] wrote is it’s never all one thing.”

   For more, read Lev Grossman’s cover story about the latest adventure in
   the galaxy far, far away, and keep coming back to VF.com for even more
   details from behind the scenes. The summer issue of Vanity Fair will be
   on newsstands in New York and Los Angeles on May 30, and nationally on
   June 4.

More Great Star Wars Stories from Vanity Fair

   — Read our exclusive, behind-the-scenes look at Star Wars: The Rise of
   Skywalker

   — Plus, all the images! Meet the characters, and go on set

   — Video: the author of our cover story opens his notebook

   — Faces, places, and empires: everything new revealed in the cover
   story

   — How J.J. Abrams included Carrie Fisher in on-screen moments

   — From the archive (2002): The forbidden romance between Anakin
   Skywalker and Queen Amidala

Star Wars: The Rise of Skywalker Photos: Meet the Characters and Go on Set

   HOT TAKE
   Members of the crew shade and shine Daniels, the only cast member to
   appear in all nine of the Skywalker films, while BB-8 looks on.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.
   J.J. Abrams, alongside Stunt Coordinator Eunice Huthart, directs the
   Knights of Ren; elite fearsome enforcers of Kylo Ren’s dark will.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.
   FIRST LOOK
   Vanity Fair reveals Keri Russell as the masked scoundrel Zorri Bliss,
   seen in the Thieves’ Quarter of the snow-dusted world Kijimi.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.
   FORCE MAJEURE
   First Order leaders General Hux (Domhnall Gleeson) and Allegiant
   General Pryde (Richard E. Grant) on the bridge of Kylo Ren’s destroyer.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.
   DESERT POWER
   Joonas Suotamo (Chewbacca), Ridley, Anthony Daniels (C-3PO), and John
   Boyega (Finn) await the call to action for a chase scene.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.
   SANDBLAST
   Camera operator Colin Anderson readies a take for a chase sequence
   spotlighting the heroics of Chewbacca, BB-8, and Rey.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.
   PUNCH IT!
   In a historic reunion, Lando Calrissian (Billy Dee Williams) retakes
   the helm of the Millennium Falcon, joined by Poe Dameron (Oscar Isaac),
   Chewbacca, D-O, and BB-8. “He’s a survivor,” Williams says of Lando.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.
   HORSING AROUND
   Finn and new ally Jannah (Naomi Ackie), atop hardy orbaks, lead the
   charge against the mechanized forces of the First Order. “It’s
   extremely surreal to be in it,” says Ackie, “and see how it works from
   the inside.”
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.
   Camera operator Colin Anderson readies a take.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.
   WELL MET
   Jordanian locals play the Aki-Aki, natives of the planet Pasaana.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.
   STAR CROSSED
   Kylo Ren (Adam Driver) and Rey battle it out with lightsabers in a
   stormy confrontation. Their Force-connection—what Driver calls their
   “maybe-bond”—will turn out to run even deeper than previously revealed.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.
   Director and co-writer J. J. Abrams and crew weather the Jordanian sun
   to capture the action on planet Pasaana.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.
   ENCORE
   Composer John Williams conducting the Star Wars score, drawing on
   themes and motifs he has woven across four decades. “I didn’t think
   there would ever be a second film,” he says.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.
   FROM THE ASHES
   Mark Hamill, as Luke, with R2-D2. Speculation is rampant about who will
   “rise” as the Skywalker of the movie’s title—and how that choice will
   reflect the way the world has changed since Star Wars debuted in 1977.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.Photograph
   by Annie Leibovitz.

   For a certain segment of the Star Wars fandom, the juiciest nugget from
   Vanity Fair’s exclusive new cover story on The Rise of Skywalker has to
   be this: “a source close to the movie says that [Kylo Ren and Rey’s]
   Force-connection will turn out to run even deeper than we thought.” For
   lack of any more obvious Anakin and Padmé or Han and Leia-type romances
   in the trilogy, fans have latched on to Kylo and Rey as potential
   star-crossed lovers ripped apart by opposite sides of the Force. But do
   actors Daisy Ridley and Adam Driver see them that way? Vanity Fair
   contributor Lev Grossman attempted to find out.

More Great Star Wars Stories from Vanity Fair

Star Wars: The Rise of Skywalker Photos: Meet the Characters and Go on Set

   HOT TAKE
   Members of the crew shade and shine Daniels, the only cast member to
   appear in all nine of the Skywalker films, while BB-8 looks on.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.
   J.J. Abrams, alongside Stunt Coordinator Eunice Huthart, directs the
   Knights of Ren; elite fearsome enforcers of Kylo Ren’s dark will.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.
   FIRST LOOK
   Vanity Fair reveals Keri Russell as the masked scoundrel Zorri Bliss,
   seen in the Thieves’ Quarter of the snow-dusted world Kijimi.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.
   FORCE MAJEURE
   First Order leaders General Hux (Domhnall Gleeson) and Allegiant
   General Pryde (Richard E. Grant) on the bridge of Kylo Ren’s destroyer.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.
   DESERT POWER
   Joonas Suotamo (Chewbacca), Ridley, Anthony Daniels (C-3PO), and John
   Boyega (Finn) await the call to action for a chase scene.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.
   SANDBLAST
   Camera operator Colin Anderson readies a take for a chase sequence
   spotlighting the heroics of Chewbacca, BB-8, and Rey.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.
   PUNCH IT!
   In a historic reunion, Lando Calrissian (Billy Dee Williams) retakes
   the helm of the Millennium Falcon, joined by Poe Dameron (Oscar Isaac),
   Chewbacca, D-O, and BB-8. “He’s a survivor,” Williams says of Lando.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.
   HORSING AROUND
   Finn and new ally Jannah (Naomi Ackie), atop hardy orbaks, lead the
   charge against the mechanized forces of the First Order. “It’s
   extremely surreal to be in it,” says Ackie, “and see how it works from
   the inside.”
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.
   Camera operator Colin Anderson readies a take.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.
   WELL MET
   Jordanian locals play the Aki-Aki, natives of the planet Pasaana.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.
   STAR CROSSED
   Kylo Ren (Adam Driver) and Rey battle it out with lightsabers in a
   stormy confrontation. Their Force-connection—what Driver calls their
   “maybe-bond”—will turn out to run even deeper than previously revealed.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.
   Director and co-writer J. J. Abrams and crew weather the Jordanian sun
   to capture the action on planet Pasaana.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.
   ENCORE
   Composer John Williams conducting the Star Wars score, drawing on
   themes and motifs he has woven across four decades. “I didn’t think
   there would ever be a second film,” he says.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.
   FROM THE ASHES
   Mark Hamill, as Luke, with R2-D2. Speculation is rampant about who will
   “rise” as the Skywalker of the movie’s title—and how that choice will
   reflect the way the world has changed since Star Wars debuted in 1977.
   Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.Photograph by Annie Leibovitz.Photograph
   by Annie Leibovitz.
   You have read all of your free articles for this month.
   Login to read more!
   Get Vanity Fair’s Cocktail Hour.
   It’s our essential daily brief on culture, the news, and more. And it’s
   on the house.
   E-mail ____________________ (BUTTON) Submit
   Subscribed successfully!
   Failed to subscribe!

   Will be used in accordance with our Privacy Policy

   Outbrain

                                    Related

   news

   “It’s Management Bedlam”: Madness at Fox News as Trump Faces
   Impeachment

   hollywood

   World War I Drama 1917 Will Play As One Continuous Shot

   hollywood

   Saturday Night Live Takes On Trump Impeachment With a Truly Baffling
   Ray Donovan Cameo

   news

   “The Beauty of Jared, for Him, Is He’s Always There”: Guess Who’s
   Prince of the Trump-Impeachment Bunker?

   news

   Trump: My Crimes Can’t Be Investigated While I’m President

   news

   Trump: Of Course I’m Trying to Unmask the Whistleblower!

   © Condé Nast 2019

   ×

You are viewing {{data.count}} of {{data.max}} free articles this month

   Get unlimited access to Vanity Fair — plus, a free tote. Join Now ▸

Youʼve read your last article this month

   Get unlimited access to Vanity Fair — plus, a free tote. Join Now ▸

You are viewing {{data.count}} of {{data.max}} free articles this month

   Get unlimited access to Vanity Fair — plus, a free tote. Join Now ▸

Youʼve read your last article this month

   Get unlimited access to Vanity Fair — plus, a free tote. Join Now ▸
   Already a subscriber?
   Sign in
   Link your subscription
   Already a subscriber?
   Sign in
   Link your subscription
